4th - 3.61.5-1 - 4th forth compiler
6in4 - 16-1 - Provides support for 6in4 tunnels in /etc/config/network. Refer to http://wiki.openwrt.org/doc/uci/network for configuration details.
6rd - 4-1 - Provides support for 6rd tunnels in /etc/config/network. Refer to http://wiki.openwrt.org/doc/uci/network for configuration details.
6relayd - 2013-07-26-2ed520c500b0fbb484cfad5687eb39a0da43dcf7 - 6relayd is a daemon for serving and relaying IPv6 management protocols to configure clients and downstream routers.  6relayd provides server services for RA, stateless DHCPv6, DHCPv6-PD and can be used to relay RA, DHCPv6 and NDP between routed (non-bridged) interfaces in case no delegated prefixes are provided by the upstream router.
6to4 - 12-1 - Provides support for 6to4 tunnels in /etc/config/network. Refer to http://wiki.openwrt.org/doc/uci/network for configuration details.
6tunnel - 0.11rc2-3 - IPv4 / IPv6 tunnel proxy
GraphicsMagick - 1.3.8-2 - An image manipulation library.
GraphicsMagick-jpeg - 1.3.8-2 - GraphicsMagick JPEG module
agetty - 2.21.2-1 - agetty opens a tty port, prompts for a login name and invokes the /bin/login command
ahcpd - 0.53-1 - Ahcpd is a daemon for configuring an IPv6 network using the Ad-Hoc Configuration Protocol (AHCP).  AHCP is designed for wireless mesh networks, where IPv6 autoconfiguration and DHCPv6 do not work, but may also be used on wired networks.
aiccu - 20070115-10 - SixXS Automatic IPv6 Connectivity Client Utility
aircrack-ng - 1.1-3 - Aircrack-ng is the next generation of aircrack with new features
aircrack-ptw - 1.0.0-1 - A tool using a new method for breaking WEP Keys
airpwn - 1.3-1 - Airpwn is a framework for 802.11 (wireless) packet injection. Airpwn listens to incoming wireless packets, and if the data matches a pattern specified in the config files, custom content is injected "spoofed" from the wireless access point. From the perspective of the wireless client, airpwn becomes the server.
alive6 - 0.7-1 - Find active IPv6 hosts in the network segment
alljoyn - 14.06.00-2 - AllJoyn is a daemon and application framework for developing ad hoc peer-to-peer applications.  This includes the run-time daemon and C++ library.
alljoyn-about - 14.06.00-2 - AllJoyn About service library.
alljoyn-c - 14.06.00-2 - AllJoyn C binding.  This provides a C library for building AllJoyn programs in C.  This is just a C callable wrapper to the C++ library.
alljoyn-config - 14.06.00-1 - AllJoyn Config service library.
alljoyn-config-samples - 14.06.00-1 - Alljoyn Config service library samples.  (This is primarily for testing. The contents of this package vary according which other alljoyn packages are selected.)
alljoyn-controlpanel - 14.06.00-1 - AllJoyn ControlPanel service library.
alljoyn-controlpanel-samples - 14.06.00-1 - Alljoyn ControlPanel service library samples.  (This is primarily for testing. The contents of this package vary according which other alljoyn packages are selected.)
alljoyn-notification - 14.06.00-1 - AllJoyn Notification service library.
alljoyn-notification-samples - 14.06.00-1 - Alljoyn Notification service library samples.  (This is primarily for testing. The contents of this package vary according which other alljoyn packages are selected.)
alljoyn-onboarding - 14.06.00-1 - AllJoyn onboarding service.
alljoyn-sample_apps - 14.06.00-1 - AllJoyn services sample_apps sample applications - includes ServerSample and ACServerSample.
alljoyn-samples - 14.06.00-2 - Alljoyn samples.  (This is primarily for testing.  The contents of this package vary according which other alljoyn packages are selected.)
alljoyn-services_common - 14.06.00-1 - AllJoyn Services Common service library.
alsa-lib - 1.0.24.1-1 - This is the library package for alsa, needed by some userspace programs. You must have enabled the ALSA support in the kernel.
alsa-utils - 1.0.24.2-2 - ALSA (Advanced Linux Sound Architecture) utilities
alsa-utils-seq - 1.0.24.2-2 - ALSA sequencer utilities
alsa-utils-tests - 1.0.24.2-2 - ALSA utilities test data (adds ~1.3M to image)
amule - 2.2.6-1 - A multi-platform eMule-like ed2k client
amwall - 0.1.0-2 - PF to iptables
anyremote - 4.7.1-3 - Remote control your machine via bluetooth
aoetools - 32-1 - The aoetools are programs for users of the ATA over Ethernet (AoE) network storage protocol, a simple protocol for using storage over an ethernet LAN. The vblade program (storage target) exports a block device using AoE.
ap51-flash - r232-3 - A tool for flashing (nearly) all ap51/ap61 based routers
apache - 2.2.15-3 - The Apache Web Server is a powerful and flexible HTTP/1.1 compliant web server.  Originally designed as a replacement for the NCSA HTTP Server, it has grown to be the most popular web server on the Internet. . This package contains the Apache web server and utility programs. . Take care that you don't include apache at the moment into your image please select it only as module because busybox will override /usr/sbin/httpd. It'll be solved soon. If you need to include this package in the image anyway, remove httpd from busybox (Base system --> Configuration --> Networking Utilities --> httpd). Also you should take care for the initscripts, apache's httpd isn't compatible with the one from busybox, so if you want to use apache for running your webif, you'll need to change the parameters in the scripts and configure the rest in /etc/httpd.conf.
apcupsd - 3.14.7-2 - UPS control software
apf - 0.8.4-2 - Active port forwarder
aprx - 2.00_r421-3 - This daemon listens for traffic on the specified serial interfaces. It then forwards appropriate packets to APRS-IS servers.
argtable - 2.13-1 - Argtable is an ANSI C library for parsing GNU style command line options with a minimum of fuss.	It enables a program's command line syntax to be defined in the source code as an array of argtable structs. The command line is then parsed according to that specification and the resulting values are returned in those same structs where they are accessible to the main program. Both tagged (-v, --verbose, --foo=bar) and untagged arguments are supported, as are multiple instances of each argument.
aria2 - 1.15.1-1 - aria2 is a lightweight multi-protocol & multi-source command-line download utility
arpd - 0.2-2 - A daemon to fake ARP replies
arptables - 0.0.3-4-1 - ARP firewalling software
arpwatch - 2.1a15-3 - Ethernet monitor program for keeping track of ethernet/ip address pairings.
asterisk18 - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware.
asterisk18-app-authenticate - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support support for executing arbitrary authenticate commands in Asterisk.
asterisk18-app-disa - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support Direct Inward System Access in Asterisk.
asterisk18-app-setcallerid - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support support for setting callerid in Asterisk.
asterisk18-app-system - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support support for executing system commands in Asterisk.
asterisk18-chan-gtalk - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides the channel chan_gtalk and res_jabber for GTalk support to Asterisk.
asterisk18-codec-a-mu - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support translation between alaw and ulaw codecs in Asterisk.
asterisk18-codec-alaw - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support translation between signed linear and alaw codecs in Asterisk.
asterisk18-func-cut - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support CUT function in Asterisk.
asterisk18-res-clioriginate - 1.8.10.1-2 - Asterisk is a complete PBX in software. It provides all of the features you would expect from a PBX and more. Asterisk does voice over IP in three protocols, and can interoperate with almost all standards-based telephony equipment using relatively inexpensive hardware. This package provides support Originate calls via the CLI in Asterisk.
atftp - 0.7-1 - TFTP client
atftpd - 0.7-1 - TFTP server
autossh - 1.4b-6 - Autossh client
avahi-autoipd - 0.6.31-5 - Avahi is an mDNS/DNS-SD (aka RendezVous/Bonjour/ZeroConf) implementation (library). It facilitates  service discovery on a local network -- this means that  you can plug your laptop or computer into a network and instantly be able to view other people who you can chat with,  find printers to print to or find files being shared. This kind of technology is already found in MacOS X (branded 'Rendezvous', 'Bonjour' and sometimes 'ZeroConf') and is very convenient. . This package implements IPv4LL, "Dynamic Configuration of IPv4 Link-Local  Addresses" (IETF RFC3927), a protocol for automatic IP address configuration  from the link-local 169.254.0.0/16 range without the need for a central  server. It is primarily intended to be used in ad-hoc networks which lack a DHCP server.
avahi-daemon - 0.6.31-5 - Avahi is an mDNS/DNS-SD (aka RendezVous/Bonjour/ZeroConf) implementation (library). It facilitates  service discovery on a local network -- this means that  you can plug your laptop or computer into a network and instantly be able to view other people who you can chat with,  find printers to print to or find files being shared. This kind of technology is already found in MacOS X (branded 'Rendezvous', 'Bonjour' and sometimes 'ZeroConf') and is very convenient. . This package contains an mDNS/DNS-SD daemon.
avahi-dnsconfd - 0.6.31-5 - Avahi is an mDNS/DNS-SD (aka RendezVous/Bonjour/ZeroConf) implementation (library). It facilitates  service discovery on a local network -- this means that  you can plug your laptop or computer into a network and instantly be able to view other people who you can chat with,  find printers to print to or find files being shared. This kind of technology is already found in MacOS X (branded 'Rendezvous', 'Bonjour' and sometimes 'ZeroConf') and is very convenient. . This package contains a Unicast DNS server from mDNS/DNS-SD configuration daemon, which may be used to configure conventional DNS servers using mDNS in a DHCP-like fashion. Especially useful on IPv6.
avahi-utils - 0.6.31-5 - Avahi is an mDNS/DNS-SD (aka RendezVous/Bonjour/ZeroConf) implementation (library). It facilitates  service discovery on a local network -- this means that  you can plug your laptop or computer into a network and instantly be able to view other people who you can chat with,  find printers to print to or find files being shared. This kind of technology is already found in MacOS X (branded 'Rendezvous', 'Bonjour' and sometimes 'ZeroConf') and is very convenient. . This packages installs the following avahi utility programs: avahi-browse, avahi-publish, avahi-resolve, avahi-set-host-name. It also automatically adds the required libavahi-client package. For more information please see the avahi documentation.
avrdude - 5.11.1-r1138-1 - AVRDUDE is a full featured program for programming Atmel's AVR CPU's.
avrusbboot - 2006-06-25-3 - AVRUSBBoot is a bootloader for the Atmel AVR controllers. It uses a firmware-only USB driver to transfer binary data from the PC to the flash of the controller. Once the AVR is flashed with the bootloader, no other ISP programmer is needed; then the microcontroller can be reprogrammed over USB.
axel - 2.4-2 - Axel tries to accelerate HTTP/FTP downloading process by using multiple connections for one file. It can use multiple mirrors for a download. Axel has no dependencies and is lightweight, so it might be useful as a wget clone on byte-critical systems.
babeld - 1.3.2-1 - Babel is a loop-avoiding distance-vector routing protocol roughly based on DSDV and AODV, but with provisions for link cost estimation and redistribution of routes from other routing protocols. While it is optimised for wireless mesh networks, Babel will also work efficiently on wired networks. It will generate between 1.2 and 2.4 times the amount of routing traffic that RIPng would generate, while never counting to infinity.
bahamut - 1.8.6-1 - Bahamut IRC server
bandwidthd - 2.0.1-4 - Bandwidthd
base-files - 118.2-r41182 - This package contains a base filesystem and system scripts for OpenWrt.
bash - 4.2-3 - Bash is an sh-compatible command language interpreter that executes commands read from the standard input or from a file. Bash also  incorporates useful features from the Korn and C shells (ksh and csh).
bash-completion - 20080705-2 - bash completion extends bashs standard completion behavior to achieve complex command lines with just a few keystrokes.
batmand - r1439-2 - B.A.T.M.A.N. layer 3 routing daemon
bc - 1.06.95-1 - bc is a language that supports arbitrary precision numbers with interactive execution of statements.
bind-check - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind administration tools (named-checkconf and named-checkzone only)
bind-client - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind dynamic DNS client
bind-dig - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind DNS excavation tool
bind-dnssec - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind administration tools (dnssec-keygen and dnssec-signzone only)
bind-host - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind simple DNS client
bind-libs - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind shared libraries
bind-rndc - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind administration tools (rndc and rndc-confgen only)
bind-server - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind DNS server
bind-tools - 9.9.2-P2-1 - bind administration tools (all)
bing - 1.3.5-0 - bing evaluates the raw bandwidth of a link (PSTN, xDSL, Cable ...)
binutils - 2.22-5 - The Binutils package contains a linker, an assembler, and other tools for handling object files
bird4 - 1.3.7-1 - BIRD is an internet routing daemon which manages TCP/IP routing tables with support of modern routing protocols, easy to use configuration interface and powerful route filtering language. It is lightweight and efficient and therefore appropriate for small embedded routers.  This is IPv4 version of BIRD, it supports OSPFv2, RIPv2 and BGP protocols.  In BGP, BIRD supports communities, multiprotocol extensions, MD5 authentication, 32bit AS numbers and could act as a route server or a route reflector. BIRD also supports multiple RIBs, multiple kernel routing tables and redistribution between the protocols with a powerful configuration syntax. 
bird6 - 1.3.7-1 - BIRD is an internet routing daemon which manages TCP/IP routing tables with support of modern routing protocols, easy to use configuration interface and powerful route filtering language. It is lightweight and efficient and therefore appropriate for small embedded routers.  This is IPv6 version of BIRD, it supports OSPFv3, RIPng and BGP protocols.  In BGP, BIRD supports communities, multiprotocol extensions, MD5 authentication, 32bit AS numbers and could act as a route server or a route reflector. BIRD also supports multiple RIBs, multiple kernel routing tables and redistribution between the protocols with a powerful configuration syntax. 
birdc4 - 1.3.7-1 - BIRD is an internet routing daemon which manages TCP/IP routing tables with support of modern routing protocols, easy to use configuration interface and powerful route filtering language. It is lightweight and efficient and therefore appropriate for small embedded routers.  This is a BIRD command-line client. It is used to send commands to BIRD, commands can perform simple actions such as enabling/disabling of protocols, telling BIRD to show various information, telling it to show a routing table filtered by a filter, or asking BIRD to reconfigure.  Unless you can't afford dependency on ncurses and readline, you should install BIRD command-line client together with BIRD. 
birdc6 - 1.3.7-1 - BIRD is an internet routing daemon which manages TCP/IP routing tables with support of modern routing protocols, easy to use configuration interface and powerful route filtering language. It is lightweight and efficient and therefore appropriate for small embedded routers.  This is a BIRD command-line client. It is used to send commands to BIRD, commands can perform simple actions such as enabling/disabling of protocols, telling BIRD to show various information, telling it to show a routing table filtered by a filter, or asking BIRD to reconfigure.  Unless you can't afford dependency on ncurses and readline, you should install BIRD command-line client together with BIRD. 
bitchx - 1.1-1 - popular IRC client
bitlbee - 1.0.1-2 - IRC gateway to IM chat networks
blkid - 2.21.2-1 - The blkid program is the command-line interface to working with the libblkid library.
block-mount - 0.2.0-9 - Scripts used to mount and check block devices (filesystems and swap), as well as hotplug scripts to automount and check block devices when hotplug event (e.g. from plugging in a device) occurs. Also includes preinit scripts for mounting a block device as the root filesystem. This allows one to have the root filesystem on devices other than the built in flash device.
bluelog - 1.0.4-1 - Bluelog is a simple Bluetooth scanner designed to tell you how many discoverable devices there are in an area as quickly as possible. It is intended to be used as a site survey tool, identifying the number of possible Bluetooth targets there are in the surrounding environment.
bluez-hcidump - 1.42-2 - Bluetooth packet analyzer
bluez-libs - 3.36-3 - Bluetooth library
bluez-utils - 3.36-12 - Bluetooth utilities
bmon - 2.1.0-1 - bmon is a portable bandwidth monitor and rate estimator running on various  operating systems. It supports various  input methods for different architectures.
boblight-client - 412-1 - Its main purpose is to create light effects from an external input, such as a video stream (desktop capture, video player, tv card), an audio stream (jack, alsa), or user input (lirc, http). Currently it only handles video input by desktop capture with xlib, video capture from v4l/v4l2 devices and user input from the commandline with boblight-constant.  Boblight uses a client/server model, where clients are responsible for translating an external input to light data, and boblightd is responsible for translating the light data into commands for external light controllers.  This package contains the boblight constant color client.
boblight-daemon - 412-1 - Its main purpose is to create light effects from an external input, such as a video stream (desktop capture, video player, tv card), an audio stream (jack, alsa), or user input (lirc, http). Currently it only handles video input by desktop capture with xlib, video capture from v4l/v4l2 devices and user input from the commandline with boblight-constant.  Boblight uses a client/server model, where clients are responsible for translating an external input to light data, and boblightd is responsible for translating the light data into commands for external light controllers.  This package contains the boblight daemon.
bonniexx - 1.96-1 - Bonnie++ is a benchmark suite that is aimed at performing a number of simple tests of hard drive and file system performance.
boxbackup - 0.11.1-2 - Secure network backup
bsdiff - 4.3-1 - bsdiff and bspatch are tools for building and applying patches to binary files. By using suffix sorting (specifically, Larsson and Sadakane's qsufsort) and taking advantage of how executable files change, bsdiff routinely produces binary patches 50-80% smaller than those produced by Xdelta, and 15% smaller than those produced by .RTPatch (a 750/seat commercial patch tool).
btpd - 0.16-2 - BTPD is a bittorrent client consisting of a daemon and client commands, which can be used to read and/or manipulate the daemon state. The daemon is capable of running several torrents simultaneously and only uses one tcp port. It's fairly low on resource usage and should be perfect for file distribution sites. Efficient downloads and ease of use makes this client a good choice for the casual user as well.
btrfs-progs - 0.19-1 - Btrfs is a new copy on write filesystem for Linux aimed at implementing advanced features while focusing on fault tolerance, repair and easy administration. Initially developed by Oracle, Btrfs is licensed under the GPL and open for contribution from anyone. 
busybox - 1.19.4-6 - The Swiss Army Knife of embedded Linux. It slices, it dices, it makes Julian Fries.
bwm - 1.1.0-2 - A very tiny bandwidth monitor
bwping - 1.4-1 - BWPing is a bandwidth measurement tool based on ICMP echo request/reply.  It is especially well suited for lossy links. BWPing does not not require any special software on the remote host (only the ability to respond on ICMP echo request messages).
byobu - 3.6 - Byobu is a Japanese term for decorative, multi-panel screens that serve as folding room dividers. As an open source project, Byobu is an elegant enhancement of the otherwise functional, plain, practical GNU Screen. Byobu includes an enhanced profile and configuration utilities for the GNU screen window manager, such as toggle-able system status notifications.
bzip2 - 1.0.6-2 - bzip2 is a freely available, patent free, high-quality data compressor. This package provides the binary.
cal - 2.21.2-1 - cal displays a simple calendar
calcurse - 2.8-1 - Fullscreen curses based calendar.
calvaria - 1 - Calvaria - Maemo CAL partition variable access tool The CAL partition (/dev/mtdblock1) is used to store configuration and calibration data.
cbtt - 20060727-2 - Bittorrent tracker
cbtt-mysql - 20060727-2 - Bittorrent tracker (with mysql support)
ccid - 1.4.5-1 - Generic USB CCID (Chip/Smart Card Interface Devices) driver and ICCD (Integrated Circuit(s) Card Devices).
ccrypt - 1.9-2 - ccrypt is a utility for encrypting and decrypting files and streams
cdp-tools - 20070302-1 - CDP tools (CISCO)
cdparanoia - 10.2-1 - Cdparanoia
certtool - 2.8.6-2 - GnuTLS is a project that aims to develop a library which provides a secure layer, over a reliable transport layer. Currently the GnuTLS library implements the SSL 3.0, TLS 1.0, and TLS 1.1 protocols. This package contains the GnuTLS certtool utility.
cfdisk - 2.21.2-1 - cfdisk is a curses-based program for partitioning any hard disk drive
cgilib - 0.7-1 - Simple CGI Library
chaosvpn - 2.0-3 - Configure tincd for the chaosvpn network
chat - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains an utility to establish conversation with other PPP servers (via a modem).
chillispot - 1.1.0-4 - ChilliSpot is an open source captive portal or wireless LAN access point controller. It is used for authenticating users  of a wireless LAN. It supports web based login which is today's  standard for public HotSpots and it supports Wireless Protected  Access (WPA) which is the standard of the future. Authentication,  authorization and accounting (AAA) is handled by your favorite  radius server.
chrony - 1.26-2 - A NTP implementation that has been specifically written to work well in the case of an intermittent (e.g. dial-on-demand) connection to the network where your NTP servers are.
cifsmount - 5.4-1 - CIFS mount utilities
cksfv - 1.3.14-1 - cksfv is a tool for verifying CRC32 checksums.
classpath - 0.98-4 - GNU Classpath
clearsilver - 0.10.5-5 - Clearsilver is a fast, powerful, and language-neutral HTML template system. In both static content sites and dynamic HTML applications, it provides a separation between presentation code and application logic which makes working with your project easier.
clish - 0.7.3-1 - A modular framework for implementing a CISCO-like CLI on a *NIX system. Arbitary command menus and actions can be defined using XML files. This software handles the user interaction, and forks the appropriate system commands to perform any actions.
cmdftp - 0.9.7-1 - Features include passive mode for all data transfers, shell like transparent syntax for local and remote modes, multiple and recursive file transfers using wildcards, recursive copy and move commands, remote and local text file viewing and editing, network errors detection and resuming of currently executing command, partial download resuming (if server accepts REST command), tab completion for both local and remote names, autologin using classic ~/.netrc approach, large file support.  cmdftp is aimed at being small and simple.
cmdpad - 0.0.3-3 - cmdpad - execute commands when a key is pressed, released or hold down. Should be started from /etc/rc or /etc/rc.local. To run it as deamon you  need to start it with '&'. All logs are printed to standard out and standard  error (to write the log to disk use cmdpad > /var/log/cmdpad). Cmdpad  searches for /etc/cmdpad.conf and load the key bindings. Then wait for  key event and check each command to see if it should be run.
cmus - 2.4.0-1 - C* Music Player is a modular and very configurable ncurses-based audio player. It has some interesting features like configurable colorscheme, mp3 and ogg streaming, it can be controlled with an UNIX socket, filters, album/artists sorting and a vi-like configuration interface.
collectd - 4.10.7-2 - collectd is a small daemon which collects system information periodically and provides mechanismns to store the values in a variety of ways.
collectd-mod-interface - 4.10.7-2 - network interfaces input plugin
collectd-mod-iwinfo - 4.10.7-2 - libiwinfo wireless statistics plugin
collectd-mod-load - 4.10.7-2 - system load input plugin
collectd-mod-rrdtool - 4.10.7-2 - RRDtool output plugin
comgt - 0.32-21 - comgt is a scripting language interpreter useful for establishing communications on serial lines and through PCMCIA modems as well as GPRS  and 3G datacards.
community-profiles - 1 - These community profiles set defaults for various free network/freifunk communities and are used by wizards like ffwizard and meshwizard.
confuse - 2.6-2 - libConfuse is a configuration file parser library, licensed under the terms of the ISC license, and written in C. It supports sections and (lists of) values (strings, integers, floats, booleans or other sections), as well as some other features (such as single/double-quoted strings, environment variable expansion, functions and nested include statements). It makes it very easy to add configuration file capability to a program using a simple API.  The goal of libConfuse is not to be the configuration file parser library with a gazillion of features. Instead, it aims to be easy to use and quick to integrate with your code. libConfuse was called libcfg before, but was changed to not confuse with other similar libraries.
conntrack-tools - 1.0.0-1 - The conntrack-tools are a set of free software userspace tools for Linux that allow system administrators interact with the Connection Tracking System, which is the module that provides stateful packet inspection for iptables. The conntrack-tools are the userspace daemon conntrackd and the command line interface conntrack.
coova-chilli - 1.2.9-1 - CoovaChilli is an open source access controller for wireless LAN access points and is based on ChilliSpot. It is used for authenticating users of a wireless (or wired) LAN. It supports web based login (UAM) which is today's standard for public HotSpots and it supports Wireless Protected Access (WPA) which is the standard of the future. Authentication,	authorization and accounting (AAA) is handled by your favorite radius server.
coreutils - 8.16-1 - Full versions of standard GNU utilities. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient and smaller.
coreutils-base64 - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU base64 utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-basename - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU basename utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-cat - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU cat utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-chcon - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU chcon utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-chgrp - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU chgrp utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-chmod - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU chmod utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-chown - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU chown utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-chroot - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU chroot utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-cksum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU cksum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-comm - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU comm utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-cp - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU cp utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-csplit - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU csplit utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-cut - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU cut utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-date - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU date utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-dd - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU dd utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-dir - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU dir utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-dircolors - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU dircolors utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-dirname - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU dirname utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-du - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU du utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-echo - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU echo utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-env - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU env utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-expand - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU expand utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-expr - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU expr utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-factor - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU factor utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-false - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU false utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-fmt - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU fmt utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-fold - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU fold utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-groups - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU groups utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-head - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU head utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-hostid - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU hostid utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-id - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU id utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-install - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU install utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-join - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU join utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-kill - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU kill utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-link - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU link utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-ln - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU ln utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-logname - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU logname utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-ls - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU ls utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-md5sum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU md5sum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-mkdir - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU mkdir utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-mkfifo - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU mkfifo utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-mknod - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU mknod utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-mktemp - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU mktemp utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-mv - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU mv utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-nice - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU nice utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-nl - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU nl utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-nohup - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU nohup utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-nproc - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU nproc utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-od - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU od utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-paste - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU paste utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-pathchk - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU pathchk utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-pinky - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU pinky utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-pr - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU pr utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-printenv - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU printenv utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-printf - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU printf utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-ptx - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU ptx utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-pwd - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU pwd utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-readlink - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU readlink utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-realpath - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU realpath utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-rm - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU rm utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-rmdir - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU rmdir utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-runcon - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU runcon utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-seq - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU seq utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sha1sum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sha1sum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sha224sum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sha224sum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sha256sum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sha256sum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sha384sum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sha384sum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sha512sum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sha512sum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-shred - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU shred utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-shuf - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU shuf utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sleep - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sleep utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sort - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sort utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-split - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU split utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-stat - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU stat utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-stdbuf - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU stdbuf utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-stty - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU stty utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sum - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sum utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-sync - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU sync utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-tac - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU tac utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-tail - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU tail utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-tee - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU tee utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-test - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU test utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-timeout - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU timeout utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-touch - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU touch utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-tr - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU tr utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-true - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU true utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-truncate - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU truncate utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-tsort - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU tsort utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-tty - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU tty utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-uname - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU uname utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-unexpand - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU unexpand utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-uniq - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU uniq utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-unlink - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU unlink utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-uptime - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU uptime utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-users - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU users utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-vdir - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU vdir utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-wc - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU wc utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-who - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU who utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-whoami - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU whoami utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
coreutils-yes - 8.16-1 - Full version of standard GNU yes utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
corkscrew - 2.0-1 - Tunneling SSH through HTTP proxies.
cppunit - 1.12.1-1 - Unit Testing Library for C++
cpu-mcu-bridge - 1.4.0-1 - Bridge lets linux and arduino communicate
cpusage - 0.31 - CPUsage outputs CPU usage statistics once per second. Optionally writes CSV output (see '-o' option). Written by Fabian Schneider (TUM, TUB) in 2005. Timestamp and CSV-compliance by Florian Sesser (TUM), 2010.
crda - 1.1.2-1 - This is the Central Regulatory Domain Agent for Linux. It serves one purpose: tell Linux kernel what to enforce. In essence it is a udev helper for communication between the kernel and userspace. You only need to run this manually for debugging purposes. For manual changing of regulatory domains use iw (iw reg set) or wpa_supplicant (feature yet to be added).
crtmpserver - r726-1 - C++ RTMP Server it is a high performance streaming server able to stream (live or recorded) in the following technologies: * To and from Flash (RTMP,RTMPE, RTMPS, RTMPT, RTMPTE) * To and from embedded devices: iPhone, Android * From surveillance cameras * IP-TV using MPEG-TS and RTSP/RTCP/RTP protocols  Also, crtmpserver can be used as a high performance rendes-vous server. For example, it enables you to do: * Audio/Video conferencing * Online gaming * Online collaboration * Simple/complex chat applications
crypto-tools - 20100325-1 - OCF-Linux's crypto-tools
ctorrent - dnh3.3.2-6 - CTorrent is a BitTorrent client written in the C programming language, known to be a very robust and mature programming language, which produces fast and optimized application. This package is built with OpenSSL support.
ctorrent-nossl - dnh3.3.2-6 - CTorrent is a BitTorrent client written in the C programming language, known to be a very robust and mature programming language, which produces fast and optimized application. This package is built with builtin (Steve Reid's public-domain) SHA-1 support
curl - 7.29.0-1 - A client-side URL transfer utility
daemonlogger - 1.2.1-1 - Software Network Tap
daemontools - 0.76-1 - Daemontools is a collection of tools for managing UNIX services by DJ Bernstein.
darkice - 1.0-4 - DarkIce is a live audio streamer. It records audio from an audio interface (e.g. sound card), encodes it and sends it to a streaming server.
darkstat - 3.0.715-2 - darkstat is a packet sniffer that runs as a background process on a cable/DSL router, gathers all sorts of statistics about network usage, and serves them over HTTP.
dash - 0.5.7-1 - A small footprint, POSIX complied unix shell
dbus - 1.4.14-2 - Simple interprocess messaging system (daemon)
dbus-utils - 1.4.14-2 - Simple interprocess messaging system (utilities)
dc - 1.06.95-1 - dc is a reverse-polish desk calculator which supports unlimited precision arithmetic.
ddns-scripts - 1.0.0-21 - A highly configurable set of scripts for doing dynamic dns updates
deco - 39-1 - A clone of Norton Commander for Unix. Text-based, full featured file manager.
detect-new-ip6 - 0.7-1 - Detects new IPv6 addresses joining the network
devio - 1.2-1 - A command line program to correctly read (or write) a region of a block device. Primary use is for extracting formatted data from MTD partitions.
devmem2 - 1 - Simple program to read/write from/to any location in memory.
dfu-util - r3095-1 - Dfu-util is a program that implements the host side of the USB DFU (Universal Serial Bus Device Firmware Upgrade) protocol. This version is specifically used to flash the FIC Neo 1973 mobile phone.
dhcp-forwarder - 0.10-1 - DHCP relay agent
dhcp6-client - 1.0-1 - IPv6 DHCP client
dhcp6-server - 1.0-1 - IPv6 DHCP server
dhcpcd - 3.0.17-1 - Simple configuration: supports executions of a script when the IP address changes.
dialog - 1.1-20080819-2 - A script-interpreter which provides a set of curses widgets.
dibbler-client - 0.8.2-1 - Dibbler is a portable DHCPv6 implementation. It supports stateful (i.e. IPv6 address granting) as well as stateless (i.e. option granting) autoconfiguration for IPv6. This package contains the dibbler client.
dibbler-relay - 0.8.2-1 - Dibbler is a portable DHCPv6 implementation. It supports stateful (i.e. IPv6 address granting) as well as stateless (i.e. option granting) autoconfiguration for IPv6. This package contains the dibbler relay.
dibbler-requestor - 0.8.2-1 - Dibbler is a portable DHCPv6 implementation. It supports stateful (i.e. IPv6 address granting) as well as stateless (i.e. option granting) autoconfiguration for IPv6. This package contains the dibbler requestor.
dibbler-server - 0.8.2-1 - Dibbler is a portable DHCPv6 implementation. It supports stateful (i.e. IPv6 address granting) as well as stateless (i.e. option granting) autoconfiguration for IPv6. This package contains the dibbler server.
diffutils - 3.0-3 - The Diffutils package contains programs that show the differences between files or directories.
digitemp - 3.6.0-5 - DigiTemp is a simple to use program for reading values from 1-wire devices. Its main use is for reading temperature sensors, but it also reads counters, and understands the 1-wire hubs with devices on different branches of the network. This package is build without USB support.
digitemp-usb - 3.6.0-5 - DigiTemp is a simple to use program for reading values from 1-wire devices. Its main use is for reading temperature sensors, but it also reads counters, and understands the 1-wire hubs with devices on different branches of the network. This package is build with USB support.
dir300-flash - 0.9.9-1 - Flashes a custom firmware on the DIR-300 wireless router
dircproxy - 1.2.0-RC1-1 - An IRC proxy server
directfb - 1.4.2-1 - DirectFB is a thin library that provides hardware graphics acceleration, input device handling and abstraction, integrated windowing system with support for translucent windows and multiple display layers, not only on top of the Linux Framebuffer Device. It is a complete hardware abstraction layer with software fallbacks for every graphics operation that is not supported by the underlying hardware.
disktype - 9-1 - The purpose of disktype is to detect the content format of a disk or disk image. It knows about common file systems, partition tables, and boot codes. The program is written in C and is designed to compile on any modern Unix flavour. It is self-contained and in general works without special libraries or headers. Some system-dependant features can be used to gather additional information.
distribute - 0.6.21-1 - Distribute (fork of Setuptools) is a collection of extensions to Distutils
ditg - 2.8.0-rc1-1 - D-ITG (Distributed Internet Traffic Generator) is a platform capable to produce traffic at packet level accurately replicating appropriate stochastic processes for both IDT (Inter Departure Time) and PS (Packet Size) random variables (exponential, uniform, cauchy, normal, pareto, ...). D-ITG supports both IPv4 and IPv6 traffic generation and it is capable to generate traffic at network, transport, and application layer. We believe that D-ITG shows interesting properties when compared to other traffic generators.
djbdns-axfrdns - 1.05-7 - axfrdns is a DNS zone-transfer server. It reads a zone-transfer request in DNS-over-TCP format from its standard input and responds with locally configured information. 
djbdns-base - 1.05-7 - The shared config file for the djbdns daemons.
djbdns-dnscache - 1.05-7 - dnscache is a DNS cache. It accepts recursive DNS queries from local clients such as web browsers and mail transfer agents. It collects responses from remote DNS servers. It caches the responses to save time later. 
djbdns-rbldns - 1.05-7 - rbldns is an IP-address-listing DNS server. It accepts iterative DNS queries from hosts around the Internet asking about various IP addresses. It provides responses showing whether the addresses are on a locally configured list, such as RBL or DUL. 
djbdns-tinydns - 1.05-7 - tinydns is a DNS server. It accepts iterative DNS queries from hosts around the Internet and responds with locally configured information. 
djbdns-tools - 1.05-7 - Several command-line DNS client utilities and DNS debugging tools.
djbdns-walldns - 1.05-7 - walldns is a reverse DNS wall. It accepts iterative DNS queries for in-addr.arpa domains from hosts around the Internet and supplies generic responses that avoid revealing local host information. 
dns2tcp - 0.5.2-1 - TCP over DNS tunnel (client)
dns2tcpd - 0.5.2-1 - TCP over DNS tunnel (server)
dnsmasq - 2.66-2 - It is intended to provide coupled DNS and DHCP service to a LAN.
dnsmasq-dhcpv6 - 2.66-2 - It is intended to provide coupled DNS and DHCP service to a LAN.  This is a variant with DHCPv6 support
dos-new-ip6 - 0.7-1 - Prevents new IPv6 interfaces to come up by spoofing DAD
dosfsck - 3.0.12-1 - Utilities to create and check MS-DOS FAT filesystems. (fsck.vfat and fsck.msdos for checking integrity of FAT volumes)
dosfslabel - 3.0.12-1 - Utilities to create and check MS-DOS FAT filesystems. (dosfslabel for reading and writing labels of FAT volumes)
drill - 1.6.13-1 - drill is a tool to designed to get all sorts of information out of the DNS. It is specificly designed to be used with DNSSEC.
dropbear - 2011.54-2 - A small SSH2 server/client designed for small memory environments.
dropbearconvert - 2011.54-2 - Utility for converting SSH keys
ds-lite - 1-1 - Provides support for Dual-Stack Lite in /etc/config/network. Refer to http://wiki.openwrt.org/doc/uci/network for configuration details.
dstat - 0.7.2-1 - Dstat is a versatile replacement for vmstat, iostat, netstat and ifstat. Dstat overcomes some of their limitations and adds some extra features, more counters and flexibility. Dstat is handy for monitoring systems during performance tuning tests, benchmarks or troubleshooting.
dt - 15.14-1 - dt is a generic data test program used to verify proper operation of peripherals, file systems, device drivers, or any data stream supported by the operating system. In its' simplest mode of operation, dt writes and then verifys its' default data pattern, then displays performance statisics and other test parameters before exiting. Since verification of data is performed, dt can be thought of as a generic diagnostic tool.
dtach - 0.8-1 - dtach is a tiny program that emulates the detach feature of screen, allowing you to run a program in an environment that is protected from the controlling terminal and attach to it later. dtach does not keep track of the contents of the screen, and thus works best with programs that know how to redraw themselves. 
dudders - 1.04-3 - Dudders is a utility for updating DNS records.  It points a domain name to a given IP address, using the RFC2136 DNS UPDATE protocol and a SIG(0) signature.  It is designed with embedded systems in mind.  You must have either libopenssl or libgcrypt installed to use this package.
e169-stats - 0.6-1 - Huawei E169 statistics, works with other Huawei's devices.
e2fsprogs - 1.42.4-1 - This package contains essential ext2 filesystem utilities which consists of e2fsck, mke2fs, tune2fs, and most of the other core ext2 filesystem utilities.
ebtables - 2.0.10-4-1 - The ebtables program is a filtering tool for a bridging firewall. The filtering is focussed on the Link Layer Ethernet frame fields. Apart from filtering, it also gives the ability to alter the Ethernet MAC addresses and implement a brouter.
ebtables-utils - 2.0.10-4-1 - The ebtables program is a filtering tool for a bridging firewall. The filtering is focussed on the Link Layer Ethernet frame fields. Apart from filtering, it also gives the ability to alter the Ethernet MAC addresses and implement a brouter.
eggdrop - 1.6.17-1 - EggDrop IRC BOT
ekg - 1.7-2 - Eksperymentalny Klient Gadu-Gadu (Polish IM)
elinks - 0.11.7-1 - An advanced text based web browser
empcd - 2008.02.16-1 - This is EMPCd which can use /dev/input/event0 or other event devices to control MPD (Music Player Daemon), directly using libmpdclient and other programs, currently using system(2).
empty - 0.6.18b-1 - empty is an utility that provides an interface to execute and/or interact with processes under pseudo-terminal sessions (PTYs). This tool is definitely useful in programming of shell scripts designed to communicate with interactive programs like telnet, ssh, ftp, etc. In some cases, empty can be the simplest replacement for TCL/expect or other similar programming tools.
erlang - R15B01-4 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This package contains the runtime implementation and a minimal set of  modules (erts, kernel, sasl & stdlib).
erlang-asn1 - 1.6.19 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides Abstract Syntax Notation One (ASN.1)  support.
erlang-compiler - 4.8 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides a byte code compiler for Erlang which  produces highly compact code.
erlang-crypto - 2.1 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides functions for computation of message  digests, and encryption and decryption functions.
erlang-hipe - 3.9 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides HiPE (High Performance Erlang)  support.
erlang-inets - 5.8 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides a container for Internet clients and  servers. Currently a FTP client, a HTTP client and server, and a tftp  client and server have been incorporated in Inets.
erlang-mnesia - 4.6 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides a distributed DataBase Management  System (DBMS), appropriate for telecommunications applications and  other Erlang applications which require continuous operation and  exhibit soft real-time properties.
erlang-runtime-tools - 1.8.7 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides low footprint tracing/debugging tools  suitable for inclusion in a production system.
erlang-snmp - 4.21.4 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides Simple Network Management Protocol  (SNMP) support including a MIB compiler and tools for creating SNMP  agents.
erlang-ssh - 2.0.9 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides an implementation of the Secure Shell  protocol, with SSH & SFTP support.
erlang-ssl - 5.0 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides support for secure communication over  sockets. 
erlang-syntax-tools - 1.6.7.2 - Erlang/OTP is a general-purpose programming language and runtime environment. Erlang has built-in support for concurrency, distribution  and fault tolerance. . This Erlang/OTP package provides support for handling abstract Erlang  syntax trees.
etherwake - 1.09-3 - You can wake up WOL compliant Computers which have been powered down to sleep mode or start WOL compliant Computers with a BIOS feature. WOL is an abbreviation for Wake-on-LAN. It is a standard that allows you  to turn on a computer from another location over a network connection. ether-wake also supports WOL passwords.
ethtool - 3.4.1-1 - ethtool is a small utility for examining and tuning your ethernet-based network interface
ettercap - NG-0.7.3-2 - It features sniffing of live connections, content filtering on the fly and many other interesting tricks.  It supports active and passive dissection of many protocols (even  ciphered ones) and includes many feature for network and host analysis.
event_test - 0.01-1 - This package contains an utility for testing event devices.
ez-ipupdate - 3.0.11b8-7 - Dynamic DNS services client
faad2 - 2.7-1 - FAAD2 is the fastest ISO AAC audio decoder available. FAAD2 correctly decodes all MPEG-4 and MPEG-2 MAIN, LOW, LTP, LD and ER object type AAC files. This package contains a binary to play AAC or MP4 files.
faifa - 2012-09-13 - Faifa can configure any Intellon-based Power Line Communication device using Intellon INT5000 and INT6000 series chips (6000 and 6300 chips). It supports all Intellon-specific management and control frames as well as standard management frames.
fake_advertise6 - 0.7-1 - Advertise arbitary IPv6 addresses
fake_mipv6 - 0.7-1 - Spoof MIPv6 updates to redirect packets directed at the home-address
fake_mld6 - 0.7-1 - Advertise local host in arbitary multicast groups
fake_router6 - 0.7-1 - Send Router Advertisements and try to become the default router
fakeidentd - 2.6-1 - A static secure identd, only one source file.
fancontroled - 0.1-2 - fancontroled is linux daemon written in C implementing a temperature dependent fan speed control.
fbtest - 1 - Frame buffer device testing tool
fcgi - 2.4.0-1 - FastCGI is a language independent, scalable, open extension to CGI that provides high performance without the limitations of server specific APIs.
fconfig - 20080329-1 - displays and (if writable) also edits the RedBoot configuration.
fdisk - 2.21.2-1 - a menu-driven program for creation and manipulation of partition tables
fetchmail - 6.3.20-1 - Retrieves remote mail via POP/IMAP. Very useful in conjunction with mutt. This package is built with SSL support.
fetchmail-nossl - 6.3.20-1 - Retrieves remote mail via POP/IMAP. Very useful in conjunction with mutt. This package is built without SSL support.
ffmpeg - 0.8.7-2 - FFmpeg is a a software package that can record, convert and stream digital audio and video in numerous formats. . This package contains the FFmpeg command line tool.
ffprobe - 0.8.7-2 - FFmpeg is a a software package that can record, convert and stream digital audio and video in numerous formats. . This package contains the FFprobe command line tool.
ffserver - 0.8.7-2 - FFmpeg is a a software package that can record, convert and stream digital audio and video in numerous formats. . This package contains the FFmpeg streaming server.
file - 5.11-1 - utility
findfs - 2.21.2-1 - findfs will search the disks in the system looking for a filesystem which has a label matching label or a UUID equal to uuid
firewall - 2013-06-29 - This package provides a config-compatible C implementation of the UCI firewall.
flite - 1.4-release-2 - Festival Lite is a stripped down version of Festival, the well-developed text-to-speech program written in C++. This program is written in C to keep memory usage low.
flock - 2.21.2-1 - manages flock locks from within shell scripts or the command line
flow-tools - 0.68-1 - Flow-tools is a software package for collecting and processing NetFlow data from Cisco and Juniper routers.
fortune-mod - 1.2.1-2 - Fortune mod displays fortune cookies on demand
fowsr - 1.0-20110904-1 - fowsr is a USB Data Collector application for WH1080 compatible weather stations. Output formats includes XML, Wunderground.com and pywws.
fping - 2.4b2_to-ipv6-1 - fping is a ping(1) like program which uses the Internet Control Message Protocol (ICMP) echo request to determine if a host is up. fping is different from ping in  that you can specify any number of hosts on the command line, or specify a file  containing the lists of hosts to ping. Instead of trying one host until it timeouts  or replies, fping will send out a ping packet and move on to the next host in a  round-robin fashion. If a host replies, it is noted and removed from the list of  hosts to check. If a host does not respond within a certain time limit and/or retry  limit it will be considered unreachable.
fprobe - 1.1-1 - NetFlow probe (libpcap-based)
fprobe-ulog - 1.1-1 - A NetFlow probe obtaining packets through linux netfilter code (iptables ULOG target).
freeradius2 - 2.2.0-1 - A flexible RADIUS server (version 2)
freifunk-common - 1 - Common files and scripts that are needed to run free wireless mesh networks.
freifunk-firewall - 2 - Various firewall extensions for Freifunk. Includes NAT fixes and advanced settings.
freifunk-gwcheck - 2 - This script periodically checks if internet is available via your own gateway. If it detects that it is broken, then the defaultroute is removed from the main table and temporarilly placed in table gw-check until your internet works again. Config file is /etc/config/freifunk-gwcheck.
freifunk-mapupdate - 1 - This script updates the freifunkmap (also known as the global map, see http://map.berlin.freifunk.net) every hour. Config file is /etc/config/freifunk-mapupdate.
freifunk-p2pblock - 3 - Simple Addon for Freifunk which use iptables layer7-, ipp2p- and recent-modules to block p2p/filesharing traffic
freifunk-policyrouting - 1 - Allows you to send your own traffic via your own default gateway while sending traffic received from the mesh to a gateway in the mesh.
freifunk-watchdog - 8 - A watchdog daemon that monitors wireless interfaces to ensure the correct bssid and channel. The process will initiate a wireless restart as soon as it detects a bssid or channel mismatch.
frickin - 1.3-4 - Frickin PPTP Proxy allows a Point-to-Point Tunneling Protocol (PPTP) client to connect to a PPTP server through Network Address  Translation (NAT).
fswebcam - 20110717-1 - fswebcam is a neat and simple webcam app. It captures images from a V4L1/V4L2 compatible device or file, averages them to reduce noise and draws a caption using the GD Graphics Library which also handles compressing the image to PNG or JPEG. The resulting image is saved to a file or sent to stdio where it can be piped to something like ncftpput or scp.
ftpd-topfield - 0.7.4-3 - FTP server to export the filesystem of a connected Topfield PVR
ftplib - 3.1-1-1 - ftplib is a set of routines that implement the FTP protocol. They allow applications to create and access remote files through function calls instead of needing to fork and exec an interactive ftp client program.
fuse-utils - 2.9.0-2 - FUSE (Filesystem in UserSpacE) This package contains the FUSE utilities. - fusermount - ulockmgr_server
fwknop - 2.0-1 - Fwknop implements an authorization scheme known as Single Packet Authorization (SPA) for Linux systems running iptables.  This mechanism requires only a single encrypted and non-replayed packet to communicate various pieces of information including desired access through an iptables policy. The main application of this program is to use iptables in a default-drop stance to protect services such as SSH with an additional layer of security in order to make the exploitation of vulnerabilities (both 0-day and unpatched code) much more difficult. This package contains the fwknop client.
fwknopd - 2.0-1 - Fwknop implements an authorization scheme known as Single Packet Authorization (SPA) for Linux systems running iptables.  This mechanism requires only a single encrypted and non-replayed packet to communicate various pieces of information including desired access through an iptables policy. The main application of this program is to use iptables in a default-drop stance to protect services such as SSH with an additional layer of security in order to make the exploitation of vulnerabilities (both 0-day and unpatched code) much more difficult. This package contains the fwknop daemon.
gawk - 3.1.8-2 - GNU version of AWK.
gdb - 6.8a-4 - GDB, the GNU Project debugger, allows you to see what is going on `inside' another program while it executes -- or what another program was doing at the moment it crashed.
gdbserver - 6.8a-4 - GDBSERVER is a program that allows you to run GDB on a different machine than the one which is running the program being debugged.
genl - 3.3.0-2 - General netlink utility frontend
getopt - 2.21.2-1 - getopt is used to break up (parse) options in command lines for easy parsing by shell procedures, and to check for legal options
giflib - 4.1.6-1 - giflib is a library for reading and writing gif images. It is API and ABI compatible with libungif which was in wide use while the LZW compression algorithm was patented. 
git - 1.7.11.2-1 - Git is a free & open source, distributed version control system designed to handle everything from small to very large projects with speed and efficiency.
gkrellmd - 2.3.1-1 - Gkrellmd Listens for connections from gkrellm clients. When a gkrellm client connects to a gkrellmd server all builtin monitors collect their data from the server.
glib1 - 1.2.10-1 - GLib is a library containing many useful C routines for things such as trees, hashes, and lists.
glib2 - 2.26.1-3 - The GLib library of C routines
glibmm - 2.22.1-1 - c++ bindings for glib2
gmediaserver - 0.13.0-3 - GMediaServer is a server for UPnP media players like the Netgear MP101, Linksys WMLS11B etc. It exports one or more directories using the UPnP protocol so the mediaserver can browse through them and play audio or video files.
gnokii - 0.6.21-3 - Gnokii is a suite of programs linked against a backend library that allows communication with the phones. It currently supports the most mobile phones, all AT capable mobiles as well as Symbian phones.
gnupg - 1.4.12-1 - GnuPG is GNU's tool for secure communication and data storage. It can be used to encrypt data and to create digital signatures. It includes an advanced key management facility and is compliant with the proposed OpenPGP Internet standard as described in RFC2440. . GnuPG does not use any patented algorithms so it cannot be compatible with PGP2 because it uses IDEA (which is patented worldwide).
gnuplot - 4.6.0-2 - Gnuplot is a portable command-line driven graphing utility for linux, OS/2, MS Windows, OSX, VMS, and many other platforms.
gnutls-utils - 2.8.6-2 - GnuTLS is a project that aims to develop a library which provides a secure layer, over a reliable transport layer. Currently the GnuTLS library implements the SSL 3.0, TLS 1.0, and TLS 1.1 protocols. This package contains the GnuTLS gnutls-cli, gnutls-serv, psktool, and srptool utilities.
gphoto2 - 2.4.11-1 - For downloading and controlling digital cameras
gpsd - 3.7-1 - gpsd is a userland daemon acting as a translator between GPS and AIS receivers and their clients. gpsd listens on port 2947 for clients requesting position/time/velocity information.  The receivers are expected to generate position information in a well-known format -- as NMEA-0183 sentences, SiRF binary, Rockwell binary, Garmin binary format, or other vendor binary protocols.  gpsd takes this information from the GPS and translates it into something uniform and easier to understand for clients. This package contains the GPS daemon.
gpsd-clients - 3.7-1 - gpsd is a userland daemon acting as a translator between GPS and AIS receivers and their clients. gpsd listens on port 2947 for clients requesting position/time/velocity information.  The receivers are expected to generate position information in a well-known format -- as NMEA-0183 sentences, SiRF binary, Rockwell binary, Garmin binary format, or other vendor binary protocols.  gpsd takes this information from the GPS and translates it into something uniform and easier to understand for clients. This package contains auxiliary tools and example clients for monitoring and testing the GPS daemon.
gsm-utils - 1.0.13-1 - An implementation of the European GSM 06.10 provisional standard for full-rate speech transcoding, prI-ETS 300 036, which uses  RPE/LTP (residual pulse excitation/long term prediction) coding  at 13 kbit/s. This package contains GSM transcoding utilities.
gst-ffmpeg - 0.10.11-1 - GStreamer ffmpeg bindings
gst-mod-adpcmdec - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer adpcm decoding support plugin.
gst-mod-adpcmenc - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer adpcm encoding support plugin.
gst-mod-aiff - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer aiff support plugin.
gst-mod-alsa - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer ALSA plugin.
gst-mod-app - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer app plugin.
gst-mod-asf - 0.10.15-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer ASF demuxer plugin.
gst-mod-asfmux - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer asf muxing support plugin.
gst-mod-audioconvert - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio format conversion plugin.
gst-mod-audiofx - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio effects plugin.
gst-mod-audioparsersbad - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audioparsers support plugin.
gst-mod-audiorate - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio rate adjusting plugin.
gst-mod-audioresample - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio resampling plugin.
gst-mod-audiotestsrc - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio test plugin.
gst-mod-autoconvert - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer autoconvert support plugin.
gst-mod-autodetect - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer format auto-detection plugin.
gst-mod-bayer - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer bayer support plugin.
gst-mod-camerabin - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer camerabin support plugin.
gst-mod-cdxaparse - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer cdxaparse support plugin.
gst-mod-cutter - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio cutter plugin.
gst-mod-dataurisrc - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer dataurisrc support plugin.
gst-mod-dccp - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer dccp support plugin.
gst-mod-debug - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer debugging plugin.
gst-mod-debugutilsbad - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer debugutils support plugin.
gst-mod-decodebin - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer media decoder plugin.
gst-mod-decodebin2 - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer media decoder (v2) plugin.
gst-mod-dtmf - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer dtmf support plugin.
gst-mod-dvdspu - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer dvdspu support plugin.
gst-mod-equalizer - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio equalizer plugin.
gst-mod-festival - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer festival support plugin.
gst-mod-flac - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer FLAC codec plugin.
gst-mod-freeze - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer freeze support plugin.
gst-mod-frei0r - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer frei0r support plugin.
gst-mod-gio - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer GIO plugin.
gst-mod-h264parse - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer h264parse support plugin.
gst-mod-hdvparse - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer hdvparse support plugin.
gst-mod-icydemux - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer icy demuxer plugin.
gst-mod-id3demux - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer ID3v1/v2 demuxer plugin.
gst-mod-id3tag - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer id3tag support plugin.
gst-mod-interleave - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio interleave plugin.
gst-mod-invtelecine - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer invtelecine support plugin.
gst-mod-jpegformat - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer jpegformat support plugin.
gst-mod-lame - 0.10.15-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer MP3 encoder (using LAME) plugin.
gst-mod-legacyresample - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer legacyresample support plugin.
gst-mod-level - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio level plugin.
gst-mod-liveadder - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer liveadder support plugin.
gst-mod-mad - 0.10.15-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer MP3 decoder (using MAD) plugin.
gst-mod-mms - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mms support plugin.
gst-mod-mpeg2dec - 0.10.15-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer MPEG decoder plugin.
gst-mod-mpeg4videoparse - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mpeg4videoparse support plugin.
gst-mod-mpegdemux - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mpegdemux support plugin.
gst-mod-mpegpsmux - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mpegpsmux support plugin.
gst-mod-mpegtsmux - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mpegtsmux support plugin.
gst-mod-mpegvideoparse - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mpegvideoparse support plugin.
gst-mod-multifile - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer multiple files access plugin.
gst-mod-multipart - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer multipart stream handling plugin.
gst-mod-mve - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mve support plugin.
gst-mod-mxf - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer mxf support plugin.
gst-mod-nsf - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer nsf support plugin.
gst-mod-nuvdemux - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer nuvdemux support plugin.
gst-mod-ogg - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer Ogg plugin.
gst-mod-ossaudio - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer OSS audio support plugin.
gst-mod-pcapparse - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer pcapparse support plugin.
gst-mod-playbin - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer playback plugin.
gst-mod-pnm - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer pnm support plugin.
gst-mod-qtmux - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer qtmux support plugin.
gst-mod-rawparse - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer rawparse support plugin.
gst-mod-replaygain - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer volume normalization plugin.
gst-mod-rtp - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer RTP plugin.
gst-mod-rtpmux - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer rtpmux support plugin.
gst-mod-rtsp - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer RTSP plugin.
gst-mod-scaletempoplugin - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer scaletempo support plugin.
gst-mod-sdpelem - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer sdp support plugin.
gst-mod-segmentclip - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer segmentclip support plugin.
gst-mod-selector - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer selector support plugin.
gst-mod-siren - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer siren support plugin.
gst-mod-souphttpsrc - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer soup input plugin.
gst-mod-spectrum - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer spectrum data output plugin.
gst-mod-speed - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer speed support plugin.
gst-mod-stereo - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer stereo support plugin.
gst-mod-subenc - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer subenc support plugin.
gst-mod-tcp - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer TCP plugin.
gst-mod-theora - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer Theora plugin.
gst-mod-tta - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer tta support plugin.
gst-mod-typefindfunctions - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer 'typefind' functions plugin.
gst-mod-udp - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer UDP plugin.
gst-mod-valve - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer valve support plugin.
gst-mod-videomeasure - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer videomeasure support plugin.
gst-mod-videosignal - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer videosignal support plugin.
gst-mod-videotestsrc - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer video test plugin.
gst-mod-vmnc - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer vmnc support plugin.
gst-mod-volume - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer volume plugin.
gst-mod-vorbis - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer Vorbis plugin.
gst-mod-wavenc - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer Wav encoder plugin.
gst-mod-wavparse - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer Wav parser plugin.
gst-plugins-base - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer plugins collection (base)
gst-plugins-good - 0.10.23-1 - GStreamer plugins collection (good)
gst-plugins-ugly - 0.10.15-2 - GStreamer plugins collection (ugly)
gst-python - 0.10.13-1 - python bindings for gstreamer
gstreamer - 0.10.34-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This meta package contains only dependencies on the other GStreamer componenents.
gstreamer-utils - 0.10.34-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer utilities.
gw6c - 5.1-4 - Client to configure an IPv6 tunnel to Hexago/freenet6/go6.net's migration broker.
gzip - 1.4-3 - gzip (GNU zip) is a compression utility designed to be a replacement for compress.
hasciicam - 1.1.2-1 - Live ASCII video feeds
haserl - 0.9.27-1 - A CGI wrapper to embed shell scripts in HTML documents
haveged - 1.4-1 - Feeds the kernel entropy pool by timing CPU loops.
hd-idle - 1.04-1 - Another idle-daemon for attached hard drives
hdparm - 9.39-1 - get/set SATA/IDE device parameters
heyu - 2.9.1-1 - HEYU is a text-based console program for remotely controlling lights and appliances in the home or office.   It is made available under a free and open source license.  Heyu uses the CM11A computer interface to send and receive X10 control signals over the AC power lines to modules which can turn On, Off, or Dim attached lamps or appliances.   It can store a schedule of timed events in the CM11A memory for execution when the computer is turned off or disconnected.
horst - 3.0-1 - [horst] is a scanning and analysis tool for 802.11 wireless networks and especially IBSS (ad-hoc) mode and mesh networks (OLSR).
hostapd - 20131120-1 - This package contains a full featured IEEE 802.1x/WPA/EAP/RADIUS Authenticator.
hostapd-mini - 20131120-1 - This package contains a minimal IEEE 802.1x/WPA Authenticator (WPA-PSK only).
hostapd-utils - 20131120-1 - This package contains a command line utility to control the IEEE 802.1x/WPA/EAP/RADIUS Authenticator.
hotplug2 - 1.0-beta-4 - Hotplug2 is a trivial replacement of some of the UDev functionality in a tiny pack, intended for Linux early userspace: Init RAM FS and InitRD. This is an implementation of Hotplug2-1.0-beta
howl-autoipd - 1.0.0-4 - Howl is a cross-platform implementation of Zeroconf networking. This package contains an IPv4 Link-Local address self-assigner daemon.
howl-mdnsresponder - 1.0.0-4 - Howl is a cross-platform implementation of Zeroconf networking. This package contains an mDNS (Multicast DNS) service responder daemon.
howl-nifd - 1.0.0-4 - This package contains a network interface monitor daemon.
howl-utils - 1.0.0-4 - This package contains mDNS (Multicast DNS) client utilities.
hpavcfg - 2012-09-13 - Lightweight configuration tool, only capable of setting a local device key (NMK)
hping3 - 20051105-1 - hping is a command-line oriented TCP/IP packet assembler/analyzer. The interface is inspired to the ping(8) unix command, but hping isn't only able to send ICMP echo requests. It supports TCP, UDP, ICMP and RAW-IP protocols, has a traceroute mode, the ability to send files between a covered channel, and many other features. 
hsflowd - 1.20-1 - The Host sFlow agent exports server performance metrics using the sFlow protocol. The agent is intended to provide scalable, multi-vendor, multi-OS performance monitoring with minimal impact on the systems being monitored.
htop - 1.0.1-1 - Htop is an ncursed-based process viewer similar to top, but it allows to scroll the list vertically and horizontally to see all processes and their full command lines.
htpdate - 1.0.4-1 - The HTTP Time Protocol (HTP) is used to synchronize a computer's time with web servers as reference time source. Htpdate will synchronize your computer's time by extracting timestamps from HTTP headers found in web server responses. Htpdate can be used as a daemon, to keep your computer synchronized.
httping - 1.5.2-1 - Give it an url, and it'll show you how long it takes to connect, send a request and retrieve the reply (only the headers). Be aware that the transmission across the network also takes time! This package is built with SSL support.
httping-nossl - 1.5.2-1 - Give it an url, and it'll show you how long it takes to connect, send a request and retrieve the reply (only the headers). Be aware that the transmission across the network also takes time! This package is built without SSL support.
huaweiaktbbo - 1 - Huawei E156/E169/E220 activation tool
hwclock - 2.21.2-1 - hwclock is a tool for accessing the Hardware Clock
i2c-tools - 3.0.3-1 - This package contains an heterogeneous set of I2C tools for Linux. These tools were originally part of the lm-sensors package. Includes: - i2cdetect - i2cdump - i2cget - i2cset
icecast - 2.3.2-4 - Icecast is a streaming media server which currently supports Ogg Vorbis and MP3 audio streams. It can be used to create an Internet  radio station or a privately running jukebox and many things in  between. It is very versatile in that new formats can be added  relatively easily and supports open standards for commuincation and  interaction.
ices - 2.0.1-2 - ices is a command line source client for Icecast media streaming servers. It began as the successor of the old "shout" utility, and has since gained a lot of useful features.
id3lib - 3.8.3-2 - An ID3v1/ID3v2 tag manipulation library
ideino - 0.0.5-2 - Node.Js IDE
ifenslave - 3.3.8-1 - ifenslave is needed to add/remove interfaces to/from ethernet bond devices.
ifstat - 1.1-1 - Network interface bandwidth usage, with support for snmp targets
iftop - 0.17-2 - iftop does for network usage what top(1) does for CPU usage. It listens to network traffic on a named interface and displays a  table of current bandwidth usage by pairs of hosts. Handy for  answering the question 'why is our ADSL link so slow?'.
igmpproxy - 0.1-8 - IGMPproxy is a simple dynamic Multicast Routing Daemon using only IGMP signalling (Internet Group Management Protocol).
imagemagick - 6.7.8-1 - An image manipulation library.
imagemagick-jpeg - 6.7.8-1 - imagemagick JPEG module
imagemagick-png - 6.7.8-1 - imagemagick tools (mogrify,convert)
imagemagick-tiff - 6.7.8-1 - imagemagick TIFF module
imagemagick-tools - 6.7.8-1 - imagemagick (tools)
imapfilter - 2.2.2-1 - IMAPFilter is a mail filtering utility. It connects to remote mail servers using the Internet Message Access Protocol (IMAP), sends searching queries to the server and processes mailboxes based on the results. It can be used to delete, copy, move, flag, etc. messages residing in mailboxes at the same or different mail servers. The 4rev1 and 4 versions of the IMAP protocol are supported.  IMAPFilter uses the Lua programming language as a configuration and extension language.
imsnif - 0.04-4 - IMsnif is a simple program to log Instant Message activity on the network. It uses libpcap to capture packets and analyzes them, logging conversation, contact lists, etc.
imspector - 0.9-2 - IMSpector is an Instant Messenger proxy with monitoring and blocking, and content-filtering capabilities.
ink - 0.5.1 - A utility for reading ink levels
input-utils - 20081014-101501-2 - Utilities for the input layer of the Linux kernel
io - 1 - This tool can be used to access physical memory addresses from userspace. It can be useful to access hardware for which no device driver exists!
ip - 3.3.0-2 - Routing control utility
ip6tables - 1.4.10-5 - IPv6 firewall administration tool
ipcad - 3.7.3-3 - This daemon listens for traffic on the specified interfaces. It has the built-in RSH and NetFlow engines to allow exporting the accounting data the same way as Cisco routers do.
iperf - 2.0.5-1 - Iperf is a modern alternative for measuring TCP and UDP bandwidth performance, allowing the tuning of various parameters and characteristics. This package is built with single thread support.
iperf-mt - 2.0.5-1 - Iperf is a modern alternative for measuring TCP and UDP bandwidth performance, allowing the tuning of various parameters and characteristics. This package is built with multithread support.
ipkungfu - 0.6.1-2 - IPKungFu is an iptables-based Linux firewall. It aims to simplify the configuration of Internet connection sharing, port forwarding, and packet filtering.
ipmitool - 1.8.11-2 - IPMItool is a utility for managing and configuring devices that support the Intelligent Platform Management Interface (IPMI) version 1.5 and version 2.0 specifications.
ipsec-tools - 0.8.0-2 - IPsec management tools
ipset - 6.11-2 - IPset administration utility
iptables - 1.4.10-5 - IPv4 firewall administration tool.  Matches: - icmp - tcp - udp - comment - limit - mac - multiport  Targets: - ACCEPT - DROP - REJECT - LOG - TCPMSS  Tables: - filter - mangle 
iptables-mod-account - 1.42-3.1 - ACCOUNT iptables extension
iptables-mod-chaos - 1.42-3.1 - CHAOS iptables extension
iptables-mod-condition - 1.42-3.1 - Condition iptables extension
iptables-mod-conntrack-extra - 1.4.10-5 - Extra iptables extensions for connection tracking.  Matches: - connbytes - connmark - recent - helper  Targets: - CONNMARK 
iptables-mod-delude - 1.42-3.1 - DELUDE iptables extension
iptables-mod-dhcpmac - 1.42-3.1 - DHCPMAC iptables extension
iptables-mod-dnetmap - 1.42-3.1 - DNETMAP iptables extension
iptables-mod-extra - 1.4.10-5 - Other extra iptables extensions.  Matches: - condition - owner - physdev (if ebtables is enabled) - pkttype - quota 
iptables-mod-filter - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extensions for packet content inspection. Includes support for:  Matches: - layer7 - string 
iptables-mod-fuzzy - 1.42-3.1 - fuzzy iptables extension
iptables-mod-geoip - 1.42-3.1 - geoip iptables extension
iptables-mod-hashlimit - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extensions for hashlimit matching  Matches: - hashlimit 
iptables-mod-iface - 1.42-3.1 - iface iptables extension
iptables-mod-ipmark - 1.42-3.1 - IPMARK iptables extension
iptables-mod-ipopt - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extensions for matching/changing IP packet options.  Matches: - dscp - ecn - length - mark - statistic - tcpmss - time - unclean - hl  Targets: - DSCP - CLASSIFY - ECN - MARK - HL 
iptables-mod-ipp2p - 1.42-3.1 - IPP2P iptables extension
iptables-mod-iprange - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extensions for matching ip ranges.  Matches: - iprange 
iptables-mod-ipsec - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extensions for matching ipsec traffic.  Matches: - ah - esp - policy 
iptables-mod-ipset - 1.4.10-5 - IPset iptables extensions.  Matches: - set  Targets: - SET 
iptables-mod-ipv4options - 1.42-3.1 - ipv4options iptables extension
iptables-mod-led - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extension for triggering a LED.  Targets: - LED 
iptables-mod-length2 - 1.42-3.1 - length2 iptables extension
iptables-mod-logmark - 1.42-3.1 - LOGMARK iptables extension
iptables-mod-lscan - 1.42-3.1 - lscan iptables extension
iptables-mod-lua - 1.42-3.1 - Lua PacketScript iptables extension
iptables-mod-nat-extra - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extensions for extra NAT targets.  Targets: - MIRROR - NETMAP - REDIRECT
iptables-mod-psd - 1.42-3.1 - psd iptables extension
iptables-mod-quota2 - 1.42-3.1 - quota2 iptables extension
iptables-mod-rawnat - 1.42-3.1 - RAWNAT iptables extension
iptables-mod-steal - 1.42-3.1 - STEAL iptables extension
iptables-mod-sysrq - 1.42-3.1 - SYSRQ iptables extension
iptables-mod-tarpit - 1.42-3.1 - TARPIT iptables extension
iptables-mod-tee - 1.4.10-5 - TEE iptables extensions.  Targets: - TEE 
iptables-mod-tproxy - 1.4.10-5 - Transparent proxy iptables extensions.  Matches: - socket  Targets: - TPROXY 
iptables-mod-u32 - 1.4.10-5 - U32 iptables extensions.  Matches: - u32 
iptables-mod-ulog - 1.4.10-5 - iptables extensions for user-space packet logging.  Targets: - ULOG 
iptables-snmp - 0.1-1 - This is a plugin that makes iptables rules accessable from snmpd.
iptaccount - 1.42-3.1 - iptables-mod-account control utility
iptraf - 3.0.1-2 - IPTraf is a console-based network statistics utility for Linux. It gathers a variety of figures such as TCP connection packet and byte counts, interface statistics and activity indicators, TCP/UDP traffic breakdowns, and LAN station packet and byte counts.
ipupdate - 1.1.1-2 - Lightweight remote DNS update-daemon which implements RFC 2136 dynamic updates. Compatible with BIND, Simple DNS, and Microsoft DNS Server.
iputils-arping - 20101006-1 - Program arping from iputils. Sends ARP REQUEST to a neighbour host.
iputils-clockdiff - 20101006-1 - Program clockdiff from iputils. Measures clock difference between hosts.
iputils-ping - 20101006-1 - Program ping from iputils. Sends ICMP ECHO_REQUEST to network hosts (IPv4).
iputils-ping6 - 20101006-1 - Program ping6 from iputils. Sends ICMP ECHO_REQUEST to network hosts (IPv6).
iputils-tftpd - 20101006-1 - Program tftpd from iputils Trivial File Transfer Protocol server.
iputils-tracepath - 20101006-1 - Program tracepath from iputils. Traces path to a network host discovering MTU along this path (IPv4).
iputils-tracepath6 - 20101006-1 - Program tracepath6 from iputils. Traces path to a network host discovering MTU along this path (IPv6).
iputils-traceroute6 - 20101006-1 - Program traceroute6 from iputils. Traces path to a network host (IPv6).
ipv6-support - 2013-05-27.1-1 - This package provides basic IPv6 support including Router Discovery, DHCPv6 (client & server), prefix delegation and distribution.
ipv6calc - 0.93.1-1 - ipv6calc is a small utility written in programming languate C to manipulate (not only) IPv6 addresses. Intentions were convering a given IPv6 address into compressed format, convering a given IPv6 address into the same format like shown in /proc/net/if_inet6 and (because it was not difficulty) migrating the Perl program ip6_int into. Now only one utiltity is needed to do a lot. This package contains an ipv6calc with the internal databases enabled.
ipv6calc-mini - 0.93.1-1 - ipv6calc is a small utility written in programming languate C to manipulate (not only) IPv6 addresses. Intentions were convering a given IPv6 address into compressed format, convering a given IPv6 address into the same format like shown in /proc/net/if_inet6 and (because it was not difficulty) migrating the Perl program ip6_int into. Now only one utiltity is needed to do a lot. This package contains an ipv6calc with the internal databases disabled.
ipv6log - 0.93.1-1 - ipv6calc is a small utility written in programming languate C to manipulate (not only) IPv6 addresses. Intentions were convering a given IPv6 address into compressed format, convering a given IPv6 address into the same format like shown in /proc/net/if_inet6 and (because it was not difficulty) migrating the Perl program ip6_int into. Now only one utiltity is needed to do a lot. This package contains webserver log anonymization, conversion, and statistics helper programs with the internal databases enabled.
ipv6log-mini - 0.93.1-1 - ipv6calc is a small utility written in programming languate C to manipulate (not only) IPv6 addresses. Intentions were convering a given IPv6 address into compressed format, convering a given IPv6 address into the same format like shown in /proc/net/if_inet6 and (because it was not difficulty) migrating the Perl program ip6_int into. Now only one utiltity is needed to do a lot. This package contains webserver log anonymization, conversion, and statistics helper programs with the internal databases disabled.
ipython - 0.8.2-1 - An enhanced interactive Python shell from the SciPy project
irssi - 0.8.15-2 - Irssi is a terminal based IRC client for UNIX systems. This package is built with OpenSSL support.
irssi-glib1 - 0.8.10-3 - glib1 console irc client
irssi-nossl - 0.8.15-2 - Irssi is a terminal based IRC client for UNIX systems. This package is built without OpenSSL support.
isakmpd - 20041012-1 - IPsec management tools
isc-dhcp-client-ipv4 - 4.2.4-2 - provides a means for configuring one or more network interfaces using the Dynamic Host Configuration Protocol, BOOTP protocol, or if these protocols fail, by statically assigning an address. This package is compiled with IPv4 support only.
isc-dhcp-client-ipv6 - 4.2.4-2 - provides a means for configuring one or more network interfaces using the Dynamic Host Configuration Protocol, BOOTP protocol, or if these protocols fail, by statically assigning an address. This package is compiled with IPv4 and IPv6 support.
isc-dhcp-omshell-ipv4 - 4.2.4-2 - provides an interactive way to connect to, query, and possibly change, the ISC DHCP Server's state via OMAPI, the Object Management API. This package is compiled with IPv4 support only.
isc-dhcp-omshell-ipv6 - 4.2.4-2 - provides an interactive way to connect to, query, and possibly change, the ISC DHCP Server's state via OMAPI, the Object Management API. This package is compiled with IPv4 and IPv6 support.
isc-dhcp-relay-ipv4 - 4.2.4-2 - provides a means for relaying DHCP and BOOTP requests from a subnet to which no DHCP server is directly connected to one or more DHCP servers on other subnets. This package is compiled with IPv4 and IPv6 support. This package is compiled with IPv4 support only.
isc-dhcp-relay-ipv6 - 4.2.4-2 - provides a means for relaying DHCP and BOOTP requests from a subnet to which no DHCP server is directly connected to one or more DHCP servers on other subnets. This package is compiled with IPv4 and IPv6 support.
isc-dhcp-server-ipv4 - 4.2.4-2 - implements the Dynamic Host Configuration Protocol (DHCP) and the Internet Bootstrap Protocol (BOOTP). This package is compiled with IPv4 support only.
isc-dhcp-server-ipv6 - 4.2.4-2 - implements the Dynamic Host Configuration Protocol (DHCP) and the Internet Bootstrap Protocol (BOOTP). This package is compiled with IPv4 and IPv6 support.
iw - 3.14-1 - cfg80211 interface configuration utility
iwcap - 1 - The iwcap utility receives radiotap packet data from wifi monitor interfaces and outputs it to pcap format. It gathers recived packets in a fixed ring buffer to dump them on demand which is useful for background monitoring. Alternatively the utility can stream the data to stdout to act as remote capture drone for Wireshark or similar programs.
iwinfo - 44 - Command line frontend for the wireless information library.
jamvm - 1.6.0-git-2 - JamVM is a new Java Virtual Machine which conforms to the JVM specification version (blue book). In comparison to most other VM's (free  and commercial) it is extremely small.However, unlike other small VMs  (e.g. KVM) it is designed to support the full specification, and includes  support for object finalisation, Soft/Weak/Phantom References, the Java  Native Interface (JNI) and the Reflection API.
joe - 3.7-3 - Joe is world-famous Wordstar like text editor, that also features Emacs and Pico emulation
jpeg-tools - 6b-1 - The Independent JPEG Group's JPEG manipulation tools
js - 1.6.20070208-2 - Mozilla JavaScript Engine (interpreter)
jshn - 2013-10-19-734d28eb1a46358743cf8837c91e5d46695c3b91 - Library for parsing and generating JSON from shell scripts
jsonpath - 0.52.1-1 - An XPath implementation for JSON
jtg - 1.95-1 - Jugi's Traffic Generator
kernel - 3.3.8-1-7bd8f2a09fc5988d42e3123996080110
keynote - 2.3-2 - KeyNote is a simple and flexible trust-management system designed to work well for a variety of large- and small- scale Internet-based applications. It provides a single, unified language for both local policies and  credentials.
kismet-client - 2010-07-R1-2 - An 802.11 layer2 wireless network detector, sniffer, and intrusion detection system. This package contains the kismet text interface client.
kismet-drone - 2010-07-R1-2 - An 802.11 layer2 wireless network detector, sniffer, and intrusion detection system. This package contains the kismet remote sniffing.and monitoring drone.
kismet-server - 2010-07-R1-2 - An 802.11 layer2 wireless network detector, sniffer, and intrusion detection system. This package contains the kismet server.
kissdx - r193-3 - kissdx is a PC-Link clone for KiSS media players, based for the most part on kissd (which it now replaces), with added features for media playback, management, flexibility and more.
klish - 1.5.4-1 - The klish is a framework for implementing a CISCO-like CLI on a UNIX systems. It is configurable by XML files. The KLISH stands for Kommand Line Interface Shell. The klish is a fork of clish 0.7.3 developed by Graeme McKerrell. It defines new features but it's compatible (as much as possible) with clish's XML configuration files. klish is able to run using clish XML configuration files although current clish users may expect some changes in behavior.
klish-xml-files - 1.5.4-1 - This is a set of sample XML files for klish. This specific sample set is compatible with the original clish.
kmemtrace-user - 20100102-1 - kmemtrace provides tracing for slab allocator functions, such as kmalloc, kfree, kmem_cache_alloc, kmem_cache_free etc.. Collected data is then fed to the userspace application in order to analyse allocation hotspots, internal fragmentation and so on, making it possible to see how well an allocator performs, as well as debug and profile kernel code.
kmod-8021q - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for 802.1Q VLAN support
kmod-ac97 - 3.3.8-1 - The ac97 controller
kmod-aoe - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for ATA over Ethernet
kmod-appletalk - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for AppleTalk protocol.
kmod-arptables - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for ARP firewalling
kmod-ath - 3.3.8+2014-05-22-1 - This module contains some common parts needed by Atheros Wireless drivers.
kmod-ath9k - 3.3.8+2014-05-22-1 - This module adds support for wireless adapters based on Atheros IEEE 802.11n AR5008 and AR9001 family of chipsets.
kmod-ath9k-common - 3.3.8+2014-05-22-1 - Atheros 802.11n wireless devices (common code for ath9k and ath9k_htc)
kmod-atm - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for ATM support
kmod-atmtcp - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for ATM over TCP support
kmod-ax25 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for AX25 support
kmod-block2mtd - 3.3.8-1 - Block device MTD emulation
kmod-bluetooth - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Bluetooth devices
kmod-bonding - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NIC bonding.
kmod-bridge - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for Ethernet bridging.
kmod-button-hotplug - 3.3.8-3 - Kernel module to generate button hotplug events
kmod-capi - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for basic CAPI (ISDN) support
kmod-cfg80211 - 3.3.8+2014-05-22-1 - cfg80211 is the Linux wireless LAN (802.11) configuration API.
kmod-crypto-aes - 3.3.8-1 - AES cipher CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-arc4 - 3.3.8-1 - ARC4 (RC4) cipher CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-authenc - 3.3.8-1 - Combined mode wrapper for IPsec
kmod-crypto-cbc - 3.3.8-1 - Cipher Block Chaining CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-core - 3.3.8-1 - Core CryptoAPI modules
kmod-crypto-crc32c - 3.3.8-1 - CRC32c CRC module
kmod-crypto-deflate - 3.3.8-1 - Deflate compression CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-des - 3.3.8-1 - DES/3DES cipher CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-ecb - 3.3.8-1 - Electronic CodeBook CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-hash - 3.3.8-1 - CryptoAPI hash support
kmod-crypto-hmac - 3.3.8-1 - HMAC digest CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-hw-hifn-795x - 3.3.8-1 - HIFN 795x crypto accelerator
kmod-crypto-iv - 3.3.8-1 - CryptoAPI initialization vectors
kmod-crypto-manager - 3.3.8-1 - CryptoAPI algorithm manager
kmod-crypto-md4 - 3.3.8-1 - MD4 digest CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-md5 - 3.3.8-1 - MD5 digest CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-michael-mic - 3.3.8-1 - Michael MIC keyed digest CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-misc - 3.3.8-1 - Other CryptoAPI modules
kmod-crypto-null - 3.3.8-1 - Null CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-ocf - 3.3.8-1 - OCF modules
kmod-crypto-rng - 3.3.8-1 - CryptoAPI random number generation
kmod-crypto-sha1 - 3.3.8-1 - SHA1 digest CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-test - 3.3.8-1 - Test CryptoAPI module
kmod-crypto-user - 3.3.8-1 - CryptoAPI userspace interface
kmod-crypto-wq - 3.3.8-1 - CryptoAPI work queue handling
kmod-crypto-xts - 3.3.8-1 - XTS cipher CryptoAPI module
kmod-dm - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module necessary for LVM2 support
kmod-ebtables - 3.3.8-1 - ebtables is a general, extensible frame/packet identification framework. It provides you to do Ethernet filtering/NAT/brouting on the Ethernet bridge.
kmod-eeprom-93cx6 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for EEPROM 93CX6 support
kmod-eeprom-at24 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for most I2C EEPROMs
kmod-eeprom-at25 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for most SPI EEPROMs
kmod-fs-autofs4 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for AutoFS4 support
kmod-fs-btrfs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for BTRFS support
kmod-fs-cifs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for CIFS support
kmod-fs-exportfs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for exportfs. Needed for some other modules.
kmod-fs-ext4 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for EXT4 filesystem support
kmod-fs-hfs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for HFS filesystem support
kmod-fs-hfsplus - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for HFS+ filesystem support
kmod-fs-isofs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for ISO9660 filesystem support
kmod-fs-minix - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for Minix filesystem support
kmod-fs-msdos - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for MSDOS filesystem support
kmod-fs-nfs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NFS support
kmod-fs-nfs-common - 3.3.8-1 - Common NFS filesystem modules
kmod-fs-nfsd - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NFS kernel server support
kmod-fs-ntfs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NTFS filesystem support
kmod-fs-reiserfs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for ReiserFS support
kmod-fs-udf - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for UDF filesystem support
kmod-fs-vfat - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for VFAT filesystem support
kmod-fs-xfs - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for XFS support
kmod-fuse - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for userspace filesystem support
kmod-gpio-button-hotplug - 3.3.8-1 - Simple GPIO Button Hotplug driver
kmod-gpio-dev - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module to allows control of GPIO pins using a character device.
kmod-gpiotoggling - 3.3.8+b57866441932eabc75b6c4252103121f606dc820-1 - Toggle GPIOs in kernel space
kmod-gre - 3.3.8-1 - Generic Routing Encapsulation support
kmod-hid - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for HID devices
kmod-i2c-algo-bit - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for I2C bit-banging interfaces.
kmod-i2c-algo-pca - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for I2C PCA 9564 interfaces.
kmod-i2c-algo-pcf - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for I2C PCF 8584 interfaces
kmod-i2c-core - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for I2C support
kmod-i2c-gpio - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for a very simple bitbanging I2C driver utilizing the arch-neutral GPIO API to control the SCL and SDA lines.
kmod-i2c-gpio-custom - 3.3.8-2 - Kernel module for register a custom i2c-gpio platform device.
kmod-i2c-mux - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for I2C bus multiplexing support.
kmod-i2c-mux-gpio - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for GENERIC_GPIO I2C bus mux/switching devices.
kmod-i2c-mux-pca9541 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PCA9541 I2C bus mux/switching devices.
kmod-i2c-mux-pca954x - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PCA954x I2C bus mux/switching devices.
kmod-i2c-tiny-usb - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for the I2C Tiny USB adaptor developed by Till Harbaum (http://www.harbaum.org/till/i2c_tiny_usb).
kmod-ifb - 3.3.8-1 - The Intermediate Functional Block
kmod-input-core - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for support of input device
kmod-input-evdev - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for support of input device events
kmod-input-gpio-encoder - 3.3.8-1 - GPIO rotay encoder
kmod-input-gpio-keys - 3.3.8-1 - This driver implements support for buttons connected to GPIO pins of various CPUs (and some other chips).
kmod-input-gpio-keys-polled - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for support polled GPIO keys input device
kmod-input-joydev - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for joystick support
kmod-input-polldev - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for support of polled input devices
kmod-ip6-tunnel - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPv6-in-IPv6 and IPv4-in-IPv6 tunnelling
kmod-ip6tables - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter IPv6 firewalling support
kmod-ipip - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IP-in-IP encapsulation
kmod-ipoa - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPoA (IP over ATM) support
kmod-ipsec - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPsec support in both IPv4 and IPv6. Includes: - af_key - xfrm_ipcomp - xfrm_user
kmod-ipsec4 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPsec support in IPv4. Includes: - ah4 - esp4 - ipcomp4 - xfrm4_mode_beet - xfrm4_mode_transport - xfrm4_mode_tunnel - xfrm4_tunnel
kmod-ipsec6 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPsec support in IPv6. Includes: - ah6 - esp6 - ipcomp6 - xfrm6_mode_beet - xfrm6_mode_transport - xfrm6_mode_tunnel - xfrm6_tunnel
kmod-ipt-account - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - ACCOUNT netfilter module
kmod-ipt-chaos - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - CHAOS netfilter module
kmod-ipt-compat-xtables - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - API compatibilty layer netfilter module
kmod-ipt-condition - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - Condition netfilter module
kmod-ipt-conntrack - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) kernel modules for connection tracking Includes: - conntrack - defrag - iptables_raw - NOTRACK - state
kmod-ipt-conntrack-extra - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) extra kernel modules for connection tracking Includes: - connbytes - connmark/CONNMARK - conntrack - helper - recent
kmod-ipt-core - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter core kernel modules Includes: - comment - limit - LOG - mac - multiport - REJECT - TCPMSS
kmod-ipt-delude - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - DELUDE netfilter module
kmod-ipt-dhcpmac - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - DHCPMAC netfilter module
kmod-ipt-dnetmap - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - DNETMAP netfilter module
kmod-ipt-extra - 3.3.8-1 - Other Netfilter (IPv4) kernel modules Includes: - owner - physdev (if bridge support was enabled in kernel) - pkttype - quota
kmod-ipt-filter - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) kernel modules for packet content inspection Includes: - layer7 - string
kmod-ipt-fuzzy - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - fuzzy netfilter module
kmod-ipt-geoip - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - geoip netfilter module
kmod-ipt-hashlimit - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules support for the hashlimit bucket match module
kmod-ipt-iface - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - iface netfilter module
kmod-ipt-ipmark - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - IPMARK netfilter module
kmod-ipt-ipopt - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) modules for matching/changing IP packet options Includes: - CLASSIFY - dscp/DSCP - ecn/ECN - hl/HL - length - mark/MARK - statistic - tcpmss - time - ttl/TTL - unclean
kmod-ipt-ipp2p - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - IPP2P netfilter module
kmod-ipt-iprange - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) module for matching ip ranges Includes: - iprange
kmod-ipt-ipsec - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) modules for matching IPSec packets Includes: - ah - esp - policy
kmod-ipt-ipset - 3.3.8+6.11-2 - IPset netfilter modules
kmod-ipt-ipv4options - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - ipv4options netfilter module
kmod-ipt-led - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter target to trigger a LED when a network packet is matched.
kmod-ipt-length2 - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - length2 netfilter module
kmod-ipt-logmark - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - LOGMARK netfilter module
kmod-ipt-lscan - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - lscan netfilter module
kmod-ipt-lua - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - Lua PacketScript netfilter module
kmod-ipt-nat - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) kernel modules for basic NAT targets Includes: - MASQUERADE
kmod-ipt-nat-extra - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) kernel modules for extra NAT targets Includes: - NETMAP - REDIRECT
kmod-ipt-nathelper - 3.3.8-1 - Default Netfilter (IPv4) Conntrack and NAT helpers Includes: - ftp - irc - tftp
kmod-ipt-psd - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - psd netfilter module
kmod-ipt-queue - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) module for user-space packet queueing Includes: - QUEUE
kmod-ipt-quota2 - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - quota2 netfilter module
kmod-ipt-rawnat - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - RAWNAT netfilter module
kmod-ipt-steal - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - STEAL netfilter module
kmod-ipt-sysrq - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - SYSRQ netfilter module
kmod-ipt-tarpit - 3.3.8+1.42-3.1 - TARPIT netfilter module
kmod-ipt-tee - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for TEE
kmod-ipt-tproxy - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for Transparent Proxying
kmod-ipt-u32 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for U32
kmod-ipt-ulog - 3.3.8-1 - Netfilter (IPv4) module for user-space packet logging Includes: - ULOG
kmod-iptunnel4 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPv4 tunneling
kmod-iptunnel6 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPv6 tunneling
kmod-ipv6 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPv6 support
kmod-isdn4linux - 3.3.8-1 - This driver allows you to use an ISDN adapter for networking
kmod-l2tp - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for L2TP V3 Support
kmod-l2tp-eth - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for L2TP ethernet pseudowire support for L2TPv3
kmod-l2tp-ip - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for L2TP IP encapsulation for L2TPv3
kmod-leds-gpio - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for LEDs on GPIO lines
kmod-leds-rb750 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for the LEDs on the MikroTik RouterBOARD 750.
kmod-leds-wndr3700-usb - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for the USB LED on the NETGEAR WNDR3700 board.
kmod-ledtrig-default-on - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module that allows LEDs to be initialised in the ON state.
kmod-ledtrig-gpio - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module that allows LEDs to be controlled by gpio events.
kmod-ledtrig-heartbeat - 3.3.8-1 - LED Heartbeat Trigger
kmod-ledtrig-morse - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module to show morse coded messages on LEDs.
kmod-ledtrig-netdev - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module to drive LEDs based on network activity.
kmod-ledtrig-netfilter - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module to flash LED when a particular packets passing through your machine.  For example to create an LED trigger for incoming SSH traffic: iptables -A INPUT -p tcp --dport 22 -j LED --led-trigger-id ssh --led-delay 1000 Then attach the new trigger to an LED on your system: echo netfilter-ssh > /sys/class/leds/<ledname>/trigger
kmod-ledtrig-timer - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module that allows LEDs to be controlled by a programmable timer via sysfs.
kmod-ledtrig-usbdev - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module to drive LEDs based on USB device presence/activity.
kmod-lib-cordic - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for Cordic function support
kmod-lib-crc-ccitt - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for CRC-CCITT support
kmod-lib-crc-itu-t - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for CRC ITU-T V.41 support
kmod-lib-crc16 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for CRC16 support
kmod-lib-crc32c - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for CRC32 support
kmod-lib-crc7 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for CRC7 support
kmod-lib-crc8 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for CRC8 support
kmod-lib-lzo - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for LZO compression/decompression support
kmod-lib-textsearch - 3.3.8-1 - Textsearch support
kmod-lib-zlib - 3.3.8-1 - Zlib support
kmod-libsas - 3.3.8-1 - SAS Domain Transport Attributes support.
kmod-llc - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for ANSI/IEEE 802.2 LLC support.
kmod-loop - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for loopback device support
kmod-mac80211 - 3.3.8+2014-05-22-1 - Generic IEEE 802.11 Networking Stack (mac80211)
kmod-md-linear - 3.3.8-1 - RAID "Linear" or "Append" driver module (linear.ko)
kmod-md-mod - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel RAID md module (md-mod.ko). You will need to select at least one RAID level module below.
kmod-md-multipath - 3.3.8-1 - Multipath driver module (multipath.ko)
kmod-md-raid0 - 3.3.8-1 - RAID Level 0 (Striping) driver module (raid0.ko)
kmod-md-raid1 - 3.3.8-1 - RAID Level 1 (Mirroring) driver (raid1.ko)
kmod-md-raid10 - 3.3.8-1 - RAID Level 10 (Mirroring+Striping) driver module (raid10.ko)
kmod-md-raid456 - 3.3.8-1 - RAID Level 4,5,6 kernel module (raid456.ko)  Includes the following modules required by raid456.ko: xor.ko async_tx.ko async_xor.ko async_memcpy.ko async_pq.ko async_raid5_recov.ko raid6_pq.ko 
kmod-misdn - 3.3.8-1 - Modular ISDN driver support
kmod-mmc - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for MMC/SD cards
kmod-mmc-over-gpio - 3.3.8-4 - Support for driving an MMC/SD card over GPIO pins via SPI.
kmod-mmc-spi - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for MMC/SD over SPI
kmod-mppe - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for Microsoft PPP compression/encryption
kmod-mtdtests - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for MTD subsystem/driver testing.
kmod-nand - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NAND support.
kmod-nand-ar934x - 3.3.8-1 - Atheros AR934x NAND flash controller driver.
kmod-nandsim - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NAND flash simulation.
kmod-nbd - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for network block device support
kmod-netem - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for emulating the properties of wide area networks
kmod-nf-conntrack-netlink - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules support for a netlink-based connection tracking userspace interface
kmod-nfnetlink - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules support for a netlink-based userspace interface
kmod-nfnetlink-queue - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules support for queueing packets via NFNETLINK
kmod-nls-base - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS (Native Language Support)
kmod-nls-cp1250 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS Codepage 1250 (Eastern Europe)
kmod-nls-cp1251 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS Codepage 1251 (Russian)
kmod-nls-cp437 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS Codepage 437 (United States, Canada)
kmod-nls-cp775 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS Codepage 775 (Baltic Rim)
kmod-nls-cp850 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS Codepage 850 (Europe)
kmod-nls-cp852 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS Codepage 852 (Europe)
kmod-nls-cp866 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS Codepage 866 (Cyrillic)
kmod-nls-iso8859-1 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS ISO 8859-1 (Latin 1)
kmod-nls-iso8859-13 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS ISO 8859-13 (Latin 7; Baltic)
kmod-nls-iso8859-15 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS ISO 8859-15 (Latin 9)
kmod-nls-iso8859-2 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS ISO 8859-2 (Latin 2)
kmod-nls-koi8r - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS KOI8-R (Russian)
kmod-nls-utf8 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for NLS UTF-8
kmod-openswan - 3.3.8+2.6.38-1 - Openswan is an IPsec implementation for Linux. This package contains the Openswan kernel module.
kmod-pca953x - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PCA953x I2C GPIO extenders.
kmod-pcf857x - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PCF857x I2C GPIO extenders.
kmod-pktgen - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for the Network Packet Generator
kmod-ppp - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PPP support
kmod-ppp-synctty - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PPP sync tty support
kmod-pppoa - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PPPoA (PPP over ATM) support
kmod-pppoe - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for PPPoE (PPP over Ethernet) support
kmod-pppol2tp - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for PPPoL2TP (PPP over L2TP) support
kmod-pppox - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel helper module for PPPoE and PPTP support
kmod-pptp - 3.3.8-1 - PPtP support
kmod-pwm - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module that implement a generic PWM API
kmod-pwm-gpio - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module to models a single-channel PWM device using a timer and a GPIO pin
kmod-regmap - 3.3.8-1 - Generic register map support
kmod-rfkill - 3.3.8-1 - Say Y here if you want to have control over RF switches found on many WiFi and Bluetooth cards.
kmod-rotary-gpio-custom - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for register a custom rotary-gpio-encoder platform device.
kmod-sched - 3.3.8-1 - Extra kernel schedulers modules for IP traffic
kmod-sched-connmark - 3.3.8-1 - Traffic shaper conntrack mark support
kmod-sched-core - 3.3.8-1 - Core kernel scheduler support for IP traffic
kmod-sched-esfq - 3.3.8-1 - Traffic shaper ESFQ support
kmod-scsi-cdrom - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for CD / DVD drives
kmod-scsi-core - 3.3.8-1 - SCSI device support
kmod-scsi-generic - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for SCSI generic
kmod-sctp - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for SCTP protocol support
kmod-serial-8250 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for 8250 UART based serial ports.
kmod-siit - 3.3.8+1.1-2 - Stateless IP ICMP Translation Algorithm
kmod-sit - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for IPv6-in-IPv4 tunnelling
kmod-slip - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for SLIP support
kmod-softdog - 3.3.8-1 - Software watchdog driver
kmod-sound-core - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for sound support
kmod-sound-cs5535audio - 3.3.8-1 - support for the integrated AC97 sound device on olpc
kmod-sound-i8x0 - 3.3.8-1 - support for the integrated AC97 sound device on motherboards with Intel/SiS/nVidia/AMD chipsets, or ALi chipsets using  the M5455 Audio Controller.
kmod-sound-seq - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for sequencer support
kmod-sound-soc-core - 3.3.8-1 - SoC sound support
kmod-spi-bitbang - 3.3.8-1 - This package contains the SPI bitbanging library
kmod-spi-dev - 3.3.8-1 - This package contains the user mode SPI device driver
kmod-spi-gpio - 3.3.8-1 - This package contains the GPIO-based bitbanging SPI Master
kmod-spi-gpio-old - 3.3.8-1 - This package contains the GPIO based bitbanging SPI controller driver
kmod-spi-tty-ds - 3.3.8-1 - This package contains the TTY SPI driver.
kmod-stp - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for Ethernet Spanning Tree Protocol support.
kmod-trelay - 3.3.8+0.1-1 - trelay relays ethernet packets between two devices (similar to a bridge), but without any MAC address checks. This makes it possible to bridge client mode or ad-hoc mode wifi devices to ethernet VLANs, assuming the remote end uses the same source MAC address as the device that packets are supposed to exit from.
kmod-tun - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for the TUN/TAP tunneling device
kmod-usb-acm - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB ACM devices (modems/isdn controllers)
kmod-usb-atm - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB DSL modems
kmod-usb-atm-cxacru - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for cxacru based USB ADSL modems
kmod-usb-atm-speedtouch - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for SpeedTouch USB ADSL modems
kmod-usb-atm-ueagle - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Eagle 8051 based USB ADSL modems
kmod-usb-audio - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB audio devices
kmod-usb-cm109 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for CM109 VOIP phone
kmod-usb-core - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB
kmod-usb-hid - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB HID devices such as keyboards and mice
kmod-usb-net - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for USB-to-Ethernet convertors
kmod-usb-net-asix - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for USB-to-Ethernet Asix convertors
kmod-usb-net-cdc-ether - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB CDC Ethernet devices
kmod-usb-net-dm9601-ether - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB DM9601 devices
kmod-usb-net-hso - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for Option USB High Speed Mobile Devices
kmod-usb-net-ipheth - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Apple iPhone USB Ethernet driver
kmod-usb-net-kaweth - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for USB-to-Ethernet Kaweth convertors
kmod-usb-net-mcs7830 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for USB-to-Ethernet MCS7830 convertors
kmod-usb-net-pegasus - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for USB-to-Ethernet Pegasus convertors
kmod-usb-net-rndis - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for RNDIS connections
kmod-usb-net-sierrawireless - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Sierra Wireless devices
kmod-usb-ohci - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB OHCI controllers
kmod-usb-printer - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB printers
kmod-usb-serial - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-ark3116 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for ArkMicroChips ARK3116 USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-belkin - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Belkin USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-ch341 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Winchiphead CH341 USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-cp210x - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Silicon Labs cp210x USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-cypress-m8 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for devices with Cypress M8 USB to Serial chip (for example, the Delorme Earthmate LT-20 GPS) Supported microcontrollers in the CY4601 family are: CY7C63741 CY7C63742 CY7C63743 CY7C64013
kmod-usb-serial-ftdi - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for FTDI USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-ipw - 3.3.8-1 - Support for IPWireless 3G devices
kmod-usb-serial-keyspan - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Keyspan USB-to-Serial devices
kmod-usb-serial-mct - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Magic Control Technology USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-mos7720 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Moschip MOS7720 USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-motorola-phone - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Motorola usb phone
kmod-usb-serial-option - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Option HSDPA modems
kmod-usb-serial-oti6858 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Ours Technology OTI6858 USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-pl2303 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Prolific PL2303 USB-to-Serial converters
kmod-usb-serial-qualcomm - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Qualcomm USB Serial devices (Gobi)
kmod-usb-serial-sierrawireless - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Sierra Wireless devices
kmod-usb-serial-ti-usb - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for TI USB 3410/5052 devices
kmod-usb-serial-visor - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Handspring Visor PDAs
kmod-usb-serial-wwan - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB GSM and CDMA modems
kmod-usb-storage - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB Mass Storage devices
kmod-usb-storage-extras - 3.3.8-1 - Say Y here if you want to have some more drivers, such as for SmartMedia card readers.
kmod-usb-uhci - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB UHCI controllers
kmod-usb-yealink - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for Yealink VOIP phone
kmod-usb2 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel support for USB2 (EHCI) controllers
kmod-usbip - 3.3.8-1 - USB-over-IP kernel support
kmod-usbip-client - 3.3.8-1 - USB-over-IP client driver
kmod-usbip-server - 3.3.8-1 - USB-over-IP host driver
kmod-video-core - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for Video4Linux support
kmod-video-cpia2 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for supporting CPIA2 USB based cameras.
kmod-video-gspca-core - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for supporting GSPCA based webcam devices. Note this is just the core of the driver, please select a submodule that supports your webcam.
kmod-video-pwc - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for supporting Philips USB based cameras.
kmod-video-sn9c102 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for supporting SN9C102 camera chips.
kmod-video-uvc - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules for supporting USB Video Class (UVC) devices.
kmod-video-videobuf2 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel modules that implements three basic types of media buffers.
kmod-wdt-ath79 - 3.3.8-1 - Kernel module for AR7XXX/AR9XXX watchdog timer.
kmod-wprobe - 3.3.8+1-1 - A module that exports measurement data from wireless driver to user space
knock - 0.5-1 - It listens to all traffic on an ethernet (or PPP) interface, looking for special "knock" sequences of port-hits. A client makes these port-hits by sending a TCP (or UDP) packet to a port on the server. This port need not be open -- since knockd listens at the link-layer level, it sees all traffic even if it's destined for a closed port. When the server detects a specific sequence of port-hits, it runs a command defined in its configuration file. This can be used to open up holes in a firewall for quick access. This package contains the port-knocking client.
knockd - 0.5-1 - It listens to all traffic on an ethernet (or PPP) interface, looking for special "knock" sequences of port-hits. A client makes these port-hits by sending a TCP (or UDP) packet to a port on the server. This port need not be open -- since knockd listens at the link-layer level, it sees all traffic even if it's destined for a closed port. When the server detects a specific sequence of port-hits, it runs a command defined in its configuration file. This can be used to open up holes in a firewall for quick access. This package contains the port-knocking server.
konf - 1.5.4-1 - The klish is a framework for implementing a CISCO-like CLI on a UNIX systems. It is configurable by XML files. The KLISH stands for Kommand Line Interface Shell. Konf and konfd are klish utilities that are used to store configuration informations in a way which is similar to what's found on CISCO devices. More information about these tools is to be found on the klish web site.
ksymoops - 2.4.11-1 - Interpret oops of the kernel
l2tpd - 0.70pre-4.1 - l2tpd is the open source implementation of the L2TP tunneling protocol (RFC2661). It does implement both LAC and LNS role  in a L2TP networking architecture. The main goal of this protocol is  to tunnel PPP frame trough an ip network.
l2tpns - 2.1.21-1 - l2tpns is a layer 2 tunneling protocol network server (LNS). it supports up to 65535 concurrent sessions per server/cluster plus ISP features such as rate limiting, walled garden, usage accounting, and more.
l7-protocols - 2009-05-28-1 - l7-filter classifies packets based on patterns in application layer data. This allows correct classification of P2P traffic that uses unpredictable ports as well as standard protocols running on non-standard ports.
lame - 398-2-3 - lame mp3 encoder
lame-lib - 398-2-3 - lame mp3 encoder libs
lcd4linux-custom - r1187-1 - LCD4Linux is a small program that grabs information from the kernel and some subsystems and displays it on an external liquid crystal display. . This package contains a customized version of LCD4Linux.
lcd4linux-tew673gru - 1-1 - TRENDnet TEW673GRU LCD support
ldconfig - 0.9.33.2-1 - Shared library path configuration
ldd - 0.9.33.2-1 - LDD trace utility
leafnode - 1.11.8-2 - This package contains the "leafnode", "fetchnews" and "texpire" programs and the necessary configuration files for the leafnode proxy
leafnode-extra - 1.11.8-2 - This package contains the more rarely used "checkgroups", "applyfilter" and "leafnode-version" programs from the leafnode suite
less - 444-1 - Full version of GNU less utility
less-wide - 444-1 - Full version of GNU less utility This package contains the Unicode enabled version of less.
lft - 3.32-1 - LFT, short for Layer Four Traceroute, is a sort of 'traceroute' that often works much faster (than the commonly-used Van Jacobson method) and goes through many configurations of packet-filters (firewalls). More importantly, LFT implements numerous other features including AS number lookups through several reliable sources, loose source routing, netblock name lookups, et al. This package contains the lft 'traceroute' program.
lftp - 4.3.6-2 - lftp is sophisticated file transfer program with command line interface. It supports FTP, HTTP, FISH, SFTP and FILE (local FS) protocols. GNU Readline library is used for input. BitTorrent protocol is supported as built-in `torrent' command.
libaa - 1.2-1 - Ascii-Art rendering library
libamsel - 20040621-cvs-1 - A library for amwall configuration files.
libao - 1.1.0-1 - Libao is a cross-platform audio library that allows programs to output audio using a simple API on a wide variety of platforms.
libapr - 1.4.5-2 - Apache Portable Runtime Library
libaprutil - 1.3.12-2 - Apache Portable Runtime Utility Library
libart - 2.3.21-1 - A library of functions for 2D graphics supporting a superset of the PostScript imaging model, designed to be integrated with graphics, artwork, and illustration programs. It is written in optimized C, and is fully compatible with C++. With a small footprint of 10,000 lines of code, it is especially suitable for embedded applications.
libassuan - 2.0.2-1 - The Libassuan package contains an IPC library used by some of the other GnuPG related packages. Libassuan's primary use is to allow a client to interact with a non-persistent server. Libassuan is not, however, limited to use with GnuPG servers and clients. It was designed to be flexible enough to meet the demands of many transaction based environments with non-persistent servers.
libaudiofile - 0.2.7-1 - The audiofile library allows the processing of audio data to and from audio files of many common formats (currently AIFF, AIFF-C, WAVE, NeXT/Sun, BICS,  and raw data).
libavahi - 0.6.31-5 - Avahi is an mDNS/DNS-SD (aka RendezVous/Bonjour/ZeroConf) implementation (library). It facilitates  service discovery on a local network -- this means that  you can plug your laptop or computer into a network and instantly be able to view other people who you can chat with,  find printers to print to or find files being shared. This kind of technology is already found in MacOS X (branded 'Rendezvous', 'Bonjour' and sometimes 'ZeroConf') and is very convenient. . The libavahi package contains the mDNS/DNS-SD shared libraries, used by other programs. Specifically, it provides libavahi-core and libavahi-common libraries. By default, it is built without D-Bus support, i.e. the --disable-dbus configuration flag is set. To enable D-Bus support, select the package libavahi-dbus-support.
libavahi-client - 0.6.31-5 - Avahi is an mDNS/DNS-SD (aka RendezVous/Bonjour/ZeroConf) implementation (library). It facilitates  service discovery on a local network -- this means that  you can plug your laptop or computer into a network and instantly be able to view other people who you can chat with,  find printers to print to or find files being shared. This kind of technology is already found in MacOS X (branded 'Rendezvous', 'Bonjour' and sometimes 'ZeroConf') and is very convenient. . This packages adds the libavahi-client library. It also automatically adds the required libavahi-dbus-support and the avahi-daemon packages. For more information please see the avahi documentation.
libavahi-dbus-support - 0.6.31-5 - Avahi is an mDNS/DNS-SD (aka RendezVous/Bonjour/ZeroConf) implementation (library). It facilitates  service discovery on a local network -- this means that  you can plug your laptop or computer into a network and instantly be able to view other people who you can chat with,  find printers to print to or find files being shared. This kind of technology is already found in MacOS X (branded 'Rendezvous', 'Bonjour' and sometimes 'ZeroConf') and is very convenient. . The libavahi package contains the mDNS/DNS-SD shared libraries, used by other programs. Specifically, it provides libavahi-core and libavahi-common libraries. By default, it is built without D-Bus support, i.e. the --disable-dbus configuration flag is set. To enable D-Bus support, select the package libavahi-dbus-support. . The libavahi-dbus-support package enables D-Bus support in avahi, needed to support the libavahi-client library and avahi-utils. Selecting this package modifies the build configuration so that avahi packages are built with support for D-BUS enabled; it does not generate a separate binary of its own. It also automatically adds the D-Bus package to the build. libavahi-dbus-support is selected automatically if you select libavahi-client or avahi-utils.
libblkid - 2.21.2-1 - The libblkid library is used to identify block devices (disks) as to their content (e.g. filesystem type, partitions) as well as extracting additional information such as filesystem labels/volume names, partitions, unique identifiers/serial numbers...
libblobmsg-json - 2013-10-19-734d28eb1a46358743cf8837c91e5d46695c3b91 - blobmsg <-> json conversion library
libboblight - 412-1 - Its main purpose is to create light effects from an external input, such as a video stream (desktop capture, video player, tv card), an audio stream (jack, alsa), or user input (lirc, http). Currently it only handles video input by desktop capture with xlib, video capture from v4l/v4l2 devices and user input from the commandline with boblight-constant.  Boblight uses a client/server model, where clients are responsible for translating an external input to light data, and boblightd is responsible for translating the light data into commands for external light controllers.  This package contains the libboblight shared library.
libbz2 - 1.0.6-2 - bzip2 is a freely available, patent free, high-quality data compressor. This packages provides libbz2 library.
libc - 0.9.33.2-1
libcap - 2.22-1 - Linux capabilities library
libcares - 1.7.4-1 - c-ares is a C library that performs DNS requests and name resolves asynchronously.
libcharset - 1.11.1-1 - Character set conversion library
libcli - 1.9.4-1 - Libcli provides a shared library for including a Cisco-like command-line interface into other software. It's a telnet interface which supports command-line editing, history, authentication and callbacks for a user-definable function tree.
libcom_err - 1.42.4-1 - libcom_err is a library providing common error descriptions
libcryptoxx - 5.6.0-2 - Crypto++ is library for creating C++ programs which use cryptographic algorithms
libcurl - 7.29.0-1 - A client-side URL transfer library
libcwiid - 0.6.00-2 - Linux Nintendo Wiimote interface (library)
libcyassl - 1.6.5-1 - CyaSSL is an SSL library optimized for small footprint, both on disk and for memory use.
libdaemon - 0.14-2 - libdaemon is a lightweight C library that eases the writing of UNIX daemons. It consists of the following parts: - A wrapper around fork() which does the correct daemonization procedure of a process - A wrapper around syslog() for simpler and compatible log output to Syslog or STDERR - An API for writing PID files - An API for serializing UNIX signals into a pipe for usage with select() or poll() - An API for running subprocesses with STDOUT and STDERR redirected to syslog  APIs like these are used in most daemon software available. It is not that simple to get it done right and code duplication is not a goal.
libdaq - 1.1.1-1 - Data Acquisition library for packet I/O.
libdb47 - 4.7.25.NC-6 - Berkeley DB library (4.7).
libdbi - 0.8.3-3 - libdbi implements a database-independent abstraction layer in C.
libdbus - 1.4.14-2 - Simple interprocess messaging system (library)
libdevmapper - 2.02.96-1 - The device-mapper is a component of the 2.6 linux kernel that supports logical volume management. It is required by LVM2 and EVMS.
libdlna - 0.2.3-1 - libdlna aims at being the reference open-source implementation of DLNA (Digital Living Network Alliance) standards. Its primary goal is to  provide DLNA support to uShare, an embedded DLNA & UPnP A/V Media Server,  but it will be used to build both DLNA servers and players in the long  term.
libdnet - 1.11-2 - libdnet is a library of simplified, portable interface to several low-level networking routines.
libdvdread - 0.9.7-2 - libdvdread provides a simple foundation for reading DVD video disks. It provides the functionality that is required to access many DVDs. It parses IFO files, reads NAV-blocks, and performs CSS authentication and descrambling.
libdw - 0.155-1 - ELF manipulation libraries (libdw)
libelf - 0.8.13-1 - ELF object file access library
libelf1 - 0.155-1 - ELF manipulation libraries (libelf)
libevent - 1.4.14b-2 - The libevent API provides a mechanism to execute a callback function when a specific event occurs on a file descriptor or after a timeout has been reached. Furthermore, libevent also support callbacks due to signals or regular timeouts.  libevent is meant to replace the event loop found in event driven network servers. An application just needs to call event_dispatch() and then add or remove events dynamically without having to change the event loop.
libevent2 - 2.0.19-1 - The libevent API provides a mechanism to execute a callback function when a specific event occurs on a file descriptor or after a timeout has been reached. Furthermore, libevent also support callbacks due to signals or regular timeouts.  libevent is meant to replace the event loop found in event driven network servers. An application just needs to call event_dispatch() and then add or remove events dynamically without having to change the event loop.  This package contains the libevent shared library historically containing both the core & extra libraries.
libevent2-openssl - 2.0.19-1 - The libevent API provides a mechanism to execute a callback function when a specific event occurs on a file descriptor or after a timeout has been reached. Furthermore, libevent also support callbacks due to signals or regular timeouts.  libevent is meant to replace the event loop found in event driven network servers. An application just needs to call event_dispatch() and then add or remove events dynamically without having to change the event loop.  This package contains the libevent OpenSSL shared library for encrypted bufferevents.
libeventlog - 0.2.9-2 - A new API to format and send structured log messages.
libexif - 0.6.19-1 - libexif is a library for parsing, editing, and saving EXIF data. It is intended to replace lots of redundant implementations in command-line utilities and programs with GUIs.
libexpat - 2.0.1-1 - A fast, non-validating, stream-oriented XML parsing library.
libexslt - 1.1.26-1 - A extention for XSLT.
libext2fs - 1.42.4-1 - libext2fs is a library which can access ext2, ext3 and ext4 filesystems.
libfaad2 - 2.7-1 - FAAD2 is the fastest ISO AAC audio decoder available. FAAD2 correctly decodes all MPEG-4 and MPEG-2 MAIN, LOW, LTP, LD and ER object type AAC files. This package contains the library.
libfaifa - 2012-09-13 - Faifa companion library.
libffi - 3.0.10-1 - The libffi library provides a portable, high level programming interface to various calling conventions. This allows a programmer to call any function specified by a call interface description at run-time.  FFI stands for Foreign Function Interface. A foreign function interface is the popular name for the interface that allows code written in one language to call code written in another language. The libffi library really only provides the lowest, machine dependent layer of a fully featured foreign function interface. A layer must exist above libffi that handles type conversions for values passed between the two languages.
libffmpeg-full - 0.8.7-2 - FFmpeg is a a software package that can record, convert and stream digital audio and video in numerous formats. . This package contains full-featured FFmpeg shared libraries.
libfko - 2.0-1 - Fwknop implements an authorization scheme known as Single Packet Authorization (SPA) for Linux systems running iptables.  This mechanism requires only a single encrypted and non-replayed packet to communicate various pieces of information including desired access through an iptables policy. The main application of this program is to use iptables in a default-drop stance to protect services such as SSH with an additional layer of security in order to make the exploitation of vulnerabilities (both 0-day and unpatched code) much more difficult. This package contains the libfko shared library.
libflac - 1.2.1-1 - Free Lossless Audio Codec library
libfreecwmp - 2012-09-25-54e86aecbbb32c2032f78fc4781b346ed8573e56 - CWMP library
libfreetype - 2.4.8-1 - The FreeType project is a team of volunteers who develop free, portable and high-quality software solutions for digital typography. They specifically target embedded systems and focus on bringing small,  efficient and ubiquitous products.
libftdi - 0.19-1 - libFTDI - FTDI USB driver with bitbang mode libFTDI is an open source library to talk to FTDI chips: FT232BM, FT245BM, FT2232C, FT2232H, FT4232H, FT2232D and FT245R, including the popular bitbang mode.  The library is linked with your program in userspace, no kernel driver required.
libfuse - 2.9.0-2 - FUSE (Filesystem in UserSpacE) This package contains the FUSE shared libraries, needed by other programs. - libfuse - libulockmgr
libgcc - 4.6-linaro-1 - GCC support library
libgcrypt - 1.5.0-1 - This is a general purpose cryptographic library based on the code from GnuPG. It provides functions for all cryptograhic building blocks: symmetric ciphers (AES, DES, Arcfour, CAST5), hash algorithms (MD5, SHA-1, RIPE-MD160, SHA-224/256, SHA-384/512), MACs (HMAC for all hash algorithms), public key algorithms (RSA, DSA), large integer functions, random numbers and a lot of supporting functions. Some algorithms have been disabled to reduce size (Blowfish, Twofish, Serpent, RC2, SEED, Camellia, CRC, MD4, TIGER-192, Whirlpool, ElGamal, ECC).
libgd - 2.0.35-1 - GD is an open source code library for the dynamic creation of images by programmers. GD creates PNG, JPEG and GIF images, among other formats.
libgdbm - 1.9.1-2 - GNU database manager
libgmp - 5.1.3-1 - GMP is a free library for arbitrary precision arithmetic, operating on signed integers, rational numbers, and floating point numbers.
libgnutls - 2.8.6-2 - GnuTLS is a project that aims to develop a library which provides a secure layer, over a reliable transport layer. Currently the GnuTLS library implements the SSL 3.0, TLS 1.0, and TLS 1.1 protocols. This package contains the GnuTLS shared library, needed by other programs.
libgnutls-extra - 2.8.6-2 - GnuTLS is a project that aims to develop a library which provides a secure layer, over a reliable transport layer. Currently the GnuTLS library implements the SSL 3.0, TLS 1.0, and TLS 1.1 protocols. This package contains the GnuTLS extra shared library.
libgpg-error - 1.9-1 - An helper library for common error codes and descriptions. This is a library that defines common error values for all GnuPG components. Among these are GPG, GPGSM, GPGME, GPG-Agent, libgcrypt, Libksba, DirMngr, Pinentry, SmartCard Daemon and possibly more in the future.
libgpgme - 1.3.1-1.dh1 - GPGME (GnuPG Made Easy) is a C language library that allows to add support for cryptography to a program. It is designed to make access to public key crypto engines like GnuPG or GpgSM easier for applications. GPGME provides a high-level crypto API for encryption, decryption, signing, signature verification and key management.
libgphoto2 - 2.4.12-1 - The basic library of the gphoto2 program.
libgps - 3.7-1 - gpsd is a userland daemon acting as a translator between GPS and AIS receivers and their clients. gpsd listens on port 2947 for clients requesting position/time/velocity information.  The receivers are expected to generate position information in a well-known format -- as NMEA-0183 sentences, SiRF binary, Rockwell binary, Garmin binary format, or other vendor binary protocols.  gpsd takes this information from the GPS and translates it into something uniform and easier to understand for clients. This package contains the libgps library.
libgpsd - 3.7-1 - gpsd is a userland daemon acting as a translator between GPS and AIS receivers and their clients. gpsd listens on port 2947 for clients requesting position/time/velocity information.  The receivers are expected to generate position information in a well-known format -- as NMEA-0183 sentences, SiRF binary, Rockwell binary, Garmin binary format, or other vendor binary protocols.  gpsd takes this information from the GPS and translates it into something uniform and easier to understand for clients. This package contains the libgpsd library.
libgsm - 1.0.13-1 - An implementation of the European GSM 06.10 provisional standard for full-rate speech transcoding, prI-ETS 300 036, which uses  RPE/LTP (residual pulse excitation/long term prediction) coding  at 13 kbit/s. This package contains a shared GSM transcoding library, used by other programs.
libgstapp - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer app library.
libgstaudio - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer audio library.
libgstcdda - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer CDDA library.
libgstcheck - 0.10.34-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer check unit testing library.
libgstcontroller - 0.10.34-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer dynamic parameter control library.
libgstdataprotocol - 0.10.34-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer data protocol library.
libgstfft - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer FFT library.
libgstinterfaces - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer interfaces library.
libgstnet - 0.10.34-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer network classes library.
libgstnetbuffer - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer network buffer library.
libgstpbutils - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer utils library.
libgstphotography - 0.10.19-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer photography library.
libgstreamer - 0.10.34-1 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer core library.
libgstriff - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer RIFF media library.
libgstrtp - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer RTP library.
libgstrtsp - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer RTSP library.
libgstsdp - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer SDP library.
libgsttag - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer tag support library.
libgstvideo - 0.10.29-2 - GStreamer open source multimedia framework . This package contains the GStreamer video library.
libhowl - 1.0.0-4 - Howl is a cross-platform implementation of Zeroconf networking. This package contains the Howl shared libraries, used by other programs.
libiconv - 7 - Tiny drop-in replacement for the GNU Character set conversion library
libiconv-full - 1.11.1-1 - Character set conversion library
libid3tag - 0.15.1b-3 - libid3tag is a library for reading and (eventually) writing ID3 tags, both ID3v1 and the various versions of ID3v2.
libidn - 1.18-1 - GNU Libidn is a fully documented implementation of the Stringprep, Punycode and IDNA specifications. Libidn's purpose is to encode and decode internationalized domain names.
libiksemel - 1.4-1 - Iksemel is an XML parser library mainly designed for Jabber applications. It provides SAX, DOM, and special Jabber stream APIs. Library is coded in ANSI C except the network code (which is POSIX compatible), thus highly portable.
libinklevel - 0.8.0-3 - Libinklevel is a library for checking the ink level of your printer on a system which runs Linux.
libintl-full - 0.18.1.1-2 - GNU Internationalization library
libip4tc - 1.4.10-5 - IPv4 firewall - shared libiptc library
libip6tc - 1.4.10-5 - IPv6 firewall - shared libiptc library
libipq - 1.4.10-5 - IPv4/IPv6 firewall - shared libipq library
libiptc - 1.4.10-5 - IPv4/IPv6 firewall - shared libiptc library (compatibility stub)
libiw - 29-5 - This package contains a library for manipulating "Linux Wireless Extensions".
libiwinfo - 44 - Wireless information library with consistent interface for proprietary Broadcom, madwifi, nl80211 and wext driver interfaces.
libiwinfo-lua - 44 - This is the Lua binding for the iwinfo library. It provides access to all enabled backends.
libjpeg - 6b-1 - The Independent JPEG Group's JPEG runtime library
libjs - 1.6.20070208-2 - Mozilla JavaScript Engine (library)
libjson - 0.11-2 - This package contains a compatibility library for packages that have not been adapted to the json-c library rename yet
libjson-c - 0.11-2 - This package contains a library for javascript object notation backends.
libjson-script - 2013-10-19-734d28eb1a46358743cf8837c91e5d46695c3b91 - Minimalistic JSON based scripting engine
libldns - 1.6.13-1 - The goal of ldns is to simplify DNS programming, it supports recent RFCs like the DNSSEC documents, and allows developers to easily create software conforming to current RFCs, and experimental software for current Internet Drafts.
liblo - 0.26-1 - Lightweight Open Sound Control (OSC) library
liblo-utils - 0.26-1 - Lightweight Open Sound Control (OSC) utilities
libltdl - 2.4-1 - A generic dynamic object loading library
liblua - 5.1.4-8 - Lua is a powerful light-weight programming language designed for extending applications. Lua is also frequently used as a general-purpose, stand-alone  language. Lua is free software. This package contains the Lua shared libraries, needed by other programs.
liblzo - 2.06-1 - LZO is a data compression library which is suitable for data de-/compression in real-time. This means it favours speed over compression ratio.
libmad - 0.15.1b-3 - MAD is a high-quality MPEG audio decoder. It currently supports MPEG-1 and the MPEG-2 extension to lower sampling frequencies,  as well as the de facto MPEG 2.5 format. All three audio layers -  Layer I, Layer II, and Layer III (i.e. MP3) - are fully implemented.
libmagic - 5.11-1 - library
libmatrixssl - 1.2.4-1 - Embedded SSL implementation
libmbus - 0.7.0-1 - libmbus is an open source M-bus (Meter-Bus) library. The Meter-Bus is a standard for reading out meter data from electricity meters, heat meters, gas meters, etc.  This package contains the M-bus shared library, used by other programs.
libmcrypt - 2.5.8-2 - libmcrypt is a cryptographic library that conveniently brings together a variety of ciphers for convenient use.
libmicroxml - 2012-06-11-72965423184f24cc0b963d91c2d1863cdb01b6aa - A micro sized XML library
libminiupnpc - 1.8-1 - Lightweight UPnP library
libmms - 0.6-1 - LibMMS is a common library for parsing mms:// and mmsh:// type network streams. These are commonly used to stream Windows Media Video content over the web. LibMMS itself is only for receiving MMS stream, it doesn't handle sending at all.
libmnl - 1.0.1-1 - libmnl is a minimalistic user-space library oriented to Netlink developers. There are a lot of common tasks in parsing, validating, constructing of both the Netlink header and TLVs that are repetitive and easy to get wrong. This library aims to provide simple helpers that allows you to re-use code and to avoid re-inventing the wheel. The main features of this library are: . * Small: the shared library requires around 30KB for an x86-based computer. . * Simple: this library avoids complexity and elaborated abstractions that tend to hide Netlink details. . * Easy to use: the library simplifies the work for Netlink-wise developers. It provides functions to make socket handling, message building, validating, parsing and sequence tracking, easier. . * Easy to re-use: you can use the library to build your own abstraction layer on top of this library. . * Decoupling: the interdependency of the main bricks that compose the library is reduced, i.e. the library provides many helpers, but the programmer is not forced to use them.
libmosquitto - 0.15-1 - Library required for mosquitto's command line client tools, also for use by any third party software that wants to communicate with a mosquitto server.  Should be useable for communicating with any MQTT v3.1 compatible server, such as IBM's RSMB, in addition to Mosquitto
libmount - 2.21.2-1 - The libmount library is used to parse /etc/fstab, /etc/mtab and /proc/self/mountinfo files, manage the mtab file, evaluate mount options...
libmpd - 0.20.0-1 - It's wraps around libmpdclient and provides a higher level api.
libmpdclient - 2.4-1 - A stable, documented, asynchronous API library for interfacing MPD in the C, C++ & Objective C languages.
libmpeg2 - 0.5.1-1 - MPEG-1 & -2 decoding library
libmysqlclient - 5.1.53-7 - MySQL client library
libmysqlclient-r - 5.1.53-7 - MySQL client library threadsafe
libnatpmp - 20110808-1 - libnatpmp is an attempt to make a portable and fully compliant implementation of the protocol for the client side. It is based on non blocking sockets and all calls of the API are asynchronous. It is therefore very easy to integrate the NAT-PMP code to any event driven code. This package contains the shared library.
libncurses - 5.7-5 - Terminal handling library
libncursesw - 5.7-5 - Terminal handling library (Unicode)
libneon - 0.29.6-2 - HTTP and WebDAV client library
libnet0 - 1.0.2a-8 - Low-level packet creation library (v1.0.x)
libnet1 - 1.1.2.1-2 - Low-level packet creation library (v1.1.x)
libnetfilter-conntrack - 0.9.1-1 - libnetfilter_conntrack is a userspace library providing a programming interface (API) to the in-kernel connection tracking state table. The library libnetfilter_conntrack has been previously known as libnfnetlink_conntrack and libctnetlink. This library is currently used by conntrack-tools among many other applications.
libnetfilter-queue - 1.0.0-1 - libnetfilter_queue is a userspace library providing an API to packets that have been queued by the kernel packet filter.
libnetsnmp - 5.4.2.1-5 - Simple Network Management Protocol (SNMP) is a widely used protocol for monitoring the health and welfare of network equipment (eg. routers), computer equipment and even devices like UPSs. Net-SNMP is a suite of applications used to implement SNMP v1, SNMP v2c and SNMP v3 using both IPv4 and IPv6. . This package contains shared libraries, needed by other programs.
libnewt - 0.52.12-1 - Programming library for colour text mode widget-based user interfaces, based on S-Lang.
libnfc - 1.4.2-1 - libnfc is a free software library used to handle NFC capable devices. It supports the four main NFC modulations: * ISO14443-A (NXP MIFARE), * ISO14443-B, * JIS X 6319-4 (Sony Felica) and * Jewel Topaz (Innovision Research & Development). And depending on hardware, it supports: * Read (RFID @13.56Mhz), * Emulation and * Peer2Peer mode.  
libnfc-bin - 1.4.2-1 - libnfc is provided with some useful tools: * nfc-list: target listing; * nfc-mfclassic: Mifare Classic operations; * nfc-mfultralight: Mifare Ultralight operations.
libnfc-examples - 1.4.2-1 - libnfc is provided with some examples like: * various targets emulation; * NFC frames relay (ie. over network); * manually done anticollision; * etc.
libnfnetlink - 1.0.0-2 - libnfnetlink is is the low-level library for netfilter related kernel/userspace communication. It provides a generic messaging infrastructure for in-kernel netfilter subsystems (such as nfnetlink_log, nfnetlink_queue, nfnetlink_conntrack) and their respective users and/or management tools in userspace.
libnids - 1.18-1 - An implementation of an E-component of Network Intrusion Detection System.
libnl - 2.0-1 - This package contains a library for applications dealing with netlink sockets
libnl-tiny - 0.1-3 - This package contains a stripped down version of libnl
libogg - 1.1.4-2 - Ogg project codecs use the Ogg bitstream format to arrange the raw, compressed bitstream into a more robust, useful form.  For example, the Ogg bitstream makes seeking, time stamping and error recovery possible, as well as mixing several sepearate, concurrent media streams into a single physical bitstream.
liboil - 0.3.17-1 - Liboil is a library of simple functions that are optimized for various CPUs. These functions are generally loops implementing simple algorithms, such as converting an array of N integers to floating-point numbers or multiplying and summing an array of N numbers. Such functions are candidates for significant optimization using various techniques, especially by using extended instructions provided by modern CPUs (Altivec, MMX, SSE, etc.).
libol - 0.3.18-2 - Support library for syslog-ng
libopenldap - 2.4.23-4 - OpenLDAP Software is an open source implementation of the Lightweight Directory Access Protocol (LDAP). This package contains the shared LDAP client libraries, needed by other programs.
libopenssl - 1.0.1h-1 - The OpenSSL Project is a collaborative effort to develop a robust, commercial-grade, full-featured, and Open Source toolkit implementing the Secure Sockets Layer (SSL v2/v3) and Transport Layer Security (TLS v1) protocols as well as a full-strength general purpose cryptography library. This package contains the OpenSSL shared libraries, needed by other programs.
liboping - 1.6.2-1 - C library to generate ICMP echo requests.
libow - 2.8p13-1 - OWFS is a suite of programs that designed to make the 1-wire bus and its devices easily accessible. The underlying priciple is to create a virtual filesystem, with the unique ID being the directory, and the individual properties of the device are represented as simple files that can be read and written.  Details of the individual slave or master design are hidden behind a consistent interface. The goal is to provide an easy set of tools for a software designer to create monitoring or control applications. There are some performance enhancements in the implementation, including data caching, parallel access to bus masters, and aggregation of device communication. Still the fundemental goal has been ease of use, flexibility and correctness rather than speed.  This package contains the OWFS library.
libpar2 - 0.2-2 - A library for performing common tasks related to PAR recovery sets
libpcap - 1.1.1-2 - This package contains a system-independent library for user-level network packet capture.
libpcre - 8.11-2 - A Perl Compatible Regular Expression library
libpcsclite - 1.8.2-1 - The purpose of PC/SC Lite is to provide a Windows(R) SCard interface in a very small form factor for communicating to smart cards and smart cards readers. . This package contains the PC/SC shared library.
libpiano - 2012.01.10-1 - Pianobar is a free/open-source, console-based replacement for Pandoras flash player. This package contains the libpiano shared library.
libpng - 1.2.46-2 - A PNG format files handling library
libpolarssl - 1.2.5-1 - The aim of the PolarSSL project is to provide a quality, open-source cryptographic library written in C and targeted at embedded systems. This package contains the PolarSSL library.
libpopt - 1.7-5 - A command line option parsing library
libpq - 9.0.1-3 - PostgreSQL client library.
libprotobuf-c - 0.15-1 - Runtime library to use Google Protocol Buffers from C applications. Protocol Buffers are a way of encoding structured data in an efficient yet extensible format. Google uses Protocol Buffers for almost all of its internal RPC protocols and file formats.
libpthread - 0.9.33.2-1 - POSIX thread library
libradiusclient-ng - 0.5.6-1 - Purpose of this project is to build a portable, easy-to-use and standard compliant library suitable for developing free and commercial  software that need support for RADIUS protocol (RFCs 2128 and 2139). This package contains shared libraries, needed by other programs.
libreadline - 5.2-2 - The Readline library provides a set of functions for use by applications that allow users to edit command lines as they are typed in. Both Emacs  and vi editing modes are available. The Readline library includes  additional functions to maintain a list of previously-entered command  lines, to recall and perhaps reedit those lines, and perform csh-like  history expansion on previous commands.
librpc - 0.9.32-rc2-0a2179bbc0844928f2a0ec01dba93d9b5d6d41a7 - uClibc RPC library
librrd - 1.2.30-3 - Round Robin Database (RRD) management library (v1.2.x)
librrd1 - 1.0.50-2 - RRD is the Acronym for Round Robin Database. RRD is a system to store and display time-series data (i.e. network bandwidth, machine-room temperature, server load average). It stores the data in a very compact way that will not expand over time, and it presents useful graphs by processing the data to enforce a certain data density. It can be used either via simple wrapper scripts (from shell or Perl) or via frontends that poll network devices and put friendly user interface on it.  This is version 1.0.x with cgilib-0.4, gd1.3 and libpng-1.0.9 linked into librrd.so. The library is much smaller compared to the 1.2.x version with separate dynamic linked libraries. This package contains a shared library, used by other programs.
librsync - 0.9.7-4 - librsync implements the rolling-checksum algorithm of remote file synchronization that was popularized by the rsync utility and is used in rproxy. This algorithm transfers the differences between 2 files without needing both files on the same system.
librt - 0.9.33.2-1 - POSIX.1b RealTime extension library
libruby - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby scripting language (shared library)
libsamplerate - 0.1.7-1 - Secret Rabbit Code (aka libsamplerate) is a Sample Rate Converter for audio.
libsasl2 - 2.1.23-1 - A general purpose authentication library
libsensors - 3.3.2-1 - lm-sensors libraries
libshout - 2.2.2-2 - libshout allows applications to easily communicate and broadcast to an Icecast streaming media server. It handles the socket connections, metadata communication, and data streaming for the calling application, and lets developers focus on feature sets instead of implementation details.
libsigcxx - 2.2.10-1 - It allows you to define signals and to connect those signals to any callback function, either global or a member function, regardless of whether it is static or virtual.
libslang2 - 2.2.4-1 - This is a shell which is mostly just a wrapper around the S-Lang Interpreter, which is part of the S-Lang Library.
libsndfile - 1.0.25-2 - libsndfile is a library of C routines for reading and writing files containing sampled audio data.
libsoup - 2.28.2-1 - libsoup
libspeex - 1.2rc1-1 - Open source patent-free speech compression codec library. Speex is an Open Source/Free Software patent-free audio compression  format designed for speech. The Speex Project aims to lower the  barrier of entry for voice applications by providing a free  alternative to expensive proprietary speech codecs. Moreover, Speex  is well-adapted to Internet applications and provides useful features  that are not present in most other codecs.  This package contains the shared codec library, needed by other programs.
libspeexdsp - 1.2rc1-1 - Open source patent-free speech compression codec library. Speex is an Open Source/Free Software patent-free audio compression  format designed for speech. The Speex Project aims to lower the  barrier of entry for voice applications by providing a free  alternative to expensive proprietary speech codecs. Moreover, Speex  is well-adapted to Internet applications and provides useful features  that are not present in most other codecs.  This package contains the shared dsp library, needed by other programs.
libsqlite2 - 2.8.17-2 - SQLite is a small C library that implements a self-contained, embeddable, zero-configuration SQL database engine.	 This package contains the SQLite (v2.x) shared library, used by other programs.
libsqlite3 - 3071201-1 - SQLite is a small C library that implements a self-contained, embeddable, zero-configuration SQL database engine. This package contains the SQLite (v3.x) shared library, used by other programs.
libstdcpp - 4.6-linaro-1 - GNU Standard C++ Library v3
libsynce - 0.12-2 - The purpose of the SynCE project is to provide a means of communication with a Windows CE or Pocket PC device from a computer running Linux, *BSD or other unices.
libsysfs - 2.1.0-2 - The library's purpose is to provide a consistant and stable interface for querying system device information exposed through sysfs.
libtasn1 - 1.4-1 - This is a library for Abstract Syntax Notation One (ASN.1) and Distinguish Encoding Rules (DER) manipulation.
libtheora - 1.0-3 - Theora is Xiph.Org's first publicly released video codec, intended for use within the Foundation's Ogg multimedia streaming system. Theora is derived directly from On2's VP3 codec; Currently the encoders are nearly identical, but Theora will make use of new features supported by the decoder to improve over what is is possible with VP3.
libtiff - 4.0.3-1 - TIFF library
libtorrent - 0.12.6-1 - LibTorrent is a BitTorrent library written in C++ for *nix, with a focus on high performance and good code. The library differentiates itself from other implementations by transfering directly from file pages to the network stack. On high-bandwidth connections it is able to seed at 3 times the speed of the official client.
libubox - 2013-10-19-734d28eb1a46358743cf8837c91e5d46695c3b91 - Basic utility library
libubus - 2013-08-08-b20a8a01c7faea5bcc9d34d10dcf7736589021b8 - OpenWrt RPC client library
libubus-lua - 2013-08-08-b20a8a01c7faea5bcc9d34d10dcf7736589021b8 - Lua binding for the OpenWrt RPC client
libuci - 2013-06-11.1-1 - C library for the Unified Configuration Interface (UCI)
libuci-lua - 2013-06-11.1-1 - Lua plugin for UCI
libucl - 1.03-2 - UCL is a portable lossless data compression library written in ANSI C. UCL implements a number of compression algorithms that achieve an excellent compression ratio while allowing *very* fast decompression. Decompression requires no additional memory.
libunbound - 1.4.17-1 - This package contains the Unbound shared library.
libupnp - 1.6.18-1 - The portable SDK for UPnP Devices (libupnp) provides developers with an API and open source code for building control points, devices, and bridges that are compliant with Version 1.0 of the  Universal Plug and Play Device Architecture Specification.
libusb - 0.1.12-3 - A library for accessing Linux USB devices
libusb-1.0 - 1.0.9-1 - libusb is a C library that gives applications easy access to USB devices on many different operating systems.
libusb-compat - 0.1.4-1 - libusb is a C library that gives applications easy access to USB devices on many different operating systems.
libuuid - 2.21.2-1 - The UUID library is used to generate unique identifiers for objects that may be accessible beyond the local system. This library generates UUIDs compatible with those created by the Open Software Foundation (OSF) Distributed Computing Environment (DCE) utility.
libv4l - 0.8.6-2 - libv4l is a collection of libraries which adds a thin abstraction layer on top of video4linux2 devices. The purpose of this (thin) layer is to make it easy for application writers to support a wide variety of devices without having to write separate code for different devices in the same class. libv4l consists of 3 different libraries: libv4lconvert, libv4l1 and libv4l2.  libv4l1 offers the (deprecated) v4l1 API on top of v4l2 devices, independent of the drivers for those devices supporting v4l1 compatibility (which many v4l2 drivers do not).  libv4l2 offers the v4l2 API on top of v4l2 devices, while adding for the application transparent libv4lconvert conversion where necessary.
libvncserver - 0.9.7-1 - VNC Server Library
libvorbis - 1.2.3-1 - Vorbis is a general purpose audio and music encoding format contemporary to MPEG-4's AAC and TwinVQ, the next generation beyond MPEG audio layer 3. Unlike the MPEG sponsored formats (and other proprietary formats such as RealAudio G2 and Windows' flavor of the month), the Vorbis CODEC specification belongs to the public domain. All the technical details are published and documented, and any software entity may make full use of the format without license fee, royalty or patent concerns.
libvorbisidec - 1.0.2+svn14261-1 - libvorbisidec is "tremor", a fixed-point implementation of libvorbis. It also has libogg built-in. It is suitable as a replacement for  libvorbis and libogg in tremor-aware applications. Tremor is a decoder only.
libwrap - 7.6-1 - Security wrapper library for TCP services
libwxbase - 2.8.10-1 - wxBase contains most of the non-GUI classes from the wxWindows cross- -platform C++ framework. There are 2 categories: generally useful portable  code (date/time handling, command line parsing, regular expression support)  and wrappers for the OS objects (files, directories, sockets, threads,  etc.) allowing you to write portable programs easily.
libxapian - 1.2.8-1 - xapian
libxml2 - 2.7.8-2 - A library for manipulating XML and HTML resources.
libxslt - 1.1.26-1 - A library for XML transformation using XSLT.
libxtables - 1.4.10-5 - IPv4/IPv6 firewall - shared xtables library
libyaml - 0.1.3-1 - yaml library written in c
libzip - 0.10.1-1 - C library for reading, creating, and modifying zip archives
libzip-utils - 0.10.1-1 - package contains binaries from libzip library (zipcmp, ziptorrent, zipmerge)
linux-atm - 2.5.2-4 - This package contains a library for accessing the Linux ATM subsystem.
lirc - 0.8.7-1 - LIRC is a package that allows you to decode and send infra-red signals of many (but not all) commonly used  remote controls.  This package contains only lircd and lircd.conf!  tested drivers -------------- ok: userspace,accent,act200l,act220l,adaptec,alsa_usb,animax,asusdh, atilibusb,atiusb,audio_alsa,breakoutbox,bte,bw6130,cmdir,creative, creative_infracd,devinput,digimatrix,dsp,dvico,ea65,exaudiohauppauge, hauppauge_dvb,hercules_smarttv_stereo,i2cuser,igorplugusb,imon, imon_24g,imon_knob,imon_pad,imon_rsc,irdeo,irdeo_remote,it87,knc_one, leadtek_pvr2000,livedrive_midi,livedrive_seq,logitech,macmini,mceusb, mceusb2,mediafocusI,mouseremote,mouseremote_ps2,mp3anywhere, packard_bell,parallel,pcmak,pcmak_usb,pctv,pixelview_bt878,provideo, realmagic,remotemaster,sasem,sb0540,serial,silitek,sir,streamzap,tekram, tekram_bt829,tira,ttusbir,tuxbox,tvbox,udp,uirt2,uirt2_raw,usb_uirt_raw, usbx,serial  nok: avermedia,avermedia_vdomate,avermedia98,bestbuy,bestbuy2,chronos,comX, cph06x,flyvideo,gvbctv5pci,irreal,kworld,leadtek_0007,leadtek_0010,lptX, nslu2,pixelview_pak,pixelview_pro,sa1100,  unknown:  audio (no portaudio), caraca (no caraca package), iguanaIR (missing headers),  irman (no libirman) 
lircdaemonadd - 0.8.7-1 - Contains those additional daemon-tools: -irrecord -lircmd
lirctools - 0.8.7-1 - This package contains those lirc-tools: -ircat:   prints config strings to standard output, can be used to provide remote control input to scripts -irexec:  execute programs according to the pressed remote control buttons -irpty:   pseudo tty driver. Connects to lircd via socket to receive infra-red codes and converts them to key strokes -irsend:  application for sending IR-codes via lirc -irw:     watch the codes as lircd recognize them -lircrcd: daemon that manages current mode for all applications -mode2:   shows the pulse/space length of a remote button
lispd - 0.3.0-3 - This packet provides support for the Locator-ID support protocol.
listener - 1.7.2-1 - This program listens for sound. If it detects any, it starts recording automatically and also automatically stops when things become silent again.
lldpd - 0.6.0-1 - LLDP (Link Layer Discovery Protocol) is an industry standard protocol designed to supplant proprietary Link-Layer protocols such as Extreme's EDP (Extreme Discovery Protocol) and CDP (Cisco Discovery Protocol). The goal of LLDP is to provide an inter-vendor compatible mechanism to deliver Link-Layer notifications to adjacent network devices.
lm-sensors - 3.3.2-1 - utility to read hardware sensor data
lm-sensors-detect - 3.3.2-1 - script to autodetect sensor hardware
lmbench - 3.0-a9-1 - lmbench is a series of micro benchmarks intended to measure basic operating system and hardware system metrics.
lmbench-bw-file-rd - 3.0-a9-1 - bw_file_rd microbenchmark
lmbench-bw-mem - 3.0-a9-1 - bw_mem microbenchmark
lmbench-bw-mmap-rd - 3.0-a9-1 - bw_mmap_rd microbenchmark
lmbench-bw-pipe - 3.0-a9-1 - bw_pipe microbenchmark
lmbench-bw-tcp - 3.0-a9-1 - bw_tcp microbenchmark
lmbench-bw-unix - 3.0-a9-1 - bw_unix microbenchmark
lmbench-cache - 3.0-a9-1 - cache microbenchmark
lmbench-disk - 3.0-a9-1 - disk microbenchmark
lmbench-enough - 3.0-a9-1 - enough microbenchmark
lmbench-flushdisk - 3.0-a9-1 - flushdisk microbenchmark
lmbench-hello - 3.0-a9-1 - hello microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-cmd - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_cmd microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-connect - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_connect microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-ctx - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_ctx microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-dram-page - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_dram_page microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-fcntl - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_fcntl microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-fifo - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_fifo microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-fs - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_fs microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-http - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_http microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-mem-rd - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_mem_rd microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-mmap - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_mmap microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-ops - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_ops microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-pagefault - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_pagefault microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-pipe - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_pipe microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-pmake - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_pmake microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-proc - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_proc microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-rand - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_rand microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-rpc - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_rpc microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-select - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_select microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-sem - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_sem microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-sig - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_sig microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-syscall - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_syscall microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-tcp - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_tcp microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-udp - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_udp microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-unix - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_unix microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-unix-connect - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_unix_connect microbenchmark
lmbench-lat-usleep - 3.0-a9-1 - lat_usleep microbenchmark
lmbench-line - 3.0-a9-1 - line microbenchmark
lmbench-lmdd - 3.0-a9-1 - lmdd microbenchmark
lmbench-lmhttp - 3.0-a9-1 - lmhttp microbenchmark
lmbench-loop-o - 3.0-a9-1 - loop_o microbenchmark
lmbench-memsize - 3.0-a9-1 - memsize microbenchmark
lmbench-mhz - 3.0-a9-1 - mhz microbenchmark
lmbench-msleep - 3.0-a9-1 - msleep microbenchmark
lmbench-par-mem - 3.0-a9-1 - par_mem microbenchmark
lmbench-par-ops - 3.0-a9-1 - par_ops microbenchmark
lmbench-stream - 3.0-a9-1 - stream microbenchmark
lmbench-timing-o - 3.0-a9-1 - timing_o microbenchmark
lmbench-tlb - 3.0-a9-1 - tlb microbenchmark
logger - 2.21.2-1 - logger makes entries in the system log, it provides a shell command interface to the syslog system log module
logilab-astng - 0.17.2-1 - The aim of this module is to provide a common base representation of python source code for projects such as pychecker, pyreverse, pylint...
logilab-common - 0.29.1-1 - a bunch of modules providing low level functionnalities shared among some python projects devel
logrotate - 3.8.1-1 - logrotate is designed to ease administration of systems that generate large numbers of log files. It allows auto-matic rotation, compression, removal and mailing of log files. Each log file may be handled daily, weekly, monthly or when it grows too large.
look - 2.21.2-1 - look utility displays any lines in file which contain string
losetup - 2.21.2-1 - losetup is used to associate loop devices with regular files or block devices, to detach loop devices and to query the status of a loop device
lrzsz - 0.12.20-2 - Transfer files in your login sessions. Very leightweight and straight forward. You just need a terminal client that can do either X, Y or Z-modem file transfers.
lsblk - 2.21.2-1 - lsblk lists information about all or the specified block devices
lsm - 0.131-1 - lsm is a link state monitor for carrying out actions when a link transistions from the up to down state or vice versa.
lsof - 4.86-1 - LiSt Open Files - a diagnostic tool
lsqlite3 - 7-2 - LuaSQLite 3 is a thin wrapper around the public domain SQLite3 database engine.
lua - 5.1.4-8 - Lua is a powerful light-weight programming language designed for extending applications. Lua is also frequently used as a general-purpose, stand-alone  language. Lua is free software. This package contains the Lua language interpreter.
lua-examples - 5.1.4-8 - Lua is a powerful light-weight programming language designed for extending applications. Lua is also frequently used as a general-purpose, stand-alone  language. Lua is free software. This package contains Lua language examples.
luac - 5.1.4-8 - Lua is a powerful light-weight programming language designed for extending applications. Lua is also frequently used as a general-purpose, stand-alone  language. Lua is free software. This package contains the Lua language compiler.
luaexpat - 1.1-2 - LuaExpat is a SAX XML parser based on the Expat library.
luafilesystem - 1.5.0-1 - This package contains the LuaFileSystem library, a set of portable functions for directory creation, listing and deletion and for file locking.
luaposix - 5.1.11-1 - luaposix is a general POSIX library for Lua providing access to various low level libc functions.
luaprofiler - 2.0.2-1 - Profile any Lua application
luasec - 0.4-1 - LuaSec is a binding for OpenSSL library to provide TLS/SSL communication.
luasoap - 2.0.2-2 - LuaSOAP is a library of functions to deal with SOAP.
luasocket - 2.0.2-3 - LuaSocket is the most comprehensive networking support library for the Lua language. It provides easy access to TCP, UDP, DNS, SMTP, FTP, HTTP, MIME and much more.
luasql-mysql - 2.1.1-1 - LuaSQL is a simple interface from Lua to a DBMS. . This package contains the MySQL binding.
luasql-pgsql - 2.1.1-1 - LuaSQL is a simple interface from Lua to a DBMS. . This package contains the PostgreSQL binding.
luasql-sqlite3 - 2.1.1-1 - LuaSQL is a simple interface from Lua to a DBMS. . This package contains the SQLite 3 binding.
luci - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Standard OpenWrt set including full admin with ppp support and the default OpenWrt theme
luci-app-ahcp - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for AHCPd
luci-app-commands - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Shell Command Module
luci-app-ddns - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Dynamic DNS configuration module
luci-app-diag-core - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Diagnostics Tools (Core)
luci-app-diag-devinfo - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Diagnostics Tools (Device Info)
luci-app-firewall - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Firewall and Portforwarding application
luci-app-freifunk-diagnostics - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Tools for network diagnosis like traceroute and ping
luci-app-freifunk-policyrouting - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Policy routing for mesh traffic
luci-app-freifunk-widgets - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Widgets for the Freifunk index page
luci-app-hd-idle - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Hard Disk Idle Spin-Down module
luci-app-ltqtapi - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Lantiq voip
luci-app-meshwizard - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Shellscript based wizard to setup mesh networks
luci-app-minidlna - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for miniDLNA
luci-app-mmc-over-gpio - 0.11+svn10528-1 - MMC-over-GPIO configuration module
luci-app-multiwan - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for the OpenWrt MultiWAN agent
luci-app-ntpc - 0.11+svn10528-1 - NTP time synchronisation configuration module
luci-app-olsr - 0.11+svn10528-1 - OLSR configuration and status module
luci-app-olsr-services - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Show services announced with the nameservice plugin
luci-app-olsr-viz - 0.11+svn10528-1 - OLSR Visualisation
luci-app-p2pblock - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for the Freifunk P2P-Block addon
luci-app-p910nd - 0.11+svn10528-1 - p910nd - Printer server module
luci-app-pbx - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI PBX Administration
luci-app-polipo - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for the Polipo Proxy
luci-app-qos - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Quality of Service configuration module
luci-app-radvd - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for Radvd
luci-app-samba - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Network Shares - Samba SMB/CIFS module
luci-app-siitwizard - 0.11+svn10528-1 - SIIT IPv4-over-IPv6 configuration wizard
luci-app-splash - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Freifunk DHCP-Splash application
luci-app-statistics - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Statistics Application
luci-app-tinyproxy - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Tinyproxy - HTTP(S)-Proxy configuration
luci-app-transmission - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for Transmission
luci-app-upnp - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Universal Plug & Play configuration module
luci-app-vnstat - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for VnStat
luci-app-voice-core - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Voice Software (Core)
luci-app-voice-diag - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Voice Software (Diagnostics)
luci-app-watchcat - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for Watchcat
luci-app-wol - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for Wake-on-LAN
luci-app-wshaper - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Support for wshaper
luci-i18n-catalan - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Catalan (by Eduard Duran)
luci-i18n-chinese - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Chinese (by Chinese Translators)
luci-i18n-english - 0.11+svn10528-1 - English
luci-i18n-french - 0.11+svn10528-1 - French (by Florian Fainelli)
luci-i18n-german - 0.11+svn10528-1 - German
luci-i18n-greek - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Greek (by Vasilis Tsiligiannis)
luci-i18n-hebrew - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Hebrew
luci-i18n-hungarian - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Hungarian
luci-i18n-italian - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Italian (by Matteo Croce)
luci-i18n-japanese - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Japanese (by Tsukasa Hamano)
luci-i18n-malay - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Malay (by Teow Wai Chet)
luci-i18n-norwegian - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Norwegian (by Lars Hardy)
luci-i18n-polish - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Polish
luci-i18n-portuguese - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Portuguese (by Jose Monteiro)
luci-i18n-portuguese-brazilian - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Portuguese (Brazilian) (by Carlos Cesario)
luci-i18n-romanian - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Romanian
luci-i18n-russian - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Russian (by Skryabin Dmitry)
luci-i18n-spanish - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Spanish (by Guillermo Javier Nardoni)
luci-i18n-ukrainian - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Ukrainian
luci-i18n-vietnamese - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Vietnamese (by Hong Phuc Dang)
luci-lib-core - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI core libraries
luci-lib-fastindex - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Fastindex indexing module
luci-lib-httpclient - 0.11+svn10528-1 - HTTP(S) client library
luci-lib-ipkg - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI IPKG/OPKG call abstraction library
luci-lib-json - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI JSON library
luci-lib-lucid - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCId Full-Stack Webserver
luci-lib-lucid-http - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCId HTTP Backend
luci-lib-lucid-rpc - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCId RPC Backend
luci-lib-nixio - 0.11+svn10528-1 - NIXIO POSIX library
luci-lib-px5g - 0.11+svn10528-1 - RSA/X.509 Key Generator (required for LuCId SSL support)
luci-lib-sys - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Linux/POSIX system library
luci-lib-web - 0.11+svn10528-1 - MVC Webframework
luci-mod-admin-core - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Web UI Core module
luci-mod-admin-full - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Administration - full-featured for full control
luci-mod-failsafe - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Fail-Safe - Fail-Safe sysupgrade module
luci-mod-freifunk - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI Freifunk module
luci-mod-freifunk-community - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Freifunk Community Meta-Package
luci-mod-rpc - 0.11+svn10528-1 - LuCI RPC - JSON-RPC API
luci-proto-3g - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Support for 3G
luci-proto-core - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Support for static/dhcp/none
luci-proto-ipv6 - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Support for DHCPv6/6in4/6to4/6rd/DS-Lite
luci-proto-ppp - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Support for PPP/PPPoE/PPPoA/PPtP
luci-proto-relay - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Support for relayd pseudo bridges
luci-sgi-cgi - 0.11+svn10528-1 - CGI Gateway behind existing Webserver
luci-ssl - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Standard OpenWrt set with HTTPS support
luci-theme-base - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Common base for all themes
luci-theme-bootstrap - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Bootstrap Theme
luci-theme-freifunk-bno - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Freifunk Berlin Nordost Theme
luci-theme-freifunk-generic - 0.11+svn10528-1 - Freifunk Generic Theme
luci-theme-openwrt - 0.11+svn10528-1 - OpenWrt.org (default)
luci-webpanel-linino - 1.0.2-1 - simplified wifi configuration panel
lvm2 - 2.02.96-1 - LVM2 refers to a new userspace toolset that provide logical volume management facilities on linux. It is reasonably backwards-compatible with the original LVM toolset.
m-route - 0.2-1 - Load Balancing scrip for Multi Wan Connections
mac-to-devinfo - 1.0.0-2 - Scripts to take a mac address (or ip if the ip is in the arp cache) and translate it into device information (mostly OUI owner, from the IEEE data files, but more information may be available for specific devices/vendors).
maccalc - 1 - This package contains a MAC address manipulation utility.
macchanger - 1.5.0-1 - This is a GNU/Linux utility for viewing/manipulating the MAC address of network interfaces.
madplay - 0.15.2b-3 - MAD is an MPEG audio decoder. It currently only supports the MPEG 1 standard, but fully implements all three audio layers (Layer I, Layer II,  and Layer III, the latter often colloquially known as MP3.). There is also  full support for ID3 tags.
madwimax - 0.1.1-3 - madWiMAX is a reverse-engineered Linux driver for mobile WiMAX (802.16e) devices based on Samsung CMC-730 chip. These devices are currently supported:  Samsung SWC-U200 Samsung SWC-E100 Samsung SWM-S10R (built in Samsung NC-10 netbook)
make - 3.81-1 - The Make package contains a program for compiling packages
mako - 0.2.5-1 - Mako is a template library written in Python. It provides a familiar, non-XML syntax which compiles into Python modules for maximum performance. Mako's syntax and API borrows from the best ideas of many others, including Django templates, Cheetah, Myghty, and Genshi. Conceptually, Mako is an embedded Python (i.e. Python Server Page) language, which refines the familiar ideas of componentized layout and inheritance to produce one of the most straightforward and flexible models available, while also maintaining close ties to Python calling and scoping semantics.
maradns - 1.3.07.09-1 - maradns is a DNS server written with security, simplicity, and performance in mind.
matrixtunnel - 0.2-2 - matrixtunnel is a stripped down version of stunnel based on matrixssl library.
mbus-serial - 0.7.0-1 - libmbus is an open source M-bus (Meter-Bus) library. The Meter-Bus is a standard for reading out meter data from electricity meters, heat meters, gas meters, etc.  This package contains command line tools for scanning the M-bus and retrieving data from meters which are connected through a serial (e.g. RS232) interface.
mbus-tcp - 0.7.0-1 - libmbus is an open source M-bus (Meter-Bus) library. The Meter-Bus is a standard for reading out meter data from electricity meters, heat meters, gas meters, etc.  This package contains command line tools for scanning the M-bus and retrieving data from meters which are accessible through M-bus gateways via TCP.
mc - 4.7.5.3-2 - GNU Midnight Commander is a visual file manager, licensed under GNU General Public License and therefore qualifies as Free Software. It's a feature rich full-screen text mode application that allows you to copy, move and delete files and whole directory trees, search for files and run commands in the subshell.
mcookie - 2.21.2-1 - mcookie generates a 128-bit random hexadecimal number for use with the X authority system
md5deep - 3.7-1 - md5deep is a set of programs to compute MD5, SHA-1, SHA-256, Tiger, or Whirlpool message digests on an arbitrary number of files.
mdk3 - v6-1 - Tool to exploit wireless vulnerabilities
mdns-utils - 214.3.2-4 - Bonjour, also known as zero-configuration networking, enables automatic discovery of computers, devices, and services on IP networks. . This package contains mDNS client utilities: - dns-sd - mDNSClient - mDNSIdentify - mDNSNetMonitor - mDNSProxyResponder - mDNSResponder
mdnsd - 214.3.2-4 - Bonjour, also known as zero-configuration networking, enables automatic discovery of computers, devices, and services on IP networks. . This package contains the mDNS server daemon.
mdnsresponder - 214.3.2-4 - Bonjour, also known as zero-configuration networking, enables automatic discovery of computers, devices, and services on IP networks. . This meta package contains only dependencies on other packages.
memcached - 1.4.12-1 - Free and open source, high-performance, distributed memory object caching system
memtester - 4.1.3-1 - A userspace utility for testing the memory subsystem for faults.
mercurial - 1.8.4-1 - A fast, lightweight Source Control Management system designed for efficient handling of very large distributed projects.
meshwizard - 0.0.8-3 - A shellscript based wizard to simplify the setup of a typical mesh node (e.g. for Freifunk.net)
mg - 20110120-1 - This program is intended to be a small, fast, and portable editor for people who can't (or don't want to) run real Emacs for one reason or another.  It is compatible with GNU because there shouldn't be any reason to learn more than one Emacs flavor.
mgen - 5.01b-2 - Multi-Generator
mgetty - 1.1.36-1 - A data/fax solution for your analog modem.
miau - 0.6.6-1 - In short, miau is an IRC-bouncer/proxy. Being more verbose, miau is small but quite featured IRC-bouncer - a service bit like HTTP-proxy, but for IRC-networks.
microcom - 1.02-1 - microcom is a minicom-like serial terminal emulator with scripting support.
microperl - 5.10.0-7 - A perl package without operating-specific functions such as readdir.
mii-tool - 1.9.1.1-1 - The mii-tool command allows you to set or autodetect the media type or mii chipset-based ethernet devices. It traditionally had been distributed in the net-tools package. This is a single distribution optimized for embedded systems and fully automated cross/-sysroot-builds
mini-sendmail - 1.3.6-4 - mini_sendmail reads its standard input up to an end-of-file and sends a copy of the message found there to all of the addresses listed. The message is sent by connecting to a local SMTP server. This means mini_sendmail can be used to send email from inside a chroot(2) area.
mini-snmpd - 1.2b-7 - SNMP server for embedded systems
minicom - 2.3-1 - Terminal emulation program
minidlna - 1.0.24-1 - MiniDLNA (aka ReadyDLNA) is server software with the aim of being fully compliant with DLNA/UPnP-AV clients.
miniupnpc - 1.8-1 - Lightweight UPnP client
miniupnpd - 1.8.20130426-2 - Lightweight UPnP daemon
mjpg-streamer - r148-4 - Streaming application for Linux-UVC compatible webcams
mkdosfs - 3.0.12-1 - Utilities to create and check MS-DOS FAT filesystems. (mkfs.vfat and mkfs.msdos for creating FAT volumes)
mksh - 40d-1 - mksh is the MirBSD enhanced version of the Public Domain Korn shell (pdksh), a Bourne-compatible shell which is largely si- milar to the original AT&T Korn shell; mksh is the only pdksh derivate currently being actively developed.  It includes bug fixes and feature improvements, in order to produce a modern, robust shell good for interactive and especially script use. mksh has UTF-8 support (in substring operations and the Emacs editing mode) and, while R40d corresponds to OpenBSD 5.0-cur- rent ksh (without GNU bash-like PS1 and fancy character clas- ses), adheres to SUSv4 and is much more robust.  The code has been cleaned up and simplified, bugs fixed, standards compli- ance added, and several enhancements (for extended compatibi- lity to other modern shells - as well as a couple of its own) are available. It has sensible defaults as usual with BSD.
monit - 5.4-1 - An utility for monitoring services on a Unix system This package is built with SSL support.
monit-nossl - 5.4-1 - An utility for monitoring services on a Unix system This package is built without SSL support.
mosquitto - 0.15-1 - mosquitto is a message broker that supports v3.1 of the MQ Telemetry Transport protocol. MQTT provides a lightweight method for messaging using a publish/subscribe model.
mosquitto-client - 0.15-1 - Command line client tools for publishing messages to MQTT servers and subscribing to topics.
motion - 20110826-051001-2 - webcam motion sensing and logging
mount-utils - 2.21.2-1 - contains: mount, umount, findmnt
mountd - 0.1-6 - openwrt automount daemon
mpc - 0.20-1 - MPD is a music player supporting flac, mp3 and ogg files. It is typically controlled over a network using one of it's many clients including mpc(console), gmpc(gnome), phpmp(php) etc. this is MPC
mpd-full - 0.16.5-2 - Music Player Daemon (MPD) is a flexible, powerful, server-side application for playing music. It is typically controlled over a  network using one of it's many clients including mpc (console),  gmpc (gnome), phpmp (php), etc... . This package contains a full-blown Music Player Daemon.
mpdas - 0.3.0-3 - mpdas is an AudioScrobbler client for MPD written in C++. It supports the latest AudioScrobbler protocol (2.0). In case of a downtime or connectivity problems, mpdas will  cache the played songs to ~/.mpdascache.
mrd6 - 0.9.6-4 - Multicast is becoming a major component in next generation networks, used in several scenarios, from video broadcasting to multimedia conferencing.  In order to be implemented, new technology needs supporting hardware and  software across a set of devices and systems. MRD6 is an implementation of  a modular IPv6 Multicast Routing Framework for the Linux operating system  and provides MLDv2 (as well as MLDv1), PIM-SM and MBGP support.
mrtg - 2.17.3-1 - The Multi Router Traffic Grapher, or just simply MRTG, is free software for monitoring and measuring the traffic load on network links. It allows the user to see traffic load on a network over time in graphical form. It was originally developed by Tobias Oetiker and Dave Rand to monitor router traffic, but has developed into a tool that can create graphs and statistics for almost anything.
msmtp - 1.4.27-1 - msmtp is an SMTP client. In the default mode, it transmits a mail to an SMTP server (for example at a free mail provider) which does the delivery. To use this program with your mail user agent (MUA), create a configuration file with your mail account(s) and tell your MUA to call msmtp instead of /usr/sbin/sendmail. This package is built with SSL support.
msmtp-nossl - 1.4.27-1 - msmtp is an SMTP client. In the default mode, it transmits a mail to an SMTP server (for example at a free mail provider) which does the delivery. To use this program with your mail user agent (MUA), create a configuration file with your mail account(s) and tell your MUA to call msmtp instead of /usr/sbin/sendmail. This package is built without SSL support.
msmtp-queue - 1.4.27-1 - msmtp is an SMTP client. In the default mode, it transmits a mail to an SMTP server (for example at a free mail provider) which does the delivery. To use this program with your mail user agent (MUA), create a configuration file with your mail account(s) and tell your MUA to call msmtp instead of /usr/sbin/sendmail. This package contains the msmtp queue scripts.
mt-daapd - 0.2.4.2-1 - mt-daapd is a program which acts as an iTunes (DAAP) server for Linux.
mtd - 18.1 - This package contains an utility useful to upgrade from other firmware or older OpenWrt releases.
mtd-utils - 1.4.5-1 - Utilities for manipulating memory technology devices.
mtd-utils-doc-loadbios - 1.4.5-1 - doc_loadbios package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-docfdisk - 1.4.5-1 - docfdisk package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flash-erase - 1.4.5-1 - flash_erase package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flash-eraseall - 1.4.5-1 - flash_eraseall package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flash-info - 1.4.5-1 - flash_info package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flash-lock - 1.4.5-1 - flash_lock package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flash-otp-dump - 1.4.5-1 - flash_otp_dump package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flash-otp-info - 1.4.5-1 - flash_otp_info package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flash-unlock - 1.4.5-1 - flash_unlock package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-flashcp - 1.4.5-1 - flashcp package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ftl-check - 1.4.5-1 - ftl_check package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ftl-format - 1.4.5-1 - ftl_format package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-jffs2dump - 1.4.5-1 - jffs2dump package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-mkfs.jffs2 - 1.4.5-1 - mkfs.jffs2 package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-mkfs.ubifs - 1.4.5-1 - mkfs.ubifs package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-mtd-debug - 1.4.5-1 - mtd_debug package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-mtdinfo - 1.4.5-1 - mtdinfo package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-nanddump - 1.4.5-1 - nanddump package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-nandtest - 1.4.5-1 - nandtest package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-nandwrite - 1.4.5-1 - nandwrite package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-nftl-format - 1.4.5-1 - nftl_format package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-nftldump - 1.4.5-1 - nftldump package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-recv-image - 1.4.5-1 - recv_image package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-rfddump - 1.4.5-1 - rfddump package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-rfdformat - 1.4.5-1 - rfdformat package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-serve-image - 1.4.5-1 - serve_image package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-sumtool - 1.4.5-1 - sumtool package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubiattach - 1.4.5-1 - ubiattach package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubicrc32 - 1.4.5-1 - ubicrc32 package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubidetach - 1.4.5-1 - ubidetach package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubiformat - 1.4.5-1 - ubiformat package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubimkvol - 1.4.5-1 - ubimkvol package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubinfo - 1.4.5-1 - ubinfo package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubinize - 1.4.5-1 - ubinize package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubirename - 1.4.5-1 - ubirename package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubirmvol - 1.4.5-1 - ubirmvol package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubirsvol - 1.4.5-1 - ubirsvol package from mtd-utils
mtd-utils-ubiupdatevol - 1.4.5-1 - ubiupdatevol package from mtd-utils
mtr - 0.82-1 - mtr combines the functionality of the 'traceroute' and 'ping' programs in a single network diagnostic tool. As mtr starts, it investigates the network connection between the host mtr runs on and a user-specified destination host. After it determines the address of each network hop between the machines, it sends a sequence ICMP ECHO requests to each one to determine the quality of the link to each machine. As it does this, it prints running statistics about each machine.
multiwan - 1.0.22-2 - An agent script that makes Multi-WAN configuration simple, easy and manageable. Complete with load balancing, failover and an easy to manage traffic ruleset.
muninlite - 1.0.4-3 - Munin node implemented in shell
mutella - 0.4.5-4 - Mutella supports all the functionality required to participate as a full-featured node in the Gnutella network. "Full-featured" implies support for file search, download and sharing. It is optimized for a high-bandwidth connection, where it sets standards for server performance and stability, but can also run on a modest-speed line. . Mutella can either be controlled via a colourful text mode interface or via a web browser using a built in http interface.
mutt - 1.5.21-1 - Mutt is a small but very powerful text-based mail client for Unix operating systems.
mvprelay - 0.1-1 - Relays requests from the MediaMVP to the TFTP server
mysql-server - 5.1.53-7 - MySQL Server
n2n - 3875-4 - VPN tunneling daemon
nagios - 2.10-2 - service and network monitoring program
nagios-plugins - 1.4.14-3 - plugins for Nagios checks
namei - 2.21.2-1 - namei uses its arguments as pathnames to any type of Unix file (symlinks, files, directories, and so forth)
nano - 2.2.6-1 - GNU nano (Nano's ANOther editor, or Not ANOther editor) is an enhanced clone of the Pico text editor.
natpmp - 0.2.3-5 - This is a daemon implementing NAT-PMP. NAT-PMP is a protocol for handling port forwarding requests from clients behind a NAT.
natpmpc - 20110808-1 - libnatpmp is an attempt to make a portable and fully compliant implementation of the protocol for the client side. It is based on non blocking sockets and all calls of the API are asynchronous. It is therefore very easy to integrate the NAT-PMP code to any event driven code. This package contains the natpmp client.
nbd - 2.9.23-1 - This package contains the network block device client.
nbtscan - 1.5.1 - NBTscan is a program for scanning IP networks for NetBIOS name information. It sends NetBIOS status query to each address in supplied range and lists received information in human readable form. For each responded host it lists IP address, NetBIOS computer name, logged-in user name and MAC address.
ncat - 6.01-4 - Much-improved reimplementation of Netcat
ncat-ssl - 6.01-4 - Ncat (with OpenSSL support)
ncftp - 3.2.5-1 - NcFTP Client (also known as just NcFTP) is a set of FREE application programs implementing the File Transfer Protocol (FTP). Main program.
ncftp-utils - 3.2.5-1 - NcFTP Client (also known as just NcFTP) is a set of FREE application programs implementing the File Transfer Protocol (FTP). Utilities.
ndiff - 6.01-4 - Utility to compare the results of Nmap scans
ndisc6 - 1.0.2-1 - An ICMPv6 neighbour discovery tools
ndyndns - 2.1-3 - The ndyndns daemon is an update client for DynDNS.com. It checks for an IP address change every two minutes, avoids unnecessary updates, reports errors, logs to syslog, and generally complies with everything required of a proper dyndns client.
net-tools-arp - 1.60-2 - Program arp from net-tools. Manipulate kernel's ARP cache. Add, delete an entry, or to dump the entire cache.
net-tools-dnsdomainname - 1.60-2 - Program dnsdomainname from net-tools. Reports the system's DNS domain name.
net-tools-domainname - 1.60-2 - Program domainname from net-tools. Reports the system's NIS/YP domain name.
net-tools-hostname - 1.60-2 - Program hostname from net-tools. Reports or sets the name of the current host system.
net-tools-ifconfig - 1.60-2 - Program ifconfig from net-tools. Configure network interfaces.
net-tools-ipmaddr - 1.60-2 - Program ipmaddr from net-tools.  Adds, deletes and shows an interface's multicast addresses.
net-tools-iptunnel - 1.60-2 - Program iptunnel from net-tools. Adds, changes, deletes and shows an interface's tunnels. 
net-tools-mii-tool - 1.60-2 - Program mii-tool from net-tools.  Checks or sets the status of a network interface's Media Independent  Interface (MII) unit.
net-tools-nameif - 1.60-2 - Program nameif from net-tools Trivial File Transfer Protocol server.
net-tools-netstat - 1.60-2 - Program netstat from net-tools. Report network connections, routing tables, and interface statistics.
net-tools-nisdomainname - 1.60-2 - Program nisdomainname from net-tools. Same as domainname.
net-tools-plipconfig - 1.60-2 - Program plipconfig from net-tools.  Fine tune the PLIP device parameters, to improve its performance.
net-tools-rarp - 1.60-2 - Program rarp from net-tools. Manipulate the kernel's RARP table.
net-tools-route - 1.60-2 - Program route from net-tools. Manipulate the IP routing table.
net-tools-slattach - 1.60-2 - Program slattach from net-tools.  Attaches a network interface to a serial line. This allows  to use normal terminal lines for point-to-point  links to other computers.
net-tools-ypdomainname - 1.60-2 - Program route from net-tools. Same as domainname.
netatalk - 2.2.1-5 - netatalk
netcat - 0.7.1-2 - Netcat is a featured networking utility which reads and writes data across network connections, using the TCP/IP protocol. It is designed to be a reliable "back-end" tool that can be used directly or easily driven by other programs and scripts. At the same time, it is a feature-rich network debugging and exploration tool, since it can create almost any kind of connection you would need and has several interesting built-in capabilities.
netdiscover - 0.3-beta6-3 - An active/passive address reconnaissance tool
netdiscover-to-devinfo - 1.0.0-2 - A script to use netdiscover to discover all devices on the specified arp-able networks and translate into the device information.
netifd - 2013-07-16-2674941b06c1ec67f1aff1bff9212e1372106641 - OpenWrt Network Interface Configuration Daemon
netio - 1.31-1 - Network throughput benchmark
netperf - 2.4.5-2 - Network performance measurement tool
netpipe - 3.7.1-1 - NetPIPE is a protocol independent performance tool that visually represents the network performance under a variety of conditions. It performs simple ping-pong tests, bouncing messages of increasing size between two processes, whether across a network or within an SMP system. Message sizes are chosen at regular intervals, and with slight perturbations, to provide a complete test of the communication system. Each data point involves many ping-pong tests to provide an accurate timing. Latencies are calculated by dividing the round trip time in half for small messages ( < 64 Bytes ).
netstat-nat - 1.4.10-1 - Netstat-nat is a small program written in C. It displays NAT connections, managed by netfilter/iptables which comes with the > 2.4.x linux kernels. The program reads its information from '/proc/net/ip_conntrack', which is the temporary conntrack-storage of netfilter.
nfacctd - 0.14.0-1 - NetFlow accounting daemon
nfacctd-mysql - 0.14.0-1 - NetFlow accounting daemon with MySQL support
nfacctd-pgsql - 0.14.0-1 - NetFlow accounting daemon with PostgreSQL support
nfacctd-sqlite - 0.14.0-1 - NetFlow accounting daemon with SQLite support
nfs-kernel-server - 1.2.6-1 - Kernel NFS server support
nfs-kernel-server-utils - 1.2.6-1 - NFS server utils
nfs-server - 2.2beta47-3 - User Space NFS server
nfs-utils - 1.2.6-1 - Updated mount.nfs command - allows mounting nfs4 volumes
ngircd - 18-1 - ngIRCd is an Open Source server for the Internet Relay Chat (IRC), which is developed and published under the terms of the GNU General Public Licence. ngIRCd means "next generation IRC daemon", it's written from scratch and not deduced from the "grandfather of IRC daemons", the daemon of the IRCNet. This package is built with OpenSSL support.
ngircd-nossl - 18-1 - ngIRCd is an Open Source server for the Internet Relay Chat (IRC), which is developed and published under the terms of the GNU General Public Licence. ngIRCd means "next generation IRC daemon", it's written from scratch and not deduced from the "grandfather of IRC daemons", the daemon of the IRCNet. This package is built without OpenSSL support.
ngrep - 1.45-3 - ngrep a pcap-aware tool that will allow you to specify extended regular expressions to match against data payloads of packets. It currently recognizes TCP, UDP, and ICMP across Ethernet, PPP, SLIP, FDDI, Token Ring and null interfaces, and understands BPF filter logic in the same fashion as more common packet sniffing tools, like tcpdump and snoop.
nmap - 6.01-4 - Utility for network exploration or security auditing
nmap-ssl - 6.01-4 - Nmap (with OpenSSL support)
nocatauth - nightly-2 - NoCatAuth is the original "catch and release" captive portal implementation. It provides a simple splash screen web page for  clients on your network, as well as a variety of authenticated  modes. It is written in Perl.
nocatsplash - 0.93pre2-2 - NoCatSplash is an Open Public Network Gateway Daemon. It performs as a [captive/open/active] portal. When run on a gateway/router  on a network, all web requests are redirected until the client either logs  in or clicks "I Accept" to an AUP. The gateway daemon then changes the  firewall rules on the gateway to pass traffic for that client (based on IP  address and MAC address).
node - v0.10.25-1 - Node.js is a platform built on Chrome's JavaScript runtime for easily building fast, scalable network applications. Node.js uses an event-driven, non-blocking I/O model that makes it lightweight and efficient, perfect for data-intensive real-time applications that run across distributed devices.
noping - 1.6.2-1 - Ncurses application to send ICMP echo request to network hosts
nping - 6.01-4 - Network packet generation tool / ping utility
nprobe - 4.1-2 - nprobe
nrpe - 2.12-4 - The NRPE addon is designed to allow you to execute Nagios plugins on remote Linux/Unix machines.  The main reason for doing this is to allow Nagios to monitor "local" resources (like CPU load, memory usage, etc.) on remote machines.  Since these public resources are not usually exposed to external machines, an agent like NRPE must be installed on the remote Linux/Unix machines.
ntfs-3g - 2011.4.12-1-fuseint - Ntfs-3g is a NTFS driver, which can create, remove, rename, move files, directories, hard links, and streams. It can read and write files, including streams and sparse files. It can handle special files like symbolic links, devices, and FIFOs. Moreover it can also read transparently compressed files.  Contains: - ntfs-3g - ntfs-3g.probe - mount.ntfs-3g (symlink to ntfs-3g) 
ntfs-3g-low - 2011.4.12-1-fuseint - Contains: - lowntfs-3g - mount.lowntfs-3g (symlink to lowntfs-3g)  A driver variant using the fuse low-level interface missing some of the  enhanced functionality for streams or the like. You might want to check: http://www.tuxera.com/community/ntfs-3g-manual/ 
ntfs-3g-utils - 2011.4.12-1-fuseint - Additional ntfs-3g utilities. Not included by default for size considerations. All binaries except ntfs-3g, ntfs-3g.probe.  Currently: - ntfs-3g.secaudit - ntfs-3g.usermap 
ntfsprogs - 2.0.0-2 - Tools for managing NTFS volumes from Linux
ntp-keygen - 4.2.6p5-2 - The ISC ntp suite is a collection of tools used to synchronize the system clock with remote NTP time servers and run/montior local NTP servers. . This package contains the ntp-keygen.
ntp-keygen-ssl - 4.2.6p5-2 - The ISC ntp suite is a collection of tools used to synchronize the system clock with remote NTP time servers and run/montior local NTP servers. . This package contains the ntp-keygen with OpenSSL support.
ntp-utils - 4.2.6p5-2 - The ISC ntp suite is a collection of tools used to synchronize the system clock with remote NTP time servers and run/montior local NTP servers. . This package contains ntpdc, ntpq and ntptime.
ntpclient - 2007_365-4 - NTP client for setting system time from NTP servers.
ntpd - 4.2.6p5-2 - The ISC ntp suite is a collection of tools used to synchronize the system clock with remote NTP time servers and run/montior local NTP servers. . This package contains the ntpd server.
ntpd-ssl - 4.2.6p5-2 - The ISC ntp suite is a collection of tools used to synchronize the system clock with remote NTP time servers and run/montior local NTP servers. . This package contains the ntpd server with OpenSSL support.
ntpdate - 4.2.6p5-2 - The ISC ntp suite is a collection of tools used to synchronize the system clock with remote NTP time servers and run/montior local NTP servers. . This package contains ntpdate.
ntripcaster - 0.1.5-1 - BKG Standard Ntrip Broadcaster
ntripclient - 1.5.0-1 - Ntrip Version 2.0 Command Line Client, reading from Ntrip Version 1.0 or 2.0 Caster
ntripserver - 1.5.1-1 - Ntrip Version 2.0 Command Line Server, reading from SISNeT Server, TCP/UDP IP Port, Serial port, or NtripCaster to support an Ntrip Version 1.0 or 2.0 Caster
nufw - 2.2.21-2 - NuFW adds user-based filtering to Netfilter, the state of the art IP filtering layer from the Linux kernel. Its exclusive algorithm allows authenticated filtering even on multiuser computers.
nufw-modules - 2.2.21-2 - NuFW modules
nullmailer - 1.05-4 - This is nullmailer, a sendmail/qmail/etc replacement MTA for hosts which relay to a fixed set of smart relays.  It is designed to be simple to configure, secure, and easily extendable.
nutcpc - 2.2.21-2 - client version
nuttcp - 6.1.2-2 - nuttcp is a network performance measurement tool intended for use by network and system managers. Its most basic usage is to determine the raw TCP (or UDP) network layer throughput by transferring memory buffers from a source system across an interconnecting network to a destination system, either transferring data for a specified time interval, or alternatively transferring a specified number of bytes. In addition to reporting the achieved network throughput in Mbps, nuttcp also provides additional useful information related to the data transfer such as user, system, and wall-clock time, transmitter and receiver CPU utilization, and loss percentage (for UDP transfers).
nuttcp-xinetd - 6.1.2-2 - nuttcp is a network performance measurement tool intended for use by network and system managers. Its most basic usage is to determine the raw TCP (or UDP) network layer throughput by transferring memory buffers from a source system across an interconnecting network to a destination system, either transferring data for a specified time interval, or alternatively transferring a specified number of bytes. In addition to reporting the achieved network throughput in Mbps, nuttcp also provides additional useful information related to the data transfer such as user, system, and wall-clock time, transmitter and receiver CPU utilization, and loss percentage (for UDP transfers). This package contains the nuttcp xinetd service files.
nvram - 9 - This package contains an utility to manipulate NVRAM on Broadcom based devices. It works on bcm47xx (Linux 2.6) without using the kernel api.
nzbget - 0.8.0-1 - A command-line client/server based binary newsgrabber for nzb-files.
nzbgetweb - 1.4-1 - Web interface for nzbget.
objdump - 2.22-5 - objdump
odhcp6c - 2013-10-02-357ecc1f5163bc7f74c64f4bca387e8d44a2eac5-1 - Embedded DHCPv6-client for OpenWrt
oidentd - 2.0.8-2 - A nat aware identd server that will correctly forwared requests to clients.
olsrd - 0.6.6-2 - OLSR (Optimized Link State Routing) daemon
olsrd-mod-dyn-gw-plain - 0.6.6-2 - Dynamic internet gateway plain plugin
olsrd-mod-nameservice - 0.6.6-2 - Lightweight hostname resolver plugin
olsrd-mod-txtinfo - 0.6.6-2 - Small informative web server plugin
olsrd-mod-watchdog - 0.6.6-2 - Watchdog plugin
om-watchdog - 1-1 - This package contains the hw watchdog script for the OM1P and OM2P device.
open2300 - 1.11-1.11 - This is an utility suite used to communicate with and collect data from a WS23XX wheather station.
openconnect - 4.08-1 - A VPN client compatible with Cisco's AnyConnect SSL VPN.  OpenConnect is a client for Cisco's AnyConnect SSL VPN, which is supported by IOS 12.4(9)T or later on Cisco SR500, 870, 880, 1800, 2800, 3800, 7200 Series and Cisco 7301 Routers.  
opendchub - 0.8.2-1 - Open DC hub is a Unix/Linux version of the hub software for the Direct Connect network
openl2tp-full - 1.8-4 - OpenL2TP is an open source L2TP client/server, written by Katalix Systems specifically for Linux. It has been designed for use as an enterprise  L2TP VPN server or in commercial, Linux-based, embedded networking products and is able to support hundreds of sessions, each with different configuration. . This package a full-featured, RPC-enabled OpenL2TP.
openl2tp-mini - 1.8-4 - OpenL2TP is an open source L2TP client/server, written by Katalix Systems specifically for Linux. It has been designed for use as an enterprise  L2TP VPN server or in commercial, Linux-based, embedded networking products and is able to support hundreds of sessions, each with different configuration. . This package a minimal-featured, RPC-disabled OpenL2TP.
openldap-server - 2.4.23-4 - OpenLDAP Software is an open source implementation of the Lightweight Directory Access Protocol (LDAP). This package contains server programs required to provide LDAP services.
openldap-utils - 2.4.23-4 - OpenLDAP Software is an open source implementation of the Lightweight Directory Access Protocol (LDAP). This package contains client programs required to access LDAP servers.
opennhrp - 0.12.3-2 - OpenNHRP implements NBMA Next Hop Resolution Protocol (as defined in RFC 2332). It makes it possible to create dynamic multipoint VPN Linux router using NHRP, GRE and IPsec. It aims to be Cisco DMVPN compatible.
openntpd - 3.9p1-5 - A free and easy to use NTP (Network Time Protocol) implementation.
openrrcp - 0.2.1-1 - OpenRRCP toolset for managing RRCP-capable Ethernet switches
openrtsp - 2012.02.04-1 - live555 streaming libraries and testProgs
openslp - 1.2.1-4 - openslp
openssh-client - 6.1p1-1 - OpenSSH client.
openssh-client-utils - 6.1p1-1 - OpenSSH client utilities.
openssh-keygen - 6.1p1-1 - OpenSSH keygen.
openssh-moduli - 6.1p1-1 - OpenSSH server moduli file.
openssh-server - 6.1p1-1 - OpenSSH server.
openssh-sftp-client - 6.1p1-1 - OpenSSH SFTP client.
openssh-sftp-server - 6.1p1-1 - OpenSSH SFTP server.
openssl-util - 1.0.1h-1 - The OpenSSL Project is a collaborative effort to develop a robust, commercial-grade, full-featured, and Open Source toolkit implementing the Secure Sockets Layer (SSL v2/v3) and Transport Layer Security (TLS v1) protocols as well as a full-strength general purpose cryptography library. This package contains the OpenSSL command-line utility.
openswan - 2.6.38-1 - Openswan is an IPsec implementation for Linux. This package contains the Openswan user-land daemon.
openvpn - 2.2.2-2 - Open source VPN solution using SSL
openvpn-easy-rsa - 2.2.2-2 - Simple shell scripts to manage a Certificate Authority
oping - 1.6.2-1 - Send ICMP echo request to network hosts
opkg - 618-3.dh1 - Lightweight package management system opkg is the opkg Package Management System, for handling installation and removal of packages on a system. It can recursively follow dependencies and download all packages necessary to install a particular package.  opkg knows how to install both .ipk and .deb packages.
ostiary - 4.0-1 - Designed to allow you to run a fixed set of commands remotely, without giving everyone else access to the same commands.  Provides - ostiaryd daemon (~25kb) - ostclient (~9kb)
owfs - 2.8p13-1 - OWFS is a suite of programs that designed to make the 1-wire bus and its devices easily accessible. The underlying priciple is to create a virtual filesystem, with the unique ID being the directory, and the individual properties of the device are represented as simple files that can be read and written.  Details of the individual slave or master design are hidden behind a consistent interface. The goal is to provide an easy set of tools for a software designer to create monitoring or control applications. There are some performance enhancements in the implementation, including data caching, parallel access to bus masters, and aggregation of device communication. Still the fundemental goal has been ease of use, flexibility and correctness rather than speed.  This package contains the OWFS fuse filesystem.
owftpd - 2.8p13-1 - OWFS is a suite of programs that designed to make the 1-wire bus and its devices easily accessible. The underlying priciple is to create a virtual filesystem, with the unique ID being the directory, and the individual properties of the device are represented as simple files that can be read and written.  Details of the individual slave or master design are hidden behind a consistent interface. The goal is to provide an easy set of tools for a software designer to create monitoring or control applications. There are some performance enhancements in the implementation, including data caching, parallel access to bus masters, and aggregation of device communication. Still the fundemental goal has been ease of use, flexibility and correctness rather than speed.  This package contains the OWFS ftp server.
owhttpd - 2.8p13-1 - OWFS is a suite of programs that designed to make the 1-wire bus and its devices easily accessible. The underlying priciple is to create a virtual filesystem, with the unique ID being the directory, and the individual properties of the device are represented as simple files that can be read and written.  Details of the individual slave or master design are hidden behind a consistent interface. The goal is to provide an easy set of tools for a software designer to create monitoring or control applications. There are some performance enhancements in the implementation, including data caching, parallel access to bus masters, and aggregation of device communication. Still the fundemental goal has been ease of use, flexibility and correctness rather than speed.  This package contains the OWFS http server.
owipcalc - 3 - The owipcalc utility supports a number of calculations and tests to work with ip-address ranges, this is useful for scripts that e.g. need to partition ipv6-prefixes into small subnets or to calculate address ranges for dhcp pools.
owserver - 2.8p13-1 - OWFS is a suite of programs that designed to make the 1-wire bus and its devices easily accessible. The underlying priciple is to create a virtual filesystem, with the unique ID being the directory, and the individual properties of the device are represented as simple files that can be read and written.  Details of the individual slave or master design are hidden behind a consistent interface. The goal is to provide an easy set of tools for a software designer to create monitoring or control applications. There are some performance enhancements in the implementation, including data caching, parallel access to bus masters, and aggregation of device communication. Still the fundemental goal has been ease of use, flexibility and correctness rather than speed.  This package contains the OWFS network server.
owshell - 2.8p13-1 - OWFS is a suite of programs that designed to make the 1-wire bus and its devices easily accessible. The underlying priciple is to create a virtual filesystem, with the unique ID being the directory, and the individual properties of the device are represented as simple files that can be read and written.  Details of the individual slave or master design are hidden behind a consistent interface. The goal is to provide an easy set of tools for a software designer to create monitoring or control applications. There are some performance enhancements in the implementation, including data caching, parallel access to bus masters, and aggregation of device communication. Still the fundemental goal has been ease of use, flexibility and correctness rather than speed.  This package contains the OWFS shell utilities.
oww - 0.86.1-1 - Oww is a software project, to communicate with the Dallas 1-wire weather station and other 1-wire sensors, presenting live weather readings, logging data to file, uploading data to weather Web sites, and sending data to other programs through a command line interface.
p910nd - 0.95-2 - p910nd is a small daemon that copies any data received on the port it is listening on to the corresponding printer port. It is primarily intended for diskless Linux hosts running as printer drivers but there is no reason why it could not be used on diskful hosts. Port 9100 is copied to /dev/lp0, 9101 to /dev/lp1 and 9102 to /dev/lp2. The default is port 9100 to /dev/lp0.
parasite6 - 0.7-1 - Provides false answers to Neighbor Solitication requests
paris-traceroute - 0.92-1 - Paris traceroute is a new version of the well-known network diagnosis and measurement tool. It addresses problems caused by load balancers with the initial implementation of traceroute.
parprouted - 0.64-5 - parprouted is a daemon for transparent IP (Layer 3) proxy ARP bridging. This is useful for creation of transparent firewalls and bridging networks with different MAC protocols. Also, unlike standard bridging, proxy ARP bridging allows to bridge Ethernet networks behind wireless nodes without using WDS or layer 2 bridging. 
partx-utils - 2.21.2-1 - contains partx, addpart, delpart
patch - 2.5.9-1 - The Patch package contains a program for modifying or creating files by applying a "patch" file typically created by the diff program.
pciutils - 3.1.10-1 - contains collection of programs for inspecting and manipulating configuration of PCI devices
pcscd - 1.8.2-1 - The purpose of PC/SC Lite is to provide a Windows(R) SCard interface in a very small form factor for communicating to smart cards and smart cards readers. . This package contains the PC/SC daemon.
peercast - 0.1214-3 - PeerCast is a fresh new P2P streaming server. It can stream music and video from a broad variety of formats. Many audio players can listen to  peercast streams, as it's been built to remain compatible with Nullsoft  Shoutcast.
peerguardian - 1.5beta-3 - PeerGuardian helps protect your privacy by blocking many ranges  of aggressive IPs while you use P2P.
peervpn - 0-023-1 - PeerVPN is software that builds virtual ethernet networks between multiple computers. Adding a new node to an existing network doesn't require the existing nodes to alter their configuration, because its IP address is automatically distributed across the whole virtual network.
pen - 0.18.0-1 - This is pen, a load balancer for "simple" tcp based protocols such as http or smtp. It allows several servers to appear as one to the outside and automatically detects servers that are down and distributes clients among the available servers. This gives high availability and scalable performance.
pepperspot - 0.4-1 - PepperSpot is a captive portal or wireless LAN access point controller which support the IPv6 protocol. It supports web based login and it supports Wireless Protected Access (WPA). Authentication is handled by your favorite radius server (over IPv4/IPv6).
perl - 5.10.0-7 - Perl is a stable, cross platform programming language. It is used for mission critical projects in the public and private sectors and is widely used to program web applications of all needs.
perl-compress-bzip2 - 2.09-3 - Perl interface to bzip2 compression library
perl-dbi - 1.604-1 - Database independent interface for Perl
perl-html-parser - 3.56-1 - A collection of modules that parse HTML text documents
perl-html-tagset - 3.20-1 - Data tables pertaining to HTML
perl-html-tree - 3.23-2 - represent and create HTML syntax trees
perl-lockfile-simple - 0.206-1 - Simple advisory file locking
perl-net-telnet - 3.03-1 - Telnet client
perl-uri - 1.36-1 - Manipulates and accesses URI strings
perl-www - 5.812-1 - WWW client/server library for Perl (aka LWP)
perl-www-curl - 4.00-1 - Perl bindings to libcurl
perl-www-mechanize - 1.58-1 - Perl WWW Mechanize
perlbase-abbrev - 5.10.0-7 - abbrev perl module
perlbase-anydbm-file - 5.10.0-7 - AnyDBM_File perl module
perlbase-archive - 5.10.0-7 - Archive perl module
perlbase-assert - 5.10.0-7 - assert perl module
perlbase-attribute - 5.10.0-7 - Attribute perl module
perlbase-attributes - 5.10.0-7 - attributes perl module
perlbase-attrs - 5.10.0-7 - attrs perl module
perlbase-autoloader - 5.10.0-7 - AutoLoader perl module
perlbase-autosplit - 5.10.0-7 - AutoSplit perl module
perlbase-autouse - 5.10.0-7 - autouse perl module
perlbase-b - 5.10.0-7 - B perl module
perlbase-base - 5.10.0-7 - base perl module
perlbase-benchmark - 5.10.0-7 - Benchmark perl module
perlbase-bigfloat - 5.10.0-7 - bigfloat perl module
perlbase-bigint - 5.10.0-7 - bigint perl module
perlbase-bignum - 5.10.0-7 - bignum perl module
perlbase-bigrat - 5.10.0-7 - bigrat perl module
perlbase-blib - 5.10.0-7 - blib perl module
perlbase-bytes - 5.10.0-7 - bytes perl module
perlbase-cacheout - 5.10.0-7 - cacheout perl module
perlbase-cgi - 5.10.0-7 - CGI perl module
perlbase-charnames - 5.10.0-7 - charnames perl module
perlbase-class - 5.10.0-7 - Class perl module
perlbase-complete - 5.10.0-7 - complete perl module
perlbase-compress - 5.10.0-7 - Compress perl module
perlbase-config - 5.10.0-7 - Config perl module
perlbase-cpan - 5.10.0-7 - CPAN perl module
perlbase-cpanplus - 5.10.0-7 - CPANPLUS perl module
perlbase-ctime - 5.10.0-7 - ctime perl module
perlbase-cwd - 5.10.0-7 - Cwd perl module
perlbase-data - 5.10.0-7 - Data perl module
perlbase-db - 5.10.0-7 - DB perl module
perlbase-db-file - 5.10.0-7 - DB_File perl module
perlbase-dbm-filter - 5.10.0-7 - DBM_Filter perl module
perlbase-devel - 5.10.0-7 - Devel perl module
perlbase-diagnostics - 5.10.0-7 - diagnostics perl module
perlbase-digest - 5.10.0-7 - Digest perl module
perlbase-dirhandle - 5.10.0-7 - DirHandle perl module
perlbase-dotsh - 5.10.0-7 - dotsh perl module
perlbase-dumpvalue - 5.10.0-7 - Dumpvalue perl module
perlbase-dumpvar - 5.10.0-7 - dumpvar perl module
perlbase-dynaloader - 5.10.0-7 - DynaLoader perl module
perlbase-encode - 5.10.0-7 - Encode perl module
perlbase-encoding - 5.10.0-7 - encoding perl module
perlbase-english - 5.10.0-7 - English perl module
perlbase-env - 5.10.0-7 - Env perl module
perlbase-errno - 5.10.0-7 - Errno perl module
perlbase-essential - 5.10.0-7 - essential perl module
perlbase-exceptions - 5.10.0-7 - exceptions perl module
perlbase-extutils - 5.10.0-7 - ExtUtils perl module
perlbase-fastcwd - 5.10.0-7 - fastcwd perl module
perlbase-fatal - 5.10.0-7 - Fatal perl module
perlbase-fcntl - 5.10.0-7 - Fcntl perl module
perlbase-feature - 5.10.0-7 - feature perl module
perlbase-fields - 5.10.0-7 - fields perl module
perlbase-file - 5.10.0-7 - File perl module
perlbase-filecache - 5.10.0-7 - FileCache perl module
perlbase-filehandle - 5.10.0-7 - FileHandle perl module
perlbase-filetest - 5.10.0-7 - filetest perl module
perlbase-filter - 5.10.0-7 - Filter perl module
perlbase-find - 5.10.0-7 - find perl module
perlbase-findbin - 5.10.0-7 - FindBin perl module
perlbase-finddepth - 5.10.0-7 - finddepth perl module
perlbase-flush - 5.10.0-7 - flush perl module
perlbase-gdbm-file - 5.10.0-7 - GDBM_File perl module
perlbase-getcwd - 5.10.0-7 - getcwd perl module
perlbase-getopt - 5.10.0-7 - Getopt perl module
perlbase-getoptpl - 5.10.0-7 - getoptpl perl module
perlbase-hash - 5.10.0-7 - Hash perl module
perlbase-hostname - 5.10.0-7 - hostname perl module
perlbase-i18n - 5.10.0-7 - I18N perl module
perlbase-if - 5.10.0-7 - if perl module
perlbase-importenv - 5.10.0-7 - importenv perl module
perlbase-integer - 5.10.0-7 - integer perl module
perlbase-io - 5.10.0-7 - IO perl module
perlbase-ipc - 5.10.0-7 - IPC perl module
perlbase-less - 5.10.0-7 - less perl module
perlbase-list - 5.10.0-7 - List perl module
perlbase-locale - 5.10.0-7 - Locale perl module
perlbase-log - 5.10.0-7 - Log perl module
perlbase-look - 5.10.0-7 - look perl module
perlbase-math - 5.10.0-7 - Math perl module
perlbase-memoize - 5.10.0-7 - Memoize perl module
perlbase-mime - 5.10.0-7 - MIME perl module
perlbase-module - 5.10.0-7 - Module perl module
perlbase-mro - 5.10.0-7 - mro perl module
perlbase-net - 5.10.0-7 - Net perl module
perlbase-next - 5.10.0-7 - NEXT perl module
perlbase-o - 5.10.0-7 - O perl module
perlbase-object - 5.10.0-7 - Object perl module
perlbase-opcode - 5.10.0-7 - Opcode perl module
perlbase-open - 5.10.0-7 - open perl module
perlbase-ops - 5.10.0-7 - ops perl module
perlbase-package - 5.10.0-7 - Package perl module
perlbase-params - 5.10.0-7 - Params perl module
perlbase-perl5db - 5.10.0-7 - perl5db perl module
perlbase-perlio - 5.10.0-7 - PerlIO perl module
perlbase-pod - 5.10.0-7 - Pod perl module
perlbase-posix - 5.10.0-7 - POSIX perl module
perlbase-pwd - 5.10.0-7 - pwd perl module
perlbase-re - 5.10.0-7 - re perl module
perlbase-safe - 5.10.0-7 - Safe perl module
perlbase-scalar - 5.10.0-7 - Scalar perl module
perlbase-sdbm-file - 5.10.0-7 - SDBM_File perl module
perlbase-search - 5.10.0-7 - Search perl module
perlbase-selectsaver - 5.10.0-7 - SelectSaver perl module
perlbase-selfloader - 5.10.0-7 - SelfLoader perl module
perlbase-shell - 5.10.0-7 - Shell perl module
perlbase-shellwords - 5.10.0-7 - shellwords perl module
perlbase-sigtrap - 5.10.0-7 - sigtrap perl module
perlbase-socket - 5.10.0-7 - Socket perl module
perlbase-sort - 5.10.0-7 - sort perl module
perlbase-stat - 5.10.0-7 - stat perl module
perlbase-storable - 5.10.0-7 - Storable perl module
perlbase-switch - 5.10.0-7 - Switch perl module
perlbase-symbol - 5.10.0-7 - Symbol perl module
perlbase-sys - 5.10.0-7 - Sys perl module
perlbase-syslog - 5.10.0-7 - syslog perl module
perlbase-tainted - 5.10.0-7 - tainted perl module
perlbase-term - 5.10.0-7 - Term perl module
perlbase-termcap - 5.10.0-7 - termcap perl module
perlbase-test - 5.10.0-7 - Test perl module
perlbase-text - 5.10.0-7 - Text perl module
perlbase-thread - 5.10.0-7 - Thread perl module
perlbase-threads - 5.10.0-7 - threads perl module
perlbase-tie - 5.10.0-7 - Tie perl module
perlbase-time - 5.10.0-7 - Time perl module
perlbase-timelocal - 5.10.0-7 - timelocal perl module
perlbase-unicode - 5.10.0-7 - Unicode perl module
perlbase-unicore - 5.10.0-7 - unicore perl module
perlbase-universal - 5.10.0-7 - UNIVERSAL perl module
perlbase-user - 5.10.0-7 - User perl module
perlbase-utf8 - 5.10.0-7 - utf8 perl module
perlbase-validate - 5.10.0-7 - validate perl module
perlbase-version - 5.10.0-7 - version perl module
perlbase-xsloader - 5.10.0-7 - XSLoader perl module
pgsql-cli - 9.0.1-3 - Command Line Interface (CLI) to PostgreSQL databases.
pgsql-server - 9.0.1-3 - PostgreSQL databases Server.
php-pear - 1.5.4-1 - PEAR
php-pear-db - 1.7.11-1 - PEAR DB module
php-pear-xmlrpc - 1.5.1-1 - PEAR XML-RPC module
php4 - 4.4.9-1 - PHP is a widely-used general-purpose scripting language that is especially suited for Web development and can be embedded into HTML. This package contains only the PHP config file. You must actually choose your PHP flavour (cli, cgi or fastcgi).
php4-cgi - 4.4.9-1 - PHP is a widely-used general-purpose scripting language that is especially suited for Web development and can be embedded into HTML. This package contains the CGI version of the PHP4 interpreter.
php4-cli - 4.4.9-1 - PHP is a widely-used general-purpose scripting language that is especially suited for Web development and can be embedded into HTML. This package contains the CLI version of the PHP4 interpreter.
php4-fastcgi - 4.4.9-1 - PHP is a widely-used general-purpose scripting language that is especially suited for Web development and can be embedded into HTML. This package contains the FastCGI version of the PHP4 interpreter.
php4-mod-curl - 4.4.9-1 - cURL module
php4-mod-ftp - 4.4.9-1 - FTP module
php4-mod-gd - 4.4.9-1 - GD graphics module
php4-mod-ldap - 4.4.9-1 - LDAP module
php4-mod-mysql - 4.4.9-1 - MySQL module
php4-mod-openssl - 4.4.9-1 - OpenSSL module
php4-mod-pcre - 4.4.9-1 - PCRE module
php4-mod-pgsql - 4.4.9-1 - PostgreSQL module
php4-mod-session - 4.4.9-1 - Session module
php4-mod-sockets - 4.4.9-1 - Sockets module
php4-mod-xml - 4.4.9-1 - XML module
php5 - 5.4.5-3 - PHP is a widely-used general-purpose scripting language that is especially suited for Web development and can be embedded into HTML. This package contains only the PHP config file. You must actually choose your PHP flavour (cli, cgi or fastcgi).
php5-cgi - 5.4.5-3 - PHP is a widely-used general-purpose scripting language that is especially suited for Web development and can be embedded into HTML. This package contains the CGI version of the PHP5 interpreter.
php5-cli - 5.4.5-3 - PHP is a widely-used general-purpose scripting language that is especially suited for Web development and can be embedded into HTML. This package contains the CLI version of the PHP5 interpreter.
php5-fastcgi - 5.4.5-3 - As FastCGI support is now a core feature the php5-fastcgi package now depends on the php5-cgi package, containing just the startup script.
php5-mod-apc - 5.4.5-3 - APC shared module
php5-mod-calendar - 5.4.5-3 - Calendar shared module
php5-mod-ctype - 5.4.5-3 - Ctype shared module
php5-mod-curl - 5.4.5-3 - cURL shared module
php5-mod-dio - 5.4.5-3 - Direct IO shared module
php5-mod-dom - 5.4.5-3 - DOM shared module
php5-mod-exif - 5.4.5-3 - EXIF shared module
php5-mod-fileinfo - 5.4.5-3 - Fileinfo shared module
php5-mod-ftp - 5.4.5-3 - FTP shared module
php5-mod-gd - 5.4.5-3 - GD graphics shared module
php5-mod-gettext - 5.4.5-3 - Gettext shared module
php5-mod-hash - 5.4.5-3 - Hash shared module
php5-mod-http - 5.4.5-3 - HTTP shared module
php5-mod-iconv - 5.4.5-3 - iConv shared module
php5-mod-json - 5.4.5-3 - JSON shared module
php5-mod-ldap - 5.4.5-3 - LDAP shared module
php5-mod-libevent - 5.4.5-3 - libevent shared module
php5-mod-mbstring - 5.4.5-3 - MBString shared module
php5-mod-mcrypt - 5.4.5-3 - Mcrypt shared module
php5-mod-mysql - 5.4.5-3 - MySQL shared module
php5-mod-mysqli - 5.4.5-3 - MySQL Improved Extension shared module
php5-mod-openssl - 5.4.5-3 - OpenSSL shared module
php5-mod-pcntl - 5.4.5-3 - PCNTL shared module
php5-mod-pdo - 5.4.5-3 - PHP Data Objects shared module
php5-mod-pdo-mysql - 5.4.5-3 - PDO driver for MySQL shared module
php5-mod-pdo-pgsql - 5.4.5-3 - PDO driver for PostgreSQL shared module
php5-mod-pdo-sqlite - 5.4.5-3 - PDO driver for SQLite 3.x shared module
php5-mod-pgsql - 5.4.5-3 - PostgreSQL shared module
php5-mod-session - 5.4.5-3 - Session shared module
php5-mod-shmop - 5.4.5-3 - Shared Memory shared module
php5-mod-simplexml - 5.4.5-3 - SimpleXML shared module
php5-mod-soap - 5.4.5-3 - SOAP shared module
php5-mod-sockets - 5.4.5-3 - Sockets shared module
php5-mod-sqlite - 5.4.5-3 - SQLite 2.x shared module
php5-mod-sqlite3 - 5.4.5-3 - SQLite3 shared module
php5-mod-sysvmsg - 5.4.5-3 - System V messages shared module
php5-mod-sysvsem - 5.4.5-3 - System V shared memory shared module
php5-mod-sysvshm - 5.4.5-3 - System V semaphore shared module
php5-mod-tokenizer - 5.4.5-3 - Tokenizer shared module
php5-mod-xml - 5.4.5-3 - XML shared module
php5-mod-xmlreader - 5.4.5-3 - XMLReader shared module
php5-mod-xmlwriter - 5.4.5-3 - XMLWriter shared module
php5-mod-zip - 5.4.5-3 - ZIP shared module
pianobar - 2012.01.10-1 - Pianobar is a free/open-source, console-based replacement for Pandoras flash player.
picocom - 1.7-1 - minimal dumb-terminal emulation program
pipacs - 2 - UNIX socket accounting/wiewer program
pmacct-client - 0.14.0-1 - Command-line client to gather data from the IMT plugin
pmacctd - 0.14.0-1 - IP pcap-based accounting daemon
pmacctd-mysql - 0.14.0-1 - IP pcap-based accounting daemon with MySQL support
pmacctd-pgsql - 0.14.0-1 - IP pcap-based accounting daemon with PostgreSQL support
pmacctd-sqlite - 0.14.0-1 - IP pcap-based accounting daemon with SQLite support
polarssl-progs - 1.2.5-1 - The aim of the PolarSSL project is to provide a quality, open-source cryptographic library written in C and targeted at embedded systems. This package contains the PolarSSL programs.
polipo - 1.0.4.1-3 - Polipo is a small and fast caching web proxy (a web cache, an HTTP proxy, a proxy server). While Polipo was designed to be used by one person or a  small group of people, there is nothing that prevents it from being used  by a larger group.
portmap - 6.0-3 - Portmap is a server that converts RPC (Remote Procedure Call) program numbers into DARPA protocol port numbers.
portsentry - 1.2-2 - Portscan protection utility
powertop - 1.11-2 - PowerTOP is a Linux tool that helps you find those programs that are misbehaving while your computer is idle.
ppp - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains the PPP (Point-to-Point Protocol) daemon.
ppp-mod-pppoa - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains a PPPoA (PPP over ATM) plugin for ppp.
ppp-mod-pppoe - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains a PPPoE (PPP over Ethernet) plugin for ppp.
ppp-mod-pppol2tp - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains a PPPoL2TP (PPP over L2TP) plugin for ppp.
ppp-mod-pptp - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains a PPtP plugin for ppp.
ppp-mod-radius - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains a RADIUS (Remote Authentication Dial-In User Service) plugin for ppp.
ppp-multilink - 2.4.5-10 - PPP daemon (with multilink support)
pppdump - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains an utility to read PPP record file.
pppstats - 2.4.5-10 - This package contains an utility to report PPP statistics.
pptpd - 1.3.4-2 - PopTop pptp server
procmail - 3.22-1 - Procmail is able to process and classify incoming mail into different mail boxes. Very useful in conjunction with mutt.
procps - 3.2.8-1 - procps is the package that has a bunch of small useful utilities that give information about processes using the /proc filesystem. The package  includes the programs ps, top, vmstat, w, kill, free, slabtop, and skill.
proftpd - 1.3.4b-1 - ProFTPD FTP server
prosody - 0.6.2-2 - Prosody is an exciting new server for Jabber/XMPP written in Lua. It aims to be easy to use, and light on resources
psmisc - 22.16-1 - psmisc is a set of additional small useful utilities that use the proc filesystem: fuser, killall, pstree, and prtstat
psplash - 0.1-2 - PSplash is a userspace graphical boot splash screen.
psybnc - 2.3.2-7-2 - psyBNC is an easy-to-use, multi-user, permanent IRC-Bouncer with many features. Some of its features  vhost- and relay support to connected bouncers and an  extensive online help system. Many other helpful  functions are included.
ptpd - 2.1.0-2 - The PTP daemon (PTPd) implements version 2 of the Precision Time Protocol (PTP) as defined by the IEEE 1588-2008 standard. PTP was developed to provide very precise time coordination of LAN connected computers.
ptrtd - 0.5.2-2 - The Portable Transport Relay Translator Daemon (pTRTd) is a method of allowing IPv6 hosts to communicate with IPv4 hosts.
puppy - 1.14-1 - Client to access Topfield PVRs via the USB port
pv - 1.2.0-1 - Pipe Viewer is a terminal-based tool for monitoring the progress of data through a pipeline. It can be inserted into any normal pipeline between two processes to give a visual indication of how quickly data is passing through, how long it has taken, how near to completion it is, and an estimate of how long it will be until completion.
pwcrypt - 1.2.2-1 - A wrapper for the unix crypt() function. Supports crypt and MD5 hashing
pwgen - 2.06-1 - pwgen generates random, meaningless but pronounceable passwords. These passwords contain either only lowercase letters, or upper and lower case mixed, or digits thrown in. Uppercase letters and digits are placed in a way that eases remembering their position when memorizing only the word.  E.g. to generate a WPA preshared-key do: pwgen -c -n -s 63 1
px5g - 1 - Px5g is a tiny standalone X.509 certificate generator. It suitable to create key files and certificates in DER and PEM format for use with stunnel, uhttpd and others.
pyclips - 1.0.7.348-1 - Python module to interface the CLIPS expert system shell library.
pyopenssl - 0.10-1 - Python interface to the OpenSSL library.
pyrit - 0.4.0-1 - A GPGPU-driven WPA/WPA2-PSK key cracker Pyrit exploits the computational power of many-core- and GPGPU- -platforms to create massive databases, pre-computing part of the  WPA/WPA2-PSK authentication phase in a space-time tradeoff.  It is a powerful attack against one of the world's most used security protocols
pyrrd - 0.1.0-2 - An Object-Oriented Python Interface for RRDTool
pyserial - 2.4-1 - serial port python bindings
python - 2.7.3-3 - Python is a dynamic object-oriented programming language that can be used for many kinds of software development. It offers strong support for integration with other languages and tools, comes with extensive standard libraries, and can be learned in a few days. Many Python programmers report substantial productivity gains and feel the language encourages the development of higher quality, more maintainable code. . This package contains the full Python install.
python-bluez - 0.13-1 - Python wrapper for the BlueZ Bluetooth stack
python-bzip2 - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for Bzip2
python-cjson - 1.0.5-1 - Fast JSON encoder/decoder for Python
python-curl - 7.19.0-1 - Python module interface to the cURL library.
python-cwiid - 0.6.00-2 - Python bindings for the cwiid libs
python-django - 1.3.1-1 - Django is a high-level Python Web framework that encourages rapid development and clean, pragmatic design.
python-doc - 2.7.3-3 - Python interactive documentation
python-eeml - 20111202-1 - A python package for generating eeml documents.
python-egenix-mx - 2.0.6-1 - This package contains a set of base packages from Egenix required by other python packages.
python-event - 0.3-1 - Python interface to libevent
python-expat - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for expat
python-firmata - 0.9.5-1 - Python module interface to the Firmata library.
python-flup - 1.0.2-1 - Random assortment of WSGI servers
python-gdbm - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for gdbm
python-gobject - 2.16.0-1 - GLib bindings for python
python-gzip - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for gzip
python-ifconfig - 0.1-2 - Display network interface status.
python-imaging-library - 1.1.7-2 - The Python Imaging Library adds image processing capabilities to your Python interpreter. . This library provides extensive file format support, an efficient internal representation, and fairly powerful image processing capabilities. . The core image library is designed for fast access to data stored in a few basic pixel formats. It should provide a solid foundation for a general image processing tool.
python-json - 3_4-1 - json-py
python-kid - 0.9.6-1 - Kid is a simple template language for XML based vocabularies written in Python.
python-mimms - 3.2.1-1 - mimms is an mms (e.g. mms://) stream downloader
python-mini - 2.7.3-3 - Python is a dynamic object-oriented programming language that can be used for many kinds of software development. It offers strong support for integration with other languages and tools, comes with extensive standard libraries, and can be learned in a few days. Many Python programmers report substantial productivity gains and feel the language encourages the development of higher quality, more maintainable code. . This package contains only a minimal Python install.
python-mysql - 1.2.2-1 - MySQLdb is an thread-compatible interface to the popular MySQL database server that provides the Python database API.
python-ncurses - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for readline
python-openssl - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for OpenSSL
python-pcap - 1.1-1 - Python interface to lipcap
python-psycopg - 1.1.21-1 - This package contains is a PostgreSQL database adapter for the Python programming language.
python-pyosc - 0.3.5b-5294-1 - A simple OpenSoundControl implementation in pure Python
python-shutil - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for shutil
python-sip - 4.12.1-1 - Python SIP
python-smbus - 3.0.3-1 - This package contains an heterogeneous set of I2C tools for Linux.  This package contain the python bindings for Linux SMBus access through i2c-dev.
python-sqlite - 2.3.5-1 - This package contains an SQLite database adapter for the Python programming language.
python-sqlite3 - 2.7.3-3 - Python support for sqlite3
python-webpy - 0.37-2 - python-webpy
python-xapian - 1.2.8-1 - xapian python bindings
python-yapsnmp - 0.7.8-1 - This package contains a Python SNMP module based on the net-snmp (formerly known as ucd-snmp) library. It's composed of a low level interface to the  library, created using SWIG, and a higher level python module removing all  the complexity out of dealing with SNMP.
python2-chardet - 2.0.1-1 - Character encoding auto-detection in Python.
pyusb - 0.4.2-1 - usb port python bindings
pyxdg - 0.18-1 - A Python module to deal with freedesktop.org specifications
pyyaml - 3.08-1 - yaml python bindings
qolyester - 20090302-1 - This is an implementation from scratch of the OLSR protocol. It is written in the C++ programming language and its goals are modularity, efficiency and conformance to RFC 3626 (OLSR).
qos-scripts - 1.2.1-6 - A set of scripts that abstract QoS configuration into a simple configuration file supporting stanzas that specify any number of QoS  entries.
quicktun - 2.1.7-2 - QuickTun is a simple and secure VPN software
raddump - 0.3.1-1 - raddump interprets captured RADIUS packets to print a timestamp, packet length, RADIUS packet type, source and  destination hosts and ports, and included attribute names and  values for each packet.
radiusclient-ng - 0.5.6-1 - Purpose of this project is to build a portable, easy-to-use and standard compliant library suitable for developing free and commercial  software that need support for RADIUS protocol (RFCs 2128 and 2139). This package contains a RADIUS client.
radlib - 2.12.0-1 - radlib is a rapid application development library for unix multi-process applications
radsecproxy - 1.5-2 - A generic radius proxy for UDP/TLS (RadSec)
radvd - 1.9.1-2 - radvd is the router advertisement daemon for IPv6. It listens to router solicitations and sends router advertisements as described in "Neighbor Discovery for IP Version 6 (IPv6)" (RFC 4861).  With these advertisements hosts can automatically configure their addresses and some other parameters. They also can choose a default router based on these advertisements.
radvdump - 1.9.1-2 - radvdump prints out the contents of incoming router advertisements sent by radvd or some other software implementing (parts of) "Neighbor Discovery for IP Version 6 (IPv6)" (RFC 4861).
rarpd - 1.1-4 - Rarpd is a daemon which responds to RARP requests. RARP is used by some machines at boot time to discover their IP address. They provide their Ethernet address and rarpd responds with their IP address if it finds it in the ethers database.
rbcfg - 1 - This package contains an utility to manipulate RouterBOOT configuration on the MikroTIK RB-4XX devices.
rcs - 5.7-2 - The GNU Revision Control System
rdiff-backup - 1.2.8-1 - rdiff-backup backs up one directory to another, possibly over a network. The target directory ends up a copy of the source directory, but extra reverse diffs are stored in a special subdirectory of that target directory, so you can still recover files lost some time ago. The idea is to combine the best features of a mirror and an incremental backup.
rdisc6 - 1.0.2-1 - An ICMPv6 router discovery tool
rdnssd - 1.0.2-1 - A recursive DNS server discovery daemon gathering information through stateless IPv6 autoconfiguration (RFC5006)
reaim - 0.8-3 - ReAIM is a proxy for file transfers with MSN/AIM.
reaver - r113-1 - Reaver targets the external registrar functionality mandated by the WiFi Protected Setup specification. Access points will provide authenticated registrars with their current wireless configuration (including the WPA PSK), and also accept a new configuration from the registrar.
redir - 2.2.1-1 - A port redirector, used to forward incoming connections to somewhere else.
redir6 - 0.7-1 - Inject IPv6 routes to redirect traffic to other routers
reiserfsprogs - 3.6.21-1 - This package contains utilities to create, check, resize, and debug ReiserFS filesystems.
relayd - 2011-10-24-4e8f1fa4ca2b176500362843a9e57ea5abd4b7a3 - Transparent routing / relay daemon
remind - 03.01.12-1 - Remind is a powerfull commadline reminder.
remote-update - 4 - The freifunk remote-update utility uses sysupgrade to reflash the currently running firmware while keeping most of the existing configuratio.
rename - 2.21.2-1 - rename will rename the specified files by replacing the first occurrence of expression in their name by replacement
resize2fs - 1.42.4-1 - Ext2 Filesystem resize utility
resolveip - 2 - This package contains the small resolveip utility which can be used by scripts to turn host names into numeric IP addresses. It supports IPv4 and IPv6 resolving and has a configurable timeout to guarantee a certain maximum runtime in case of slow or defunct DNS servers.
restorefactory - 1-6 - RestoreFactory handles the reset button event and issues a "firstboot" command. Button and wait time can be configured with a UCI file.
rinetd - 0.62-2 - Rinetd redirects TCP connections from one IP address and port to another. Rinetd is a single-process server which handles any number of connections to the address/port pairs specified in the configuration. Since rinetd runs as a single process using nonblocking I/O, it is able to redirect a large number of connections without a severe impact on the machine.
rng-tools - 3-2 - Daemon for adding entropy to kernel entropy pool
robocfg - 0.01-1 - This package contains an utility for configuring the Broadcom BCM5325E/536x based switches.
rrdtool - 1.2.30-3 - Round Robin Database (RRD) management tools (v1.2.x)
rrdtool1 - 1.0.50-2 - RRD is the Acronym for Round Robin Database. RRD is a system to store and display time-series data (i.e. network bandwidth, machine-room temperature, server load average). It stores the data in a very compact way that will not expand over time, and it presents useful graphs by processing the data to enforce a certain data density. It can be used either via simple wrapper scripts (from shell or Perl) or via frontends that poll network devices and put friendly user interface on it.  This is version 1.0.x with cgilib-0.4, gd1.3 and libpng-1.0.9 linked into librrd.so. The library is much smaller compared to the 1.2.x version with separate dynamic linked libraries. This package contains command line tools used to manage RRDs.
rrs - 1.70-2 - A reverse (connecting) remote shell (with SSL support)
rrs-nossl - 1.70-2 - A reverse (connecting) remote shell (without SSL support)
rsmurf6 - 0.7-1 - Smurf the local network of a target host by exploiting Linux implementation errors
rssh - 2.3.3-1 - rssh is a restricted shell for use with OpenSSH, allowing only scp and/or sftp. It now also includes support for rdist, rsync, and cvs. For example, if you have a server which you only want to allow users to copy files off of via scp, without providing shell access, you can use rssh to do that.
rssileds - 0.1-1 - A small process written in C to update the signal-strength indicator LEDs
rsync - 3.0.9-1 - rsync is a program that allows files to be copied to and from remote machines in much the same way as rcp. It has many more options than rcp, and uses the rsync remote-update protocol to greatly speed up file transfers when the destination file already exists.  The rsync remote-update protocol allows rsync to transfer just the differences between two sets of files across the network link.
rsyncd - 3.0.9-1 - rsyncd is a configuration file and initscript to utilize rsync as a daemon. It uses the same binary as rsync.
rsyncrypto - 1.12-1 - rsyncrypto is a utility that encrypts a file (or a directory structure) in a way that ensures that local changes to the plain text file will result in local changes to the cipher text file. This, in turn, ensures that doing rsync to synchronize the encrypted files to another machine will have only a small impact on rsync's efficiency.
ruby - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby is the interpreted scripting language for quick and  easy object-oriented programming.  It has many features to process text files  and to do system management tasks (as in perl).  It is simple,  straight-forward, and extensible.
ruby-cgi - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby CGI support toolkit
ruby-core - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby standard libraries
ruby-dl - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby scripting language (dynamic linker support) (adds 5MB+)
ruby-enc - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby scripting language (character re-coding library) (adds 2MB+)
ruby-erb - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby scripting language (embedded interpreter)
ruby-gdbm - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby support for gdbm
ruby-gems - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby gems packet management
ruby-irb - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby scripting language (interactive shell)
ruby-json - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby support for JSON
ruby-ncurses - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby support for ncurses
ruby-nkf - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby Network Kanji Filter
ruby-openssl - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby support for openssl
ruby-rake - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby scripting language Ruby Rake (make replacement)
ruby-rdoc - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby scripting language (documentation generator)
ruby-readline - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby support for readline
ruby-rexml - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby XML toolkit
ruby-rss - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby RSS toolkit
ruby-unit - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby unit testing toolkit
ruby-webrick - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby Web server toolkit
ruby-xmlrpc - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby XML-RPC toolkit
ruby-yaml - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby YAML toolkit
ruby-zlib - 1.9.2-p0-1 - Ruby support for zlib
samba36-client - 3.6.5-3 - Samba 3.6 SMB/CIFS client
samba36-server - 3.6.5-3 - The Samba software suite is a collection of programs that implements the SMB protocol for UNIX systems, allowing you to serve files and printers to Windows, NT, OS/2 and DOS clients. This protocol is sometimes also referred to as the LanManager or Netbios protocol.
scanlogd - 2.2.6-2 - Scanlogd is a TCP port scan detection tool, originally designed to illustrate various attacks an IDS developer has to deal with. Thus, unlike some of the other port scan detection tools out there,  scanlogd is designed to be totally safe to use.
scdp - 1.0b-1 - This program sends CDP (Cisco Discovery Protocol) packets out on selected interfaces and tells the connected switch (cisco only) where the host is connected.
schedtool - 1.3.0-1 - Scheduler control utility
scmpc - 0.2.2-4 - scmpc is a multithreaded, robust client for MPD to submit tracks to Audioscrobbler (Last.fm).
scponly - 4.8-2 - "scponly" is an alternative 'shell' (of sorts) for system administrators who would like to provide access to remote users to both read and write local files without providing any remote execution priviledges. Functionally, it is best described as a wrapper to the mostly trusted suite of ssh applications.
screen - 4.0.3-3 - Screen is a full-screen window manager that multiplexes a physical terminal between several processes, typically interactive shells.
script-utils - 2.21.2-1 - contains: script, scriptreplay
sctp - 1.0.11-1 - SCTP user-land library for sctp_* functions (when socket API is too limited).
sdparm - 1.04-1 - The sdparm utility outputs and in some cases modifies SCSI device parameters.
sed - 4.2.1-1 - Sed (streams editor) takes text input and performs some operation (or set of operations) on it and outputs the modified text.
send - 0.2-5.4-1 - DoCoMo's Open Source SEND project provides an implementation of RFC 3971 Secure Neighbor Discovery (SEND). SEND cryptographically secures the IPv6 neighbor discovery protocol, countering the threats discussed in RFC 3756 (IPv6 Neighbor Discovery (ND) Trust Models and Threats).
send-nsca - 2.7.2-1 - This is the client program that is used to send service check information from a remote machine to the nsca daemon on the central machine that runs Nagios.
ser2net - 2.7-2 - This is ser2net, a program for allowing network connections to serial ports. See the man page for information about using the program. Note that ser2net supports RFC 2217 (remote control of serial port parameters), but you must have a complient client.
serdisplib - 1.97.9-1 - serdisplib is a library to drive serial and parallel displays with built-in controllers.
serialoverip - 1.0-1 - Tool for transport of serial interfaces over UDP/IP. Usefull for accessing a distant serial device by a local program.
setpwc - 1.3-1 - With setpwc you can set and list various settings of Philips (and compatibles) WebCams with the 'PWC chipset'.
setserial - 2.17-2 - setserial is a program designed to set and/or report the configuration information associated with a serial port. This  information includes what I/O port and IRQ a particular  serial port is using, and whether or not the break key should  be interpreted as the Secure Attention Key, and so on.
setterm - 2.21.2-1 - setterm writes to standard output a character string that will invoke the specified terminal capabilities
sfacctd - 0.14.0-1 - sFlow accounting daemon
sfacctd-mysql - 0.14.0-1 - sFlow accounting daemon with MySQL support
sfacctd-pgsql - 0.14.0-1 - sFlow accounting daemon with PostgreSQL support
sfacctd-sqlite - 0.14.0-1 - sFlow accounting daemon with SQLite support
sfdisk - 2.21.2-1 - list the size of a partition, list the partitions on a device, check the partitions on a device and repartition a device
sflowovsd - 1.20-1 - The Host sFlow agent can automatically configure the sFlow settings in the Open vSwitch.
sg3-utils - 1.24-1 - The package includes a number of utilities to allow a user to use the sg interface to find out low-level information about any SCSI device.
shadow - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full versions of standard shadow utilities.  Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient and much smaller.
shadow-common - 4.1.5.1-1 - Shared definitions for the shadow utilities
shadow-groupadd - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard groupadd utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-groupdel - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard groupdel utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-groupmod - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard groupmod utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-groups - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard groups utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-passwd - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard passwd utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-su - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard su utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-useradd - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard useradd utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-userdel - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard userdel utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shadow-usermod - 4.1.5.1-1 - Full version of standard usermod utility. Normally, you would not use this package, since the functionality in BusyBox is more than sufficient.
shat - 0.9.7-1 - A tool which allows hosts with arbitrary IP configuration to connect to the internet over a SHAT gateway. 
shell-fm - 0.7-1 - Shell.FM is a console based player for the streams provided by Last.FM for the Linux platform. It's lightweight and easy to use.
shorewall-lite - 4.4.27.3-4 - Shoreline Firewall Lite is an iptables-based firewall for Linux systems.
shorewall6-lite - 4.4.22.2-2 - Shoreline Firewall 6 Lite is an iptables-based firewall for Linux systems.
sigscheme - 0.8.3-2 - SigScheme is a R5RS Scheme interpreter for embedded use. It features small footprint (64KB in library form on the 'small' configuration) like SIOD and TinyScheme, low memory consumption (2-words per cons cell), multibyte characters handling (UTF-8, EUCs and Shift_JIS) and more.
simplejson - 2.2.1-1 - Simple, fast, extensible JSON encoder/decoder for Python
slsh - 2.2.4-1 - S-Lang Shell
slurm - 0.3.3-1 - A realtime network interface monitor with the following features: - realtime traffic statistics divided into incoming and outgoing ; - optional combined view ; - can monitor any kind of network interface ; - shows detailed statistics about the interface ; - it's themeable.
smap - 0.6.0-2 - Discovers and identifies SIP devices on the network including hardware phones, softphones, PBX software, and PBX equipment.
smap-to-devinfo - 1.0.0-2 - A script to use smap to discover all SIP devices on the networks (provided ICMP and SIP are allowed to the network from the host) and translate (through the ip then mac) into the device information.
smartd - 5.40-3 - smartmontools contains utility programs (smartd) to control/monitor storage systems using the Self-Monitoring, Analysis and Reporting Technology System (S.M.A.R.T.) built into most modern ATA and SCSI disks. It is derived from smartsuite.
smartmontools - 5.40-3 - smartmontools contains utility programs (smartctl) to control/monitor storage systems using the Self-Monitoring, Analysis and Reporting Technology System (S.M.A.R.T.) built into most modern ATA and SCSI disks. It is derived from smartsuite.
smcroute - 0.92-1 - SMCRoute is a command line tool to manipulate the multicast routes of the Linux kernel.
smtptrapd - 1.5-2 - The smtptrapd program is a multi-threaded daemon that provides a RFC 2821 compliant SMTP service that always returns a 4xx soft  error to the RCPT TO verb.
smurf6 - 0.7-1 - Smurf the target or all-nodes multicast group with ICMPv6 echo replies
snmp-utils - 5.4.2.1-5 - Simple Network Management Protocol (SNMP) is a widely used protocol for monitoring the health and welfare of network equipment (eg. routers), computer equipment and even devices like UPSs. Net-SNMP is a suite of applications used to implement SNMP v1, SNMP v2c and SNMP v3 using both IPv4 and IPv6. . This package contains SNMP client utilities.
snmpd - 5.4.2.1-5 - Simple Network Management Protocol (SNMP) is a widely used protocol for monitoring the health and welfare of network equipment (eg. routers), computer equipment and even devices like UPSs. Net-SNMP is a suite of applications used to implement SNMP v1, SNMP v2c and SNMP v3 using both IPv4 and IPv6. . This package contains the SNMP agent, dynamically linked.
snort - 2.9.2.2-2 - Snort is an open source network intrusion detection and prevention system. It is capable of performing real-time traffic analysis, alerting, blocking and packet logging on IP networks.  It utilizes a combination of protocol analysis and pattern matching in order to detect anomalies, misuse and attacks.
snort-mysql - 2.9.2.2-2 - Snort is an open source network intrusion detection and prevention system. It is capable of performing real-time traffic analysis, alerting, blocking and packet logging on IP networks.  It utilizes a combination of protocol analysis and pattern matching in order to detect anomalies, misuse and attacks. This package contains snort with support for logging to a MySQL database.
snort-pgsql - 2.9.2.2-2 - Snort is an open source network intrusion detection and prevention system. It is capable of performing real-time traffic analysis, alerting, blocking and packet logging on IP networks.  It utilizes a combination of protocol analysis and pattern matching in order to detect anomalies, misuse and attacks. This package contains snort with support for logging to a PostgreSQL database.
snort-wireless - 2.4.3-alpha04-1 - Lightweight Network Intrusion Detection System
snort-wireless-mysql - 2.4.3-alpha04-1 - Lightweight Network Intrusion Detection System (MySQL)
snort-wireless-pgsql - 2.4.3-alpha04-1 - Lightweight Network Intrusion Detection System (PostgreSQL)
socat - 1.7.2.1-1 - SoCat (for SOcket CAT) establishes two bidirectional byte streams and transfers data between them. Data channels may be files, pipes, devices (terminal or modem, etc.), or sockets (Unix, IPv4, IPv6, raw, UDP, TCP, SSL). It provides forking, logging and tracing, different modes for interprocess communication and many more options.
softflowd - 0.9.8-3 - Software netflow exporter
sox - 14.4.0-1 - SoX is a command line utility that can convert various formats of computer audio files in to other formats. It can also apply various effects to these sound files during the conversion. As an added bonus, SoX can play and record audio files on several unix-style platforms.
spacebrew - 2.3.0-1 - Flexible routing and re-routing between anything that can speak over Websockets.
spidev-test - 3.3.8-3.3.8 - SPI testing utility.
sqlite2-cli - 2.8.17-2 - SQLite is a small C library that implements a self-contained, embeddable, zero-configuration SQL database engine.	 This package contains a terminal-based front-end to the SQLite (v2.x) library  that can evaluate queries interactively and display the results in  multiple formats.
sqlite3-cli - 3071201-1 - SQLite is a small C library that implements a self-contained, embeddable, zero-configuration SQL database engine. This package contains a terminal-based front-end to the SQLite (v3.x) library that can evaluate queries interactively and display the results in multiple formats.
ss - 3.3.0-2 - Socket statistics utility
sscep - 20040325+ng2-1 - A Simple SCEP (Simple Certificate Enrollment Protocol) client
sshfs - 2.2-1 - Mount remote system over sftp.
sshtunnel - 3-3 - Creates openssh ssh(1) Local and Remote tunnels configured in UCI file. Can be used to allow remote connections, possibly over NATed connections or without public IP/DNS
sslcat - 0.1-1 - SSLCat is a simple Unix utility that reads and writes data across an SSL enable network connection.
ssldump - 0.9b3 - ssldump is an SSLv3/TLS network protocol analyzer. It identifies TCP connections on the chosen network interface and attempts to interpret them as SSLv3/TLS traffic. When it identifies SSLv3/TLS traffic, it decodes the records and displays them in a textual form to stdout. If provided with the appropriate keying material, it will also decrypt the connections and display the application data traffic. 
sslh - 1.10-2 - SSL/SSH multiplexer
sslsniff - 0.5-1 - sslsniff is designed to MITM all SSL connections on a LAN, and dynamically generates certs for the domains that are being accessed on the fly. The new certificates are constructed in a certificate chain that is signed by any certificate that you provide.
sslstrip - 0.7-1 - sslstrip will transparently hijack HTTP traffic on a network, watch for HTTPS links and redirects, then map those links into either look-alike HTTP links or homograph-similar HTTPS links. It also supports modes for supplying a favicon which looks like a lock icon, selective logging, and session denial.
ssltunnel - 1.16-1 - SSLTunnel is a client/server program to create a PPP connection over a SSL/TLS session. Client and server are mutually authenticated using a X509 certificate, PPP packets are then encrypted/decrypted realtime on each side. It's possible to use ssltunnel to connect a machine to another, a machine with a network or two networks sets.
ssmtp - 2.64-4 - A secure, effective and simple way of getting mail off a system to your mail hub. It contains no suid-binaries or other dangerous things - no mail spool to poke around in, and no daemons running in the background. mail is simply forwarded to the configured mailhost. Extremely easy configuration.
st2205tool - 1.4.3-2 - Library for hacked photo-frames based on st220xu chipset. You may use those photo-frames with mplayer or LCD4Linux
strace - 4.5.20-1 - A useful diagnostic, instructional, and debugging tool. Allows you to track what system calls a program makes while it is running.
streamripper - 1.62.0-3 - Streamripper is an Open Source application that lets you record streaming mp3 to your hard drive.
stress - 1.0.4-1 - stress is a simple tool that imposes certain types of compute \ stress on UNIX-like operating systems.
strongswan - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan is an OpenSource IPsec implementation for the Linux operating system. This package contains shared libraries and scripts.
strongswan-charon - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan is an OpenSource IPsec implementation for the Linux operating system. This package contains charon, an IKEv2 keying daemon.
strongswan-default - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan is an OpenSource IPsec implementation for the Linux operating system. This meta-package contains only dependencies to match upstream defaults.
strongswan-libfast - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan is an OpenSource IPsec implementation for the Linux operating system. This package contains libfast, a lightweight framework to build native web applications using ClearSilver and FastCGI.
strongswan-minimal - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan is an OpenSource IPsec implementation for the Linux operating system. This meta-package contains only dependencies for a minimal IKEv2 setup.
strongswan-mod-addrblock - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan RFC 3779 address block constraint support plugin
strongswan-mod-aes - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan AES crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-af-alg - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan AF_ALG crypto interface to Linux Crypto API plugin
strongswan-mod-agent - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan SSH agent signing plugin
strongswan-mod-attr - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan file based config plugin
strongswan-mod-attr-sql - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan SQL based config plugin
strongswan-mod-blowfish - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan Blowfish crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-ccm - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan CCM AEAD wrapper crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-cmac - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan CMAC crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-constraints - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan advanced X509 constraint checking plugin
strongswan-mod-coupling - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan IKEv2 plugin to couple peer certificates permanently to authentication plugin
strongswan-mod-ctr - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan Counter Mode wrapper crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-curl - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan cURL fetcher plugin plugin
strongswan-mod-des - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan DES crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-dhcp - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan DHCP based attribute provider plugin
strongswan-mod-dnskey - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan DNS RR key decoding plugin
strongswan-mod-duplicheck - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan advanced duplicate checking plugin
strongswan-mod-eap-identity - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan EAP identity helper plugin
strongswan-mod-eap-md5 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan EAP MD5 (CHAP) EAP auth plugin
strongswan-mod-eap-mschapv2 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan EAP MS-CHAPv2 EAP auth plugin
strongswan-mod-farp - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan fake arp respsonses plugin
strongswan-mod-fips-prf - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan FIPS PRF crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-gcm - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan GCM AEAD wrapper crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-gcrypt - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan libgcrypt plugin
strongswan-mod-gmp - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan libgmp plugin
strongswan-mod-ha - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan high availability cluster plugin
strongswan-mod-hmac - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan HMAC crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-kernel-klips - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan KLIPS kernel interface plugin
strongswan-mod-kernel-netlink - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan netlink kernel interface plugin
strongswan-mod-kernel-pfkey - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan PK_KEY kernel interface plugin
strongswan-mod-ldap - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan LDAP plugin
strongswan-mod-led - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan LED blink on IKE activity plugin
strongswan-mod-load-tester - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan load testing plugin
strongswan-mod-md4 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan MD4 crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-md5 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan MD5 crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-mysql - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan MySQL database interface plugin
strongswan-mod-nonce - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan nonce genereation plugin
strongswan-mod-openssl - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan OpenSSL crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-pem - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan PEM decoding plugin
strongswan-mod-pgp - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan PGP key decoding plugin
strongswan-mod-pkcs1 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan PKCS1 key decoding plugin
strongswan-mod-pkcs11 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan PKCS11 key decoding plugin
strongswan-mod-pkcs8 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan PKCS8 key decoding plugin
strongswan-mod-pubkey - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan raw public key plugin
strongswan-mod-random - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan RNG plugin
strongswan-mod-resolve - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan DNS resolver plugin
strongswan-mod-revocation - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan X509 CRL/OCSP revocation plugin
strongswan-mod-sha1 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan SHA1 crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-sha2 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan SHA2 crypto plugin
strongswan-mod-smp - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan SMP configuration and control interface plugin
strongswan-mod-socket-default - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan default socket implementation for charon plugin
strongswan-mod-socket-dynamic - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan dynamic socket implementation for charon plugin
strongswan-mod-sql - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan SQL database interface plugin
strongswan-mod-sqlite - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan SQLite database interface plugin
strongswan-mod-stroke - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan Stroke plugin
strongswan-mod-test-vectors - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan crypto test vectors plugin
strongswan-mod-uci - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan UCI config interface plugin
strongswan-mod-updown - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan updown firewall plugin
strongswan-mod-whitelist - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan peer identity whitelisting plugin
strongswan-mod-x509 - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan x509 certificate plugin
strongswan-mod-xauth-eap - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan EAP XAuth backend plugin
strongswan-mod-xauth-generic - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan generic XAuth backend plugin
strongswan-mod-xcbc - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan xcbc crypto plugin
strongswan-utils - 5.1.3-1 - StrongSwan is an OpenSource IPsec implementation for the Linux operating system. This package contains the pki & scepclient utilities.
stun-client - 0.96-6 - The STUN protocol (Simple Traversal of UDP through NATs) is described in the IETF RFC 3489, available at http://www.ietf.org/rfc/rfc3489.txt. It's used to help clients behind NAT to tunnel incoming calls through. This server is the counterpart to help the client identify the NAT and have it open the proper ports for it.
stund - 0.96-6 - The STUN protocol (Simple Traversal of UDP through NATs) is described in the IETF RFC 3489, available at http://www.ietf.org/rfc/rfc3489.txt. It's used to help clients behind NAT to tunnel incoming calls through. This server is the counterpart to help the client identify the NAT and have it open the proper ports for it.
stunnel - 4.33-1 - Stunnel is a program that allows you to encrypt arbitrary TCP connections inside SSL (Secure Sockets Layer) available on both Unix and Windows. Stunnel can allow you to secure non-SSL aware daemons and protocols (like POP, IMAP, LDAP, etc) by having Stunnel provide the encryption, requiring no changes to the daemon's code.
subversion-client - 1.6.17-3 - Subversion is a free/open-source version control system. That is, Subversion manages files and directories, and the changes made to them, over time. This allows you to recover older versions of your data, or examine the history of how your data changed. In this regard, many people think of a version control system as a sort of time machine. This package contains the subversion client tools.
subversion-libs - 1.6.17-3 - Subversion is a free/open-source version control system. That is, Subversion manages files and directories, and the changes made to them, over time. This allows you to recover older versions of your data, or examine the history of how your data changed. In this regard, many people think of a version control system as a sort of time machine. This package contains the subversion libraries.
subversion-server - 1.6.17-3 - Subversion is a free/open-source version control system. That is, Subversion manages files and directories, and the changes made to them, over time. This allows you to recover older versions of your data, or examine the history of how your data changed. In this regard, many people think of a version control system as a sort of time machine. This package contains the subversion server.
sudo - 1.7.8p1-1 - Sudo (su "do") allows a system administrator to delegate authority to give certain users (or groups of users) the ability to run some (or all) commands as root or another user while providing an audit trail of the commands and their arguments.
swap-utils - 2.21.2-1 - contains: mkswap, swaplabel, swapon, swapoff
swconfig - 10 - Switch configuration utility
swddude - 1.1-1 - SWDDUDE is a full featured program for programming ARM CPU on SWD bus.
synce-dccm - 0.9.1-2 - Description TBD
sysfsutils - 2.1.0-2 - A utility built upon libsysfs that lists devices by bus, class, and topology.
syslog-ng - 1.6.12-6 - syslog-ng reads and logs messages to the system console, log files, other machines and/or users as specified by its configuration file.
syslog-ng3 - 3.0.5-5 - syslog-ng reads and logs messages to the system console, log files, other machines and/or users as specified by its configuration file.
sysstat - 9.0.6-1 - The sysstat utilities are a collection of performance monitoring tools for Linux. These include sar, sadf, mpstat, iostat, pidstat and sa tools.
tar - 1.23-1 - Tar is a program for packaging a set of files as a single archive in tar format.
taskwarrior - 2.0.0-1 - taskwarrior is a command-line todo list manager
tayga - 0.9.2-1 - TAYGA is an out-of-kernel stateless NAT64 implementation for Linux.  It uses the TUN driver to exchange packets with the kernel, which is the same driver used by OpenVPN and QEMU/KVM.
tc - 3.3.0-2 - Traffic control utility
tcl - 8.5.8-1 - Tcl (Tool Command Language) is a very powerful but easy to learn dynamic programming language, suitable for a very wide range of uses, including web and desktop applications, networking, administration, testing and many more. Open source and business-friendly, Tcl is a mature yet evolving language that is truly cross platform, easily deployed and highly extensible.
tcpdump - 4.2.1-3 - Network monitoring and data acquisition tool
tcpdump-mini - 4.2.1-3 - Network monitoring and data acquisition tool (minimal version)
tcpser - 1.0rc12-2 - TCPSER turns a PC serial port into an emulated Hayes compatible modem that uses TCP/IP for incoming and outgoing connections. It can be used  to allow older applications and systems designed for modem use  to operate on the Internet. TCPSER supports all standard Hayes commands, and understands extended and vendor proprietary commands (though it does not implement many of them). TCPSER can be used for both inbound and  outbound connections. 
tcptraceroute - 1.5beta7-1 - A traceroute implementation using TCP packets.
tcsh - 6.17.00-1 - Tcsh is an enhanced, but completely compatible version of the Berkeley UNIX C shell (csh). It is a command language interpreter usable both as an interactive login shell and a shell script command processor. It includes a command-line editor, programmable word completion, spelling correction, a history mechanism, job control and a C-like syntax. 
tctool - 0.9.7-1 - tcTool provides access to the console-service of TrendChip-based ADSL-Modems.
temboo - 1.1.0-1 - 1500+ cloud-based code components that let you create without limits.
terminfo - 5.7-5 - Terminal Info Database (ncurses)
test-scripts - 1.0.0-1 - Test scripts
tftp-hpa - 0.48-3 - An enhanced version of the BSD TFTP client
tftpd-hpa - 0.48-3 - An enhanced version of the BSD TFTP server
tig - 0.18-1 - Command line launcher for search engines and other Internet services.
time - 1.7-1 - `time' is a program that measures many of the CPU resources, such as time and memory, that other programs use.  The GNU version can format the output in arbitrary ways by using a printf-style format string to include various resource measurements.  Some systems do not provide much information about program resource use; `time' reports unavailable information as zero values.
tinc - 1.0.21-1 - tinc is a Virtual Private Network (VPN) daemon that uses tunnelling and encryption to create a secure private network between hosts on the Internet.
tinyproxy - 1.8.2-5 - Tinyproxy is a lightweight HTTP and HTTPS proxy
tmsnc - 0.3.2-1 - TMSNC is a textbased (console) MSN client written in C.
tmux - 1.6-2 - tmux is a modern, BSD-licensed alternative to GNU screen.
toobig6 - 0.7-1 - Inject MTU values in a IPv6 host
tor - 0.2.2.39-1 - An anonymous Internet communication system
tor-alpha - 0.2.3.22-rc-1 - Tor is a toolset for a wide range of organizations and people that want to improve their safety and security on the Internet. Using Tor can help you anonymize web browsing and publishing, instant messaging, IRC, SSH, and more. Tor also provides a platform on which software developers can build new applications with built-in anonymity, safety, and privacy features. This package contains the tor daemon.
tor-alpha-fw-helper - 0.2.3.22-rc-1 - Tor is a toolset for a wide range of organizations and people that want to improve their safety and security on the Internet. Using Tor can help you anonymize web browsing and publishing, instant messaging, IRC, SSH, and more. Tor also provides a platform on which software developers can build new applications with built-in anonymity, safety, and privacy features. This package contains a helper for automatically configuring port forwarding.
tor-alpha-geoip - 0.2.3.22-rc-1 - Tor is a toolset for a wide range of organizations and people that want to improve their safety and security on the Internet. Using Tor can help you anonymize web browsing and publishing, instant messaging, IRC, SSH, and more. Tor also provides a platform on which software developers can build new applications with built-in anonymity, safety, and privacy features. This package contains a GeoIP database mapping IP addresses to countries.
tor-geoip - 0.2.2.39-1 - GeoIP db for tor
totd - 1.5.1-3 - totd is a small DNS proxy nameserver which supports IPv6 and enable IPv6 only sites to access IPv4 sites by using some translation mechanism such as NAT-PT, KAME faith, etc...
traceroute6 - 1.0.2-1 - An IPv6-based traceroute implementation
transmission-daemon - 2.71-1 - Transmission is a simple BitTorrent client. It features a very simple, intuitive interface on top on an efficient, cross-platform back-end. This package contains the daemon itself.
transmission-remote - 2.71-1 - CLI remote interface for transmission.
transmission-web - 2.71-1 - Webinterface resources for transmission.
triggerhappy - 0.3.4-1 - triggerhappy - handle input events and run configured programs The daemon thd can handle hotplugged input devices and is configured through simple configuration files in /etc/triggerhappy/triggers.d/.
tspc - 2.1.1-2 - Client to configure an IPv6 tunnel to Hexago's (Freenet6's) migration broker.
ttcp - 3.8-1 - A small utility to test TCP connection performance.
tune2fs - 1.42.4-1 - Ext2 Filesystem tune utility
tunslip6 - 2.5 - tunslip6 from Contiki OS
twisted - 2.5.0-1 - Python networking engine
twisted-conch - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - Conch
twisted-lore - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - Lore
twisted-mail - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - Mail
twisted-names - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - Names
twisted-news - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - News
twisted-runner - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - Runner
twisted-web - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - Web
twisted-words - 2.5.0-1 - Twisted - Words
uSDaemon - 1.0.0-1 - uSD auto (un)mount
uacctd - 0.14.0-1 - ulog accounting daemon
uacctd-mysql - 0.14.0-1 - ulog accounting daemon with MySQL support
uacctd-pgsql - 0.14.0-1 - ulog accounting daemon with PostgreSQL support
uacctd-sqlite - 0.14.0-1 - ulog accounting daemon with SQLite support
uanytun - 0.3.3-1 - uAnytun is a tiny implementation of SATP the secure anycast tunneling protocol. SATP defines a protocol used for communication between any combination of  unicast and anycast tunnel endpoints.  It has less protocol overhead than  IPSec in Tunnel mode and allows tunneling of every ETHER TYPE protocol (e.g. ethernet, ip, arp ...). SATP directly includes cryptography and message  authentication based on the methodes used by SRTP.  It is intended to deliver  a generic, scaleable and secure solution for tunneling and relaying of packets  of any protocol. Unlike Anytun which is a full featured implementation uAnytun has no support  for multiple connections or synchronisation. It is a small single threaded  implementation intended to act as a client on small platforms.
uanytun-nocrypt - 0.3.3-1 - uAnytun is a tiny implementation of SATP the secure anycast tunneling protocol. SATP defines a protocol used for communication between any combination of  unicast and anycast tunnel endpoints.  It has less protocol overhead than  IPSec in Tunnel mode and allows tunneling of every ETHER TYPE protocol (e.g. ethernet, ip, arp ...). SATP directly includes cryptography and message  authentication based on the methodes used by SRTP.  It is intended to deliver  a generic, scaleable and secure solution for tunneling and relaying of packets  of any protocol. Unlike Anytun which is a full featured implementation uAnytun has no support  for multiple connections or synchronisation. It is a small single threaded  implementation intended to act as a client on small platforms.
uanytun-sslcrypt - 0.3.3-1 - uAnytun is a tiny implementation of SATP the secure anycast tunneling protocol. SATP defines a protocol used for communication between any combination of  unicast and anycast tunnel endpoints.  It has less protocol overhead than  IPSec in Tunnel mode and allows tunneling of every ETHER TYPE protocol (e.g. ethernet, ip, arp ...). SATP directly includes cryptography and message  authentication based on the methodes used by SRTP.  It is intended to deliver  a generic, scaleable and secure solution for tunneling and relaying of packets  of any protocol. Unlike Anytun which is a full featured implementation uAnytun has no support  for multiple connections or synchronisation. It is a small single threaded  implementation intended to act as a client on small platforms.
uboot-envtools - 2012.04.01-1 - This package includes tools to read and modify U-Boot bootloader environment.
ubus - 2013-08-08-b20a8a01c7faea5bcc9d34d10dcf7736589021b8 - OpenWrt RPC client utility
ubusd - 2013-08-08-b20a8a01c7faea5bcc9d34d10dcf7736589021b8 - OpenWrt RPC daemon
ucarp - 1.5.2-3 - ucarp allows a couple of hosts to share common virtual IP addresses in order to provide automatic failover. It is a portable userland implementation of the secure and patent-free Common Address Redundancy Protocol
uci - 2013-06-11.1-1 - Utility for the Unified Configuration Interface (UCI)
uclibcxx - 0.2.4-1 - C++ library for embedded systems
ucspi-tcp - 0.88-1 - UNIX Client-Server Program Interface for TCP
udev - 173-1 - udev allows Linux users to have a dynamic /dev directory and it provides the ability to have persistent device names.
udp-broadcast-relay - 0.3-1 - This program listens for packets on a specified UDP broadcast port. When a packet is received, it sends that packet to all specified interfaces but  the one it came from as though it originated from the original sender. The primary purpose of this is to allow games on machines on separated  local networks (Ethernet, WLAN) that use udp broadcasts to find each other to do so. It also works on ppp links, so you can log in from windows boxes (e.g. using pptp)  and play LAN-based games together. Currently, you have to care about upcoming or  downgoing interfaces yourself.
udpcast - 20100130-1 - UDPcast is a file transfer tool that can send data simultaneously to many destinations on a LAN.
udpxy - 1.0.21-2-1 - udproxy makes it possible to convert UDP IPTV streams into http streams which can be viewed even over wlans. http streams do not generate huge amounts of multicast traffic, so a sd stream only takes about 300k. interesting for peoply who have IPTV at home and do not want to rent multiple decoders from their provider but just use their own streaming client for example popcornhour/mediatomb/vlc/etc.
uftp - 3.6.1-1 - UFTP is an encrypted multicast file transfer program, designed to securely, reliably, and efficiently transfer files to multiple receivers simultaneously. This package contains the server built with TLS support.
uftp-keymgt - 3.6.1-1 - UFTP is an encrypted multicast file transfer program, designed to securely, reliably, and efficiently transfer files to multiple receivers simultaneously. This package contains the key management utility.
uftp-notls - 3.6.1-1 - UFTP is an encrypted multicast file transfer program, designed to securely, reliably, and efficiently transfer files to multiple receivers simultaneously. This package contains the server built without TLS support.
uftpd - 3.6.1-1 - UFTP is an encrypted multicast file transfer program, designed to securely, reliably, and efficiently transfer files to multiple receivers simultaneously. This package contains the client daemon built with TLS support.
uftpd-notls - 3.6.1-1 - UFTP is an encrypted multicast file transfer program, designed to securely, reliably, and efficiently transfer files to multiple receivers simultaneously. This package contains the client daemon built without TLS support.
uftpproxyd - 3.6.1-1 - UFTP is an encrypted multicast file transfer program, designed to securely, reliably, and efficiently transfer files to multiple receivers simultaneously. This package contains the proxy daemon built with TLS support.
uftpproxyd-notls - 3.6.1-1 - UFTP is an encrypted multicast file transfer program, designed to securely, reliably, and efficiently transfer files to multiple receivers simultaneously. This package contains the proxy daemon built without TLS support.
uhttpd - 2012-10-30-e57bf6d8bfa465a50eea2c30269acdfe751a46fd - uHTTPd is a tiny single threaded HTTP server with TLS, CGI and Lua support. It is intended as a drop-in replacement for the Busybox HTTP daemon.
uhttpd-mod-lua - 2012-10-30-e57bf6d8bfa465a50eea2c30269acdfe751a46fd - The Lua plugin adds a CGI-like Lua runtime interface to uHTTPd.
uhttpd-mod-tls - 2012-10-30-e57bf6d8bfa465a50eea2c30269acdfe751a46fd - The TLS plugin adds HTTPS support to uHTTPd.
uhttpd-mod-ubus - 2012-10-30-e57bf6d8bfa465a50eea2c30269acdfe751a46fd - The ubus plugin adds a HTTP/JSON RPC proxy for ubus and publishes the session.* namespace and procedures.
uhub - 0.2.8-3 - uhub is a high performance peer-to-peer hub for the ADC network. Its low memory footprint allows it to handle several thousand users on high-end servers, or a small private hub on embedded hardware.
ulogd - 1.24-2 - Netfilter userspace logging daemon
unbound - 1.4.17-1 - This package contains the Unbound daemon.
unbound-anchor - 1.4.17-1 - This package contains the Unbound anchor utility.
unbound-control - 1.4.17-1 - This package contains the Unbound control utility.
unbound-control-setup - 1.4.17-1 - This package contains the Unbound control setup utility.
unbound-host - 1.4.17-1 - This package contains the Unbound DNS lookup utility.
unfs3 - 0.9.22-3 - UNFS3 is a user-space implementation of the NFSv3 server specification. It provides a daemon for the MOUNT and NFS protocols, which are used by NFS clients for accessing files on the server.
unixodbc - 2.3.1-1 - unixODBC is an Open Source ODBC sub-system and an ODBC SDK for Linux, Mac OSX, and UNIX.
unixodbc-tools - 2.3.1-1 - Command Line Tools to help install a driver and work with SQL.
unrar - 4.0.7-1 - unrar is an application that can decompress files and archives created using the RAR compression scheme
unzip - 5.52-1 - InfoZIP's unzip program. With the exception of multi-volume archives (ie, .ZIP files that are split across several disks using PKZIP's /& option),  this can handle any file produced either by PKZIP, or the corresponding  InfoZIP zip program.
updatedd - 2.6-9 - Updatedd is a small tool that will update one of many dynamic dns services on boot.  Please look at the /etc/init.d/ddns script for more info.  
upx - 3.08-1 - UPX is a free, portable, extendable, high-performance executable packer for several different executable formats. It achieves an excellent compression ratio and offers very fast decompression. Your executables suffer no memory overhead or other drawbacks for most of the formats supported, because of in-place decompression.
usb-modeswitch - 1.2.3-2 - A mode switching tool for controlling "flip flop" (multiple device) USB gear.
usb-modeswitch-data - 20120120-1 - Configuration database for usb-modeswitch. Contains definitions for many USB devices required to autoswitch "flip flop" gear.
usbreset - 2 - This package contains the small usbreset utility which can be used to send a USB port reset to a USB device - useful for debugging or to force re-detection of particular devices.
usbutils - 005-1 - USB devices listing utilities
ushare - 1.1a-4 - uShare is a UPnP (TM) A/V & DLNA Media Server. It implements the server component that provides UPnP media devices with information on available  multimedia files.
uucp - 1.07-2 - UUCP is used to transfer mail, news and random files between systems which are not connected by more modern networks. The communication can be made via modems, direct (hard-wired) serial connections or via an IP connection.
uuidd - 2.21.2-1 - The uuidd daemon is used by the UUID library to generate universally unique identifiers (UUIDs), especially time-based UUIDs, in a secure and guaranteed-unique fashion, even in the face of large numbers of threads running on different CPUs trying to grab UUIDs.
uuidgen - 2.21.2-1 - The uuidgen program creates (and prints) a new universally unique identifier (UUID) using the libuuid library. The new UUID can reasonably be considered unique among all UUIDs created on the local system, and among UUIDs created on other systems in the past and in the future.
v4l-utils - 0.8.6-2 - libv4l is a collection of libraries which adds a thin abstraction layer on top of video4linux2 devices. The purpose of this (thin) layer is to make it easy for application writers to support a wide variety of devices without having to write separate code for different devices in the same class. libv4l consists of 3 different libraries: libv4lconvert, libv4l1 and libv4l2.  libv4l1 offers the (deprecated) v4l1 API on top of v4l2 devices, independent of the drivers for those devices supporting v4l1 compatibility (which many v4l2 drivers do not).  libv4l2 offers the v4l2 API on top of v4l2 devices, while adding for the application transparent libv4lconvert conversion where necessary. This package contains the video4linux utilities.
valgrind - 3.8.0-1 - Valgrind is an award-winning suite of tools for debugging and profiling Linux programs. With the tools that come with Valgrind, you can automatically detect many memory management and threading bugs, avoiding hours of frustrating bug-hunting, making your programs more stable. You can also perform detailed profiling, to speed up and reduce memory use of your programs.
valgrind-cachegrind - 3.8.0-1 - debugging and profiling tools for Linux (cache profiling)
valgrind-callgrind - 3.8.0-1 - debugging and profiling tools for Linux (callgraph profiling)
valgrind-drd - 3.8.0-1 - debugging and profiling tools for Linux (thread error detection)
valgrind-helgrind - 3.8.0-1 - debugging and profiling tools for Linux (thread debugging)
valgrind-massif - 3.8.0-1 - debugging and profiling tools for Linux (heap profiling)
valgrind-vgdb - 3.8.0-1 - debugging and profiling tools for Linux (GDB interface)
vblade - 20-2 - The vblade is the virtual EtherDrive (R) blade, a program that makes a seekable file available over an ethernet local area network (LAN) via the ATA over Ethernet (AoE) protocol.
veth - 1.0-1 - VETH is a daemon that virtualizes a ethernet card in Linux. The virtualization is done via Universal TUN/TAP Driver.
vgp - 0.2.1-1 - VGP (Virtual Gateway Protocol)is a very simple protocol able to work in a way similar to Cisco(c) HSRP. It implements the idea  of Virtual Gateway to provide fault tollerance (and load  balancing) on your net. Each client on your net has as its  default gateway set to the virtual gateway and not the real router.
vim - 7.3-1 - Vim is an almost compatible version of the UNIX editor Vi. (Tiny build)
vim-full - 7.3-1 - Vim is an almost compatible version of the UNIX editor Vi. (Normal build)
vim-help - 7.3-1 - Vim is an almost compatible version of the UNIX editor Vi. (Help files)
vim-runtime - 7.3-1 - Vim is an almost compatible version of the UNIX editor Vi. (Runtime files)
vips - 7.28.9-2 - An image manipulation library
vnc-reflector - 1.2.4-1 - VNC Reflector is a specialized VNC server which acts as a proxy sitting between real VNC server (a host) and a  number of VNC clients. It was designed to work efficiently  with large number of clients.
vncrepeater - 0.12-3 - Viewer can be behind Nat router or directly connected to the internet instead of forwarding serveral ports, you only need to forward 1 port.  If the PC that runs the Repeater has access to the local DNS server,  you can use your local DNS names instead of 10.10.10.12. This could be handy when you have a dynamic DHCP server allocating  ip adresses for your PC.
vnstat - 1.11-4 - vnStat is a network traffic monitor for Linux that keeps a log of daily network traffic for the selected interface(s). vnStat isn't a packet sniffer. The traffic information is analyzed from the /proc -filesystem, so vnStat can be used without root permissions.
vnstati - 1.11-4 - The purpose of vnstati is to provide image output support for statistics collected using vnstat(1). However, the image file format is limited to png. All basic outputs of vnStat are supported excluding live traffic features. The image can be outputted either to a file or to standard output.
vpnc - 0.5.3-3 - A VPN client compatible with Cisco's EasyVPN equipment.  Supports IPSec (ESP) with Mode Configuration and Xauth.  Supports only shared-secret IPSec authentication with Xauth, AES (256, 192, 128), 3DES, 1DES, MD5, SHA1, DH1/2/5 and IP tunneling.
vpnc-scripts - 20120423-1 - VPN configuration script for vpnc and OpenConnect
vpzone - 0.1.2-3 - A flexible multipurpose layer 3 VPN daemon
vrrpd - 1.0-3 - VRRPd is an implementation of Virtual Router Redundancy Protocol as specified in rfc2338. VRRPd is interoperable with  other RFC-based VRRP implementations, including Cisco and  Juniper, and is included as a standard feature on ImageStream  routers.
vsc7385-ucode-ap83 - 1 - This package contains the Atheros AP83 board specific microcode for the Vitesse VSC7385 ethernet switch.
vsc7385-ucode-pb44 - 1 - This package contains the Atheros PB44 board specific microcode for the Vitesse VSC7385 ethernet switch.
vsc7395-ucode-ap83 - 1 - This package contains the Atheros AP83 board specific microcode for the Vitesse VSC7395 ethernet switch.
vsc7395-ucode-pb44 - 1 - This package contains the Atheros AP83 board specific microcode for the Vitesse VSC7395 ethernet switch.
vsftpd - 3.0.2-1 - A fast and secure FTP server
vtun - 3.0.2-1 - VPN tunneling daemon
wall - 2.21.2-1 - wall sends a message to everybody logged in with their mesg permission set to yes
watchcat - 1-5 - Allows to configure a periodically reboot, or after loosing internet connectivity. Configured trough UCI /etc/config/system.
wattsup - 1 - Wattsup polling utility
wavemon - 0.7.5-1 - wavemon is a ncurses-based monitoring application for wireless network devices. It currently works under Linux with devices that are supported by the wireless extensions by Jean Tourrilhes (included in Kernel 2.4 and higher), e.g. the Lucent Orinoco cards.
wdiag - 0.10-1 - A collection of utilities to get DSL stats from Westell DSL modems.
webif - 0.3-4986 - A HTTP administrative console for OpenWrt
webif-applications - 0.1-1 - XWrt applications plugin
webif-batman - 0.1-beta - XWrt BATMAN mesh plugin
webif-fonheartbeat - 0.2-1 - Fakes a FON heartbeat for the webif^2
webif-freeloader - 0.1-1 - A download manager for the webif^2
webif-freeloader-lang-cs - 0.1-1 - Czech language file for webif-freeloader
webif-hotspot - 0.1-1 - XWrt HotSpot control pages
webif-iw-lua - 1.1-2 - Librerias para scripts de lua
webif-iw-lua-chillispot - 1.0-2 - ChilliSpot Configuration Script in LUA
webif-iw-lua-openssl - 1.0-1 - OpenSSL to handle certificates Script in LUA
webif-iw-lua-openvpn - 1.0-1 - OpenVPN Configuration Script in LUA
webif-lang-ca - 0.3-4986 - Catalan language file for webif^2
webif-lang-cs - 0.3-4986 - Czech language file for webif^2
webif-lang-da - 0.3-4986 - Danish language file for webif^2
webif-lang-de - 0.3-4986 - German language file for webif^2
webif-lang-ee - 0.3-4986 - Estonian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-es - 0.3-4986 - Spanish language file for webif^2
webif-lang-fr - 0.3-4986 - French language file for webif^2
webif-lang-hr - 0.3-4986 - Croatian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-hu - 0.3-4986 - Hungarian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-it - 0.3-4986 - Italian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-nl - 0.3-4986 - Dutch language file for webif^2
webif-lang-no - 0.3-4986 - Norwegian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-pl - 0.3-4986 - Polish language file for webif^2
webif-lang-pt - 0.3-4986 - Portuguese language file for webif^2
webif-lang-ru - 0.3-4986 - Russian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-sq - 0.3-4986 - Albanian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-sv - 0.3-4986 - Swedish language file for webif^2
webif-lang-uk - 0.3-4986 - Ukrainian language file for webif^2
webif-lang-zh - 0.3-4986 - Chinese language file for webif^2
webif-mesh - 0.1-beta - XWrt mesh installation page
webif-netsukuku - 0.1-beta - XWrt Netsukuku mesh plugin
webif-theme-clubman - 0.3-4986 - Clubman theme for webif^2
webif-theme-sedky1 - 0.3-4986 - Sedky theme for webif^2
webif-theme-xwrt - 0.3-4986 - Original theme for webif^2
webif-theme-xwrt-mini - 0.3-4986 - Variant of the original theme (blank header)
webif-theme-zephyr - 0.3-4986 - Zephyr theme for webif^2
webif-vpn - 0.1-1 - X-Wrt VPN Pages
weechat - 0.4.0-1 - Weechat is fast, light & extensible IRC client.
wget - 1.13.4-1 - Wget is a network utility to retrieve files from the Web using http and ftp, the two most widely used Internet protocols. It works non-interactively, so it will work in the background, after having logged off. The program supports recursive retrieval of web-authoring pages as well as ftp sites -- you can use wget to make mirrors of archives and home pages or to travel the Web like a WWW robot. This package is built with SSL support.
wget-nossl - 1.13.4-1 - Wget is a network utility to retrieve files from the Web using http and ftp, the two most widely used Internet protocols. It works non-interactively, so it will work in the background, after having logged off. The program supports recursive retrieval of web-authoring pages as well as ftp sites -- you can use wget to make mirrors of archives and home pages or to travel the Web like a WWW robot. This package is built without SSL support.
whereis - 2.21.2-1 - whereis locates source/binary and manuals sections for specified files
whiptail - 0.52.12-1 - A lightweight replacement for the dialog command (dialog boxes from shell scripts), based on libnewt.
whob - 3.32-1 - LFT, short for Layer Four Traceroute, is a sort of 'traceroute' that often works much faster (than the commonly-used Van Jacobson method) and goes through many configurations of packet-filters (firewalls). More importantly, LFT implements numerous other features including AS number lookups through several reliable sources, loose source routing, netblock name lookups, et al. This package contains the whob 'whois' program.
wifidog - 20090925-1 - The Wifidog project is a complete and embeddable captive portal solution for wireless community groups or individuals who wish to open a free Hotspot while still preventing abuse of their Internet connection.
wifitoggle - 1-3 - Very versatile script to toggle Wi-Fi with a button. Allows to set timeouts, persist changes after boot, and set LEDs according to the state.
wing - 20120805-1 - Wireless mesh networking toolkit
wipefs - 2.21.2-1 - wipefs can erase filesystem, raid or partition table signatures (magic strings) from the specified device to make the signature invisible for libblkid.
wireless-tools - 29-5 - This package contains a collection of tools for configuring wireless adapters implementing the "Linux Wireless Extensions".
wiviz - 1.0-1 - Wireless Network Visualization
wminput - 0.6.00-2 - Linux Nintendo Wiimote interface (utility)
wol - 0.7.1-3 - wol implements Wake On LAN functionality in a small program. It wakes up hardware that is Magic Packet compliant.
wpa-cli - 20131120-1 - WPA Supplicant command line interface
wpa-supplicant - 20131120-1 - WPA Supplicant
wpa-supplicant-mini - 20131120-1 - WPA Supplicant (minimal version)
wpad - 20131120-1 - This package contains a full featured IEEE 802.1x/WPA/EAP/RADIUS Authenticator and Supplicant
wpad-mini - 20131120-1 - This package contains a minimal IEEE 802.1x/WPA Authenticator and Supplicant (WPA-PSK only).
wprobe-export - 1-1 - wprobe-export uses the wprobe kernel module to export wireless driver measurement data via the IPFIX protocol
wprobe-util - 1-1 - wprobe-util uses the wprobe kernel module to query wireless driver measurement data from an interface
wput - 0.6.2-1 - Wput is a tiny ftp-client, that uploads files or directories to a remote ftp-server.  Main features are: resuming, time-stamping, wget-like interface, proxy-support and speed-limit.
wshaper - 0.2-2 - A script to do traffing shaping with the HTB algorithm. Wshaper attempts to: * Maintain low latency for interfactive traffic at all times  * Allow 'surfing' at reasonable speeds while up or downloading * Make sure uploads don't harm downloads, and the other way around
wview - 5.19.0-jgoerzen-7bfac6c11e756290c38e7b5862a4c51b6bc6c51e - Wview is a collection of linux/unix daemons which interface with a supported weather station to retrieve archive records (if generated by the station) and current conditions. If the station does not generate archive records internally, wview will auto-generate archive records based on the sensor readings collected for that interval. The archive records and High/Low (HILOW) data are stored in SQLite3 databases. At a configurable interval, wview will utilize the archive history and current conditions to generate weather images (buckets, dials and graphs) and HTML web pages based on user-configurable HTML templates.  After install you need to create a directory holding archive and create the database there by running there sqlite3 wview-archive.sdb '.read /etc/wview/wview-archive.sql'  Then copy all your theme files to the appropriate place (on a non-volatile storage), and html-templates.conf to /etc/wview/; then wviewconfig to configure the system.  Read and amend /etc/init.d/wview appropriately for your particular setup!
wx200d - 1.3-1 - wx200d is a weather station data collector and server daemon for the WX200, WM918, WMR918 and WMR968 weather station  hardware.
xdelta3 - 3.0.0-1 - Xdelta3 is a set of tools designed to compute changes between binary files. These changes (delta files) are similar to the output of the "diff" program, in that they may be used to store and transmit only the changes between files. The "delta files" that Xdelta3 manages are stored in RFC3284 (VCDIFF) format.
xfs-fsck - 3.1.7-1 - Utilities for checking and repairing XFS filesystems
xfs-growfs - 3.1.7-1 - Utility for increasing the size of XFS filesystems
xfs-mkfs - 3.1.7-1 - Utility for creating XFS filesystems
xinetd - 2.3.15-1 - xinetd has access control mechanisms, extensive logging capabilities, the ability to make services available based on time, can place limits on the number of servers that can be started, and has deployable defence mechanisms to protect against port scanners, among other things.
xl2tpd - 1.3.1-1 - l2tpd is the open source implementation of the L2TP tunneling protocol (RFC2661). It does implement both LAC and LNS role in a L2TP networking architecture. The main goal of this protocol is to tunnel PPP frame trough an IP network.
xmail - 1.26-3 - XMail is an Internet mail server featuring an SMTP, POP3 and finger server. It's incredibly easy to set up and has lots of features including :  multiple domains, virtual users and spam protection.
xsltproc - 1.1.26-1 - XSLT XML transformation utility
xsupplicant - 1.2.8-3 - This software allows a GNU/Linux or BSD workstation to authenticate with a RADIUS server using 802.1x and various EAP protocols.
xxd - 7.3-1 - xxd creates a hex dump of a given file or standard input, it can also convert a hex dump back to its original binary form.
yaddns - 1.1-2 - Yaddns is a small ddns client with multiple ddns server supports (dyndns, ...) and a high flexibility. Yaddns is particularly appropriate for embedded systems.
yafc - 1.1.1-2 - Yafc is yet another ftp client.
yun-scripts - 1.3-2 - Custom Yn scripts
zabbix-agent - 2.0.0-1 - Zabbix agent
zabbix-agentd - 2.0.0-1 - Zabbix agentd
zabbix-get - 2.0.0-1 - Zabbix get
zabbix-proxy - 2.0.0-1 - Zabbix proxy
zabbix-sender - 2.0.0-1 - Zabbix sender
zabbix-server - 2.0.0-1 - Zabbix server
zile - 2.3.24-1 - Zile is a small Emacs clone. Zile is a customizable, self-documenting real-time display editor. Zile was written to be as similar as possible to Emacs; every Emacs user should feel at home with Zile.
zip - 2.32-1 - This is InfoZIP's zip program. It produces files that are fully compatible with the popular PKZIP program; however, the command line  options are not identical. In other words, the end result is the same,  but the methods differ.
zlib - 1.2.7-1 - Library implementing the deflate compression method
znc - 0.206-2 - ZNC is an IRC bouncer with many advanced features like detaching, multiple users, per channel playback buffer, SSL, IPv6, transparent DCC bouncing, and c++ module support to name a few.
znc-mod-adminlog - 0.206-2 - Log user connects and disconnects and failed logins to file or syslog.
znc-mod-autoattach - 0.206-2 - Reattaches you to channels on activity.
znc-mod-autocycle - 0.206-2 - Cycles a channel when you are the only one in there and you don't have op.
znc-mod-autoop - 0.206-2 - Auto op the good guys.
znc-mod-autoreply - 0.206-2 - Gives a automatic reply if someone messages you if you are away.
znc-mod-autovoice - 0.206-2 - Autovoices everyone who joins some channel.
znc-mod-awaynick - 0.206-2 - Change your nick while you are away.
znc-mod-block-motd - 0.206-2 - This module blocks the server's Message of the Day.
znc-mod-blockuser - 0.206-2 - Blocks certain users from using ZNC saying their account was disabled.
znc-mod-bouncedcc - 0.206-2 - Bounces dcc transfers through the znc server instead of sending them directly to the user.
znc-mod-buffextras - 0.206-2 - Add nick changes, joins, parts, topic changes etc. to your playback buffer.
znc-mod-cert - 0.206-2 - Use a SSL certificate for connecting to a server.
znc-mod-certauth - 0.206-2 - This module allows users to log in to ZNC via SSL client keys.
znc-mod-chansaver - 0.206-2 - Keeping config up to date when user joins and parts.
znc-mod-clearbufferonmsg - 0.206-2 - This module keeps the buffer until the next message from the client.
znc-mod-clientnotify - 0.206-2 - Notify about new incoming connections to your user.
znc-mod-crypt - 0.206-2 - Encryption for channel/private messages.
znc-mod-ctcpflood - 0.206-2 - This module tries to block ctcp floods.
znc-mod-dcc - 0.206-2 - Allows you to transfer files to and from ZNC.
znc-mod-disconkick - 0.206-2 - This module will kick your client from all channels where you are, in case if ZNC disconnects from server.
znc-mod-fail2ban - 0.206-2 - Block IPs for some time after a failed login.
znc-mod-flooddetach - 0.206-2 - This module detaches you from channels which are flooded.
znc-mod-identfile - 0.206-2 - Places the ident of a user to a file when they are trying to connect.
znc-mod-keepnick - 0.206-2 - Tries to get you your primary nick.
znc-mod-kickrejoin - 0.206-2 - Implements auto-rejoin-on-kick.
znc-mod-lastseen - 0.206-2 - Logs when a user last logged in to ZNC.
znc-mod-listsockets - 0.206-2 - This module displays a list of all open sockets in ZNC.
znc-mod-log - 0.206-2 - Log conversations to file.
znc-mod-nickserv - 0.206-2 - Auths you with NickServ.
znc-mod-notes - 0.206-2 - This modules stores and displays short notes using a key/note pairs and shows them to you on connect.
znc-mod-notify-connect - 0.206-2 - Sends a notice to all admins when a user logs in or out.
znc-mod-partyline - 0.206-2 - Allows ZNC users to join internal channels and query other ZNC users on the same ZNC.
znc-mod-perform - 0.206-2 - Performs commands on connect.
znc-mod-q - 0.206-2 - Auths you with Q (and a little more).
znc-mod-raw - 0.206-2 - View all of the raw traffic.
znc-mod-route-replies - 0.206-2 - Routes back answers to the right client when connected with multiple clients.
znc-mod-savebuff - 0.206-2 - Saves your channel buffers into an encrypted file so they can survive restarts and reboots.
znc-mod-schat - 0.206-2 - SSL (encrypted) DCC chats.
znc-mod-send-raw - 0.206-2 - Allows you to send raw traffic to IRC from other users.
znc-mod-shell - 0.206-2 - Have your unix shell in a query window right inside of your IRC client.
znc-mod-simple-away - 0.206-2 - This module will automatically set you away on IRC while you are disconnected from the bouncer.
znc-mod-stickychan - 0.206-2 - Keeps you sticked to specific channels.
znc-mod-watch - 0.206-2 - Monitor activity for specific text patterns from specific users and have the text sent to a special query window.
znc-mod-webadmin - 0.206-2 - Allows you to add/remove/edit users and settings on the fly via a web browser.
znc-webskin-dark-clouds - 0.206-2 - dark-clouds webskin for webadmin
znc-webskin-forest - 0.206-2 - forest webskin for webadmin
znc-webskin-ice - 0.206-2 - ice webskin for webadmin
zoneinfo-africa - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (Africa)
zoneinfo-asia - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (Asia)
zoneinfo-atlantic - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (Atlantic)
zoneinfo-australia-nz - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (Australia-NZ)
zoneinfo-core - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (core)
zoneinfo-europe - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (Europe)
zoneinfo-india - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (India)
zoneinfo-middleeast - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (MiddleEast)
zoneinfo-northamerica - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (NorthAmerica)
zoneinfo-pacific - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (Pacific)
zoneinfo-poles - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (Arctic, Antarctic)
zoneinfo-simple - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (simple)
zoneinfo-southamerica - 2011n-1 - Zone Information (SouthAmerica)
zope-interface - 2.5.0-1 - Zope interface
